10-K 1 a2237832z10-k.htm 10-K
Use these links to rapidly review the document
TABLE OF CONTENTS
TABLE OF CONTENTS 2
Table of Contents
UNITED ST ATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
Commission File Number: 1-14066
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Delawar e
(State or other jurisdiction of
incorporation or or ganization) 13-3849074
(I.R.S. Employer
Identification No.)
1440 East Missouri Avenue Suite 160 Phoenix, AZ
(Address of principal executive of fices) 85014
(Zip code)
Registrant's telephone number , including area code: (602) 264-1375
          Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class:  Name of each exchange on which r egister ed:
Common stock, par value $0.01 per share  New York Stock Exchange
Lima Stock Exchange
          Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None
          Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer , as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. Yes ý    No o
          Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act. Yes o    No ý
          Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the
preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past
90 days. Yes ý    No o
          Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T
(§ 232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit such files). Yes ý    No o
          Indicate by check mark if disclosure of delinquent filers pursuant to Item 405 of Regulation S-K (§ 229.405 of this chapter) is not contained herein, and will not be
contained, to the best of registrant's knowledge, in definitive proxy or information statements incorporated by reference in Part III of this Form 10-K or any amendment to this
Form 10-K. oý  ANNUAL  REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF  THE SECURITIES
EXCHANGE ACT  OF 1934
For the fiscal year  ended: December  31, 2018
OR
o  TRANSITION REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF  THE SECURITIES
EXCHANGE ACT  OF 1934
For the transition period fr om                                    to                                   
          Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a lar ge accelerated filer , an accelerated filer , a non-accelerated filer , smaller reporting company , or an emer ging growth
company . See definitions of "lar ge accelerated filer ," "accelerated filer ," "smaller reporting company" and "emer ging growth company" in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
          If an emer ging growth company , indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or revised
financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. o
          Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Act). Yes o    No ý
          At February 27, 2019, there were of record 773,044,469 shares of common stock, par value $0.01 per share, outstanding.
          The aggregate market value of the shares of common stock (based upon the closing price at June 30, 2018 as reported on the New York Stock Exchange—Composite
Transactions) of Southern Copper Corporation held by non-af filiates was approximately $2,639.1 million.
          POR TIONS OF THE FOLLOWING DOCUMENTS ARE INCORPORA TED BY  REFERENCE:
   Large accelerated filer ý  Accelerated filer o Non-accelerated filer o  Smaller reporting company o
Emer ging growth company o
Part III:  Proxy statement for 2019 Annual Meeting of Stockholders
Part IV : Exhibit Index is on Page 150 through 152
Table of Contents
Southern Copper  Corporation ("SCC")
INDEX TO FORM 10-K
    Page No.
PART I. 
 
Item 1 
Business 
3 - 12
Item 1A 
Risk factors 
13 - 23
Item 1B 
Unresolved Staf f Comments 
23
Item 2 
Properties 
24 - 64
Item 3 
Legal Proceedings 
64
Item 4 
Mine Safety Disclosure 
64
PART II. 
 
Item 5. 
Market for Registrant's Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters and
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities 
65 - 67
Item 6. 
Selected Financial Data 
68 - 69
Item 7. 
Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations 
70 - 99
Item 7A. 
Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk 
99
Item 8. 
Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 
101 - 173
Item 9. 
Changes in and Disagreements with Accountant on Accounting and Financial
Disclosure 
174
Item 9A. 
Controls and Procedures 
174 - 176
Item 9B. 
Other Information 
177
PART III. 
 
Item 10. 
Directors, Executive Of ficers and Corporate Governance 
177 - 179
Item 1 1. 
Executive Compensation 
177
Item 12. 
Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and
Related Stockholder Matters 
177
Item 13. 
Certain Relationships and Related Transactions and Director Independence 
177
Item 14. 
Principal Accounting Fees and Services 
177
PART IV. 
 
Item 15. 
Exhibits, Financial Statement Schedule 
180 - 183
 
Supplemental information 
183 - 186
 
Signatures 
187
Table of Contents
PART I
ITEM 1.    BUSINESS
THE COMP ANY
        Southern Copper Corporation ("SCC", "Southern Copper" or the "Company") is one of the lar gest integrated copper producers in
the world. Our major production includes copper , molybdenum, zinc and silver . All of our mining, smelting and refining facilities are
located in Peru and Mexico and we conduct exploration activities in those countries and in Argentina, Chile and Ecuador . See Item 2
"Properties—Review of Operations" for maps of our principal mines, smelting facilities and refineries. Our operations make us one of
the lar gest mining companies in Peru and Mexico. We believe we have the lar gest copper reserves in the world. We were incorporated
in Delaware in 1952 and have conducted copper mining operations since 1960. Since 1996, our common stock has been listed on both
the New York and Lima Stock Exchanges.
        Our Peruvian copper operations involve mining, milling and flotation of copper ore to produce copper concentrates and
molybdenum concentrates; the smelting of copper concentrates to produce blister and anode copper; and the refining of anode copper
to produce copper cathodes. As part of this production process, we also produce significant amounts of molybdenum concentrate and
sulfuric acid. Our precious metals plant at the Ilo refinery produces refined silver , gold, and other materials. Additionally , we produce
refined copper using solvent extraction/electrowinning technology ("SX-EW"). We operate the Toquepala and Cuajone open-pit mines
high in the Andes Mountains, approximately 860 kilometers southeast of the city of Lima, Peru. We also operate a smelter and refinery
west of the Toquepala and Cuajone mines in the coastal city of Ilo, Peru.
        Our Mexican operations are conducted through our subsidiary , Minera Mexico, S.A. de C.V . ("Minera Mexico"), which we
acquired in 2005. Minera Mexico engages primarily in the mining and processing of copper , molybdenum, zinc, silver , gold and lead.
Minera Mexico operates through subsidiaries that are grouped into three separate units. Mexicana de Cobre, S.A. de C.V . (together
with its subsidiaries, the "La Caridad" unit) operates La Caridad, an open-pit copper mine, a copper ore concentrator , a SX-EW  plant, a
smelter , refinery and a rod plant. The La Caridad refinery has a precious metals plant which produces refined silver , gold and other
materials. Operadora de Minas e Instalaciones Mineras, S.A  de C.V . (the "Buenavista unit") operates Buenavista, an open-pit copper
mine, which is located at the site of one of the world's lar gest copper ore deposits, two copper concentrators and three SX-EW  plants.
Industrial Minera Mexico, S.A. de C.V . (together with its subsidiaries, the "IMMSA  unit") operates five under ground mines that
produce zinc, lead, copper , silver and gold, a coal mine and a zinc refinery .
        We utilize modern, state of the art mining and processing methods, including global positioning systems and computerized mining
processes. Our operations have a high level of vertical integration that allows us to manage the entire production process, from the
mining of the ore to the production of refined copper rod and other products and most related transport and logistics functions, using
our own facilities, employees and equipment.
        The sales prices for our products are lar gely determined by market forces beyond our control. Our management, therefore, focuses
on cost control and production enhancement to remain profitable. We endeavor to achieve these goals through capital spending
programs, exploration ef forts and cost reduction programs. Our focus is to remain profitable during periods of low copper prices and
on maximizing results in periods of high copper prices. For additional information on the sale prices of the metals we produce, please
see "Metal Prices" in this Item 1.
3
Table of Contents
Currency Information:
        Unless stated otherwise, all our financial information is presented in U.S. dollars and any reference herein to "U.S. dollars",
"dollars", or "$" are to U.S. dollars; references to "sol", "soles" or "S/", are to Peruvian soles; and references to "peso", "pesos", or
"Ps.", are to Mexican pesos.
Unit Information:
        Unless otherwise noted, all tonnages are in metric tons. To convert to short tons, multiply by 1.102. All ounces are troy ounces.
All distances are in kilometers. To convert to miles, multiply by 0.621. To convert hectares to acres, multiply by 2.47.
ORGANIZA TIONAL  STRUCTURE
        The following chart describes our or ganizational structure, starting with our controlling stockholders, as of December 31, 2018.
For clarity of presentation, the chart identifies only our main subsidiaries and eliminates intermediate holding companies.
        We are a majority-owned, indirect subsidiary of Grupo Mexico S.A.B. de C.V . ("Grupo Mexico"). At December 31, 2018, Grupo
Mexico through its wholly-owned subsidiary Americas Mining Corporation ("AMC") owned 88.9% of our capital stock. Grupo
Mexico's principal business is to act as a holding company for the shares of other corporations engaged in the mining, processing,
purchase and sale of minerals and other products and railway and other related services.
        We conduct our operations in Peru through a registered branch (the "SPCC Peru Branch", "Branch" or "Peruvian Branch"). The
SPCC Peru Branch comprises substantially all of our assets and liabilities associated with our copper operations in Peru. The SPCC
Peru Branch is not a corporation separate from us and, therefore, obligations of SPCC Peru Branch are direct obligations of SCC and
vice-versa. It is, however , an establishment, registered pursuant to Peruvian law , through which we hold assets, incur liabilities and
conduct operations in Peru. Although it has neither its own capital nor liability separate from us, it is deemed to have equity capital for
purposes of determining the economic interests of holders of our investment shares (See Note 13 "Stockholders´ Equity" of our
consolidated financial statements).
4
Table of Contents
        In April 2005, we acquired Minera Mexico, from Americas Mining Corporation ("AMC"), a subsidiary of Grupo Mexico, our
controlling stockholder . Minera Mexico is a holding company and all of its operations are conducted through subsidiaries that are
grouped into three units: (i) the La Caridad unit (ii) the Buenavista unit and (iii) the IMMSA  unit. We own 99.96% of Minera Mexico.
        In 2008, our Board of Directors ("BOD") authorized a $500 million share repurchase program that has since been increased by
the BOD and is currently authorized to $3 billion. Pursuant to this program, through December 31, 2018 we have purchased
119.5 million shares of our common stock at a cost of $2.9 billion. These shares are available for general corporate purposes. We may
purchase additional shares from time to time, based on market conditions and other factors. This repurchase program has no expiration
date and may be modified or discontinued at any time.
REPUBLIC OF PERU AND MEXICO
        Our revenues are derived primarily from our operations in Peru and Mexico. Risks related to our operations in both countries
include those associated with economic and political conditions, the ef fects of currency fluctuations and inflation, the ef fects of
government regulations and the geographic concentration of our operations.
AVAILABLE INFORMA TION
        We file annual, quarterly and current reports, proxy statements and other information with the U.S. Securities and Exchange
Commission ("SEC"). You may read and copy any document we file at the SEC's Public Reference Room at 100 F Street NE,
Washington, D.C. 20549. The SEC maintains a website that contains annual, quarterly and current reports, proxy statements and other
information that issuers (including Southern Copper Corporation) file electronically with the SEC. The SEC's website is www .sec.gov .
        Our website is www .southerncoppercorp.com. Beginning with the Form 8-K dated March 14, 2003, we have made available on
this website, free of char ge, our annual, quarterly and current reports, as soon as reasonably practical after we electronically file such
material with, or furnish it to, the SEC. Our website also includes the Company's Corporate Governance guidelines and the charters of
our principal Board Committees. However , the information found on our website is not part of this or any other report.
CAUTIONAR Y STATEMENT
        Forward-looking statements in this report and in other Company statements include information regarding expected
commencement dates of mining or metal production operations, projected quantities of future metal production, anticipated production
rates, operating ef ficiencies, costs and expenditures, including taxes, as well as projected demand or supply for the Company's
products. Actual results could dif fer materially depending upon certain factors, including the risks and uncertainties relating to general
U.S. and international economic and political conditions, the cyclical and volatile prices of copper , other commodities and supplies,
including fuel and electricity , the availability of materials, insurance coverage, equipment, required permits or approvals and financing,
the occurrence of unusual weather or operating conditions, lower than expected ore grades, water and geological problems, the failure
of equipment or processes to operate in accordance with specifications, failure to obtain financial assurance to meet closure and
remediation obligations, labor relations, litigation and environmental risks, as well as political and economic risk associated with
foreign operations. Results of operations are directly af fected by metal prices on commodity exchanges, which can be volatile.
5
Table of Contents
        Additional business information follows:
COPPER BUSINESS
        Copper is an important component in the world's infrastructure. It is the third most widely used metal, after iron and aluminum.
Copper has unique chemical and physical properties, including high ductility , malleability , thermal and electrical conductivity , and
resistance to corrosion that has made it a superior material for use in electrical and electronic products, including power transmission
and generation, which accounts for about three quarters of copper global use, telecommunications, building construction,
transportation and industrial machinery . Copper is also an important metal in non-electrical applications such as plumbing and roofing
and, when alloyed with zinc to form brass, in many industrial and consumer applications.
        Copper is an internationally traded commodity with prices principally determined by the major metal exchanges, the
Commodities Exchange, or "COMEX", in New York and the London Metal Exchange or "LME." Copper is usually found in nature in
association with sulfur . Pure copper metal is generally produced from a multistage process, beginning with the mining and
concentrating of low-grade ores containing copper sulfide minerals, and followed by smelting and electrolytic refining to produce a
pure copper cathode. An increasing share of copper is produced from acid leaching of oxidized ores. Copper is one of the oldest metals
ever used and has been one of the most important materials in the development of civilization.
BUSINESS REPOR TING SEGMENTS:
        Our management views Southern Copper as having three reportable segments and manages it on the basis of these segments.
        The three segments identified are groups of individual mines, each of which constitutes an operating segment with similar
economic characteristics, type of products, processes and support facilities, regulatory environments, employee bar gaining contracts
and currency risks. In addition, each mine within the individual group earns revenues from similar types of customers for their
products and services and each group incurs expenses independently , including commercial transactions between groups.
        Inter -segment sales are based on arm's length prices at the time of sale. These may not be reflective of actual prices realized by
the Company due to various factors, including additional processing, timing of sales to outside customers and transportation cost.
Added to the segment data is information regarding the Company's sales. The segments identified by the Company are:
1. Peruvian operations, which include the Toquepala and Cuajone mine complexes and the smelting and refining plants,
including a precious metals plant, industrial railroad and port facilities that service both mines. Sales of its products are
recorded as revenue of our Peruvian mines. The Peruvian operations produce copper , with production of by-products of
molybdenum, silver and other materials.
2. Mexican open-pit operations, which include the La Caridad and Buenavista mine complexes and the smelting and
refining plants, including a precious metals plant and a copper rod plant and support facilities that service both mines.
Sales of its products are recorded as revenue of our Mexican mines. The Mexican open-pit operations produce copper ,
with production of by-products of molybdenum, silver and other materials.
3. Mexican under ground mining operations, which include five under ground mines that produce zinc, copper , lead, silver
and gold, a coal mine that produces coal and coke, and a zinc refinery . This group is identified as the IMMSA  unit and
sales of its products are recorded as revenue of the IMMSA  unit.
6
Table of Contents
        Financial information is regularly prepared for each of the three segments and the results are reported to Senior management on a
segment basis. Senior management focuses on operating income and on total assets as measures of performance to evaluate dif ferent
segments and to make decisions to allocate resources to the reported segments. These are common measures in the mining industry .
        Segment information is included in Item 2 "Properties," under the captions—"Metal Production by Segments" and "Ore
Reserves." More information on business segment and segment financial information is included in Note 17 "Segment and Related
Information" of our consolidated financial statements.
CAPIT AL INVESTMENT  PROGRAM AND EXPLORA TION ACTIVITIES
        For a description of our capital investment program, see Item 7 "Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition
and Results of Operations—Capital Investment Program" and for our exploration activities, see Item 2 "Properties—Explorations
Activities."
PRINCIP AL PRODUCTS AND MARKETS
        Copper is primarily used in the building and construction industries, in the power generation and transmission industry , in
electrical and electronic products and, to a lesser extent, in industrial machinery and equipment, consumer products and in the
automotive and transportation industries. Molybdenum is used to toughen alloy steels and soften tungsten alloy and is also used in
fertilizers, dyes, enamels and reagents. Silver is used for photographic, electrical and electronic products and, to a lesser extent, in
brazing alloys and solder , jewelry , coinage, silverware and catalysts. Zinc is primarily used as a coating on iron and steel to protect
against corrosion and is also used to make die cast parts, in the manufacturing of batteries and in the form of sheets for architectural
purposes.
        Our marketing strategy and annual sales planning emphasize developing and maintaining long-term customer relationships. Thus
acquiring annual or other long-term contracts for the sale of our products is a high priority . Generally , 80% to 90% of our metal
production is sold under annual or longer -term contracts. Sales prices are determined based on the prevailing commodity prices for the
quotation period according to the terms of the contract.
        We focus on the ultimate end-user customers as opposed to selling on the spot market or to trading companies. In addition, we
devote significant marketing ef forts to diversifying our sales both by region and by customer base. We also strive to provide superior
customer service, including timely deliveries of our products. Our ability to consistently fulfill customer demand is supported by our
substantial production capacity .
        For additional information on sales please see "Revenue recognition" in Note 2 "Summary of Significant Accounting Policies"
and Note 17 "Segment and Related Information" of our consolidated financial statements.
MET ALS PRICES
        Prices for our products are principally a function of supply and demand and, with the exception of molybdenum, are established
on COMEX and LME. Prices for our molybdenum products are established by reference to the publication Platt's Metals Week. Our
contract prices also reflect any negotiated premiums and the costs of freight and other factors. From time to time, we have entered into
hedging transactions to provide partial protection against future decreases in the market price of metals and we may do so under
certain market conditions. For a further discussion of our products market prices, please see Item 7 "Management's Discussion and
Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations—Metal Prices."
7
Table of Contents
        The table below shows the high, low and average COMEX and LME per pound copper prices during the last 10 years:
        The per pound COMEX and LME copper price during the last 5 and 10 year periods averaged $2.71 and $3.03, respectively .
        The table below shows the high, low and average per -pound, except silver , which is per ounce, market prices for our three
principal by-products during the last 10 years:
        The per ounce COMEX silver price during the last 5 and 10 year periods averaged $16.90 and $20.95, respectively . The per
pound Platt's Metals Week Dealer Oxide molybdenum price during the last 5 and 10 year periods averaged $8.86 and $10.90,
respectively . The per pound LME zinc price during the last 5 and 10 year periods averaged $1.09 and $0.99, respectively .
8  Copper  (COMEX)  Copper  (LME)  
Year  High  Low  Average  High  Low  Average  
2009   3.33  1.38  2.35  3.33  1.38  2.34 
2010   4.44  2.76  3.43  4.42  2.76  3.42 
2011   4.62  3.05  4.01  4.60  3.08  4.00 
2012   3.97  3.28  3.61  3.93  3.29  3.61 
2013   3.78  3.03  3.34  3.74  3.01  3.32 
2014   3.43  2.84  3.12  3.37  2.86  3.11 
2015   2.95  2.02  2.51  2.92  2.05  2.50 
2016   2.69  1.94  2.20  2.69  1.96  2.21 
2017   3.29  2.48  2.80  3.27  2.48  2.80 
2018—1st Q   3.24  2.96  3.14  3.27  2.95  3.16 
2018—2nd Q   3.29  2.95  3.09  3.29  3.01  3.12 
2018—3rd Q   2.93  2.56  2.73  2.99  2.64  2.77 
2018—4th Q   2.82  2.63  2.74  2.87  2.69  2.80 
2018   3.29  2.56  2.93  3.29  2.64  2.96 
  Silver  (COMEX)  Molybdenum (Dealer
Oxide Platt's
Metals Week)  Zinc (LME)  
Year  High  Low  Average  High  Low  Average  High  Low  Average  
2009   19.30   10.42   14.67   18.00   7.83  10.91   1.17  0.48  0.75 
2010   30.91   14.82   20.18   18.60   11.75  15.60   1.14  0.72  0.98 
2011   48.58   26.81   35.18   17.88   12.70   15.33   1.15  0.79  0.99 
2012   37.14   26.25   31.19   14.80   10.90   12.62   0.99  0.80  0.88 
2013   32.41   18.53   23.82   11.95  9.12  10.26   0.99  0.81  0.87 
2014   22.05   15.39   19.04   15.05   8.75  11.30  1.10  0.88  0.98 
2015   18.35   13.67   15.68   9.40  4.30  6.59  1.09  0.66  0.88 
2016   20.67   13.74   17.10   8.60  5.10  6.42  1.32  0.73  0.95 
2017   18.49   15.37   17.03   10.25   6.85  8.13  1.53  1.00  1.31 
2018—
1st Q   17.55   16.12   16.68   13.00   10.70   12.14   1.64  1.06  1.55 
2018—
2nd Q   17.23   15.95   16.50   12.58   10.60   11.55  1.49  1.31  1.41 
2018—
3rd Q   16.05   14.04   14.92   12.60   10.63   11.74  1.32  1.04  1.15 
2018—
4th Q   15.43   13.95   14.51   12.38   11.80  11.99  1.24  1.14  1.19 
2018   17.55   13.95   15.65   13.00   10.60   11.86  1.64  1.04  1.33 
Table of Contents
COMPETITIVE CONDITIONS
        Competition in the copper market is based primarily on price and service basis, with price being the most important factor when
supplies of copper are ample. Our products compete with other materials, including aluminum and plastics. For additional information,
see Item 1A  "Risk Factors—The copper mining industry is highly competitive."
LABOR FORCE
        As of December 31, 2018, we had 13,899 employees, approximately 74% of whom are unionized and represented by nine
different labor unions. Despite the three strikes in 2017 at our Peruvian operations, we believe the Company has a positive labor
environment in our operations in Mexico and Peru, which is allowing us to increase productivity as well as helping us achieve the
goals of our capital expansion program.
Peru
        75% of our 4,850 Peruvian employees were unionized at December 31, 2018. Currently , there are six separate unions, one lar ge
union and five smaller unions. In the first quarter of 2016, the Company signed three-year agreements with all the existing unions at
that time. These agreements included, among other things, annual salary increases of 5% for each of the three years.
        In June 2018, the Company signed a three-year collective bar gaining agreement with one of the smaller unions. This agreement
includes, among other things, annual salary increases of 5% for each year starting September 2018, and a signing bonus of S/ 45,000
(approximately $13,600) which was recorded as labor expense.
        In August 2018, the Company signed a three-year collective bar gaining agreement with three additional unions. This agreement
includes, among other things, annual salary increases of 5% for each year starting December 2018, and a signing bonus of S/ 45,000
(approximately $13,600) which was recorded as labor expense.
        As of December 31, 2018, the Company continues negotiations on collective bar gaining agreements with the two unsigned
unions.
        Employees of the Toquepala and Cuajone units reside in townsites, where we have built 3,700 houses and apartments. We also
have 90 houses at Ilo for staf f personnel. Housing, together with maintenance and utility services, is provided at minimal cost to most
of our employees. Our townsite and housing complexes include schools, medical facilities, churches, social clubs and recreational
facilities. We also provide shopping, banking and other services at the townsites.
Mexico
        74% of our 9,002 Mexican employees were unionized at December 31, 2018, represented by three separate unions. Under
Mexican law , the terms of employment for unionized workers are set forth in collective bar gaining agreements. Mexican companies
negotiate the salary provisions of collective bar gaining agreements with the labor unions annually and negotiate other benefits every
two years. We conduct negotiations separately at each mining complex and each processing plant.
        Our Taxco mine in Mexico has been on strike since July 2007. For a discussion of labor matters, refer to the information
contained under the caption "Labor matters" in Note 12 "Commitments and Contingencies" of the consolidated financial statements.
        Employees of La Caridad and Buenavista units reside in townsites at Nacozari and Cananea, where we have built approximately
2,000 houses and 275 apartments. Most of the employees of the IMMSA  unit reside on the grounds of the mining or processing
complexes in which they work and
9
Table of Contents
where we have built approximately 900 houses and apartments. Housing, together with maintenance and utility services, is provided at
minimal cost to most of our employees. Our townsites and housing complexes include educational and medical facilities, churches,
social clubs, shopping centers, banking and other services. Through 2007, the Buenavista unit provided health care services to
employees and retired unionized employees and their families through its own hospital at the Buenavista unit. In 2010, the Company
signed an agreement with the Secretary of Health of the State of Sonora to provide these services to its retired workers and their
families. The new workers of Buenavista receive health services through the Mexican Institute of Social Security as is the case for all
Mexican workers.
FUEL, ELECTRICITY  AND WATER SUPPLIES
        The principal raw materials used in our operations are fuel, electricity and water . We use natural gas to power boilers and
generators, and for metallur gical processes at our Mexican operations and diesel fuel to power mining equipment. We believe that
sources of fuel, electricity and water are readily available. The prices of these raw materials may fluctuate outside of our control,
therefore we focus our ef forts to reduce these costs through cost and ener gy saving measures.
        Ener gy is the principal cost in mining, so the concern for its conservation and ef ficient usage is critical. We have ener gy
management committees at most of our mines, which meet periodically to discuss consumption and to develop measures directed at
saving ener gy. Also, alternative sources are being analyzed at the corporate level, from both traditional and renewable ener gy sources.
This has helped us to develop a culture of ener gy conservation directed at the sustainability of our operations.
Peru:
        Fuel:     In Peru, we obtain fuel primarily from local companies. The Company believes that adequate supplies of fuel are available
in Peru.
        Electricity:     In June 2014, we entered into a power purchase agreement for 120 megawatt ("MW") with the state company
Electroperu S.A., which began supplying ener gy for our Peruvian operations for twenty years starting on April 17, 2017. In July 2014,
we entered into a power purchase agreement for 120MW  with a private power generator Kallpa Generacion S.A. ("Kallpa"), which
began supplying ener gy to our Peruvian operations for ten years starting on April 17, 2017. In May 2016, we signed an additional
power purchase agreement for a maximum of 80MW  with Kallpa, under which Kallpa will supply ener gy for the operations related to
the Toquepala Expansion and other minor projects for ten years starting on May 1, 2017 and ending after ten years of commercial
operation of the Toquepala Expansion or on April 30, 2029; whichever occurs first. In addition, we feel confident that additional power
can be obtained from the Peruvian national grid, should the need arise.
        Additionally , we have nine megawatts of power generation capacity from two small hydro-generating installations at Cuajone.
Power is distributed over a 224-kilometer closed loop transmission circuit, which is interconnected with the Peruvian network.
        Water:    We have water rights or licenses for up to 1,950 liters per second from well fields at the Huaitire, Vizcachas and Titijones
aquifers and surface water rights from the Suches lake and two small water courses, Quebrada Honda and Quebrada Tacalaya. We
believe these water sources are suf ficient to supply the needs of our operating units at Toquepala and Cuajone, including the Toquepala
expansion. At Ilo, we have two desalination plants that produce water for industrial use and domestic consumption that we believe are
sufficient for our current and projected needs.
Mexico:
        Fuel:     In Mexico, since 2018, we have purchased fuel from Petroleos Mexicanos ("PEMEX"), the state producer , and from
private suppliers.
10
Table of Contents
        The La Caridad unit imports natural gas from the United States through its pipeline (between Douglas, Arizona and Nacozari,
Sonora), which allows us to import natural gas from the United States at market prices and thereby reduce operating costs. Several
contracts with PEMEX and the United States provide us with the option of using a monthly or daily fixed price for our natural gas
purchases.
        Natural gas is used for metallur gical processes, to power furnaces, converters, casting wheels, boilers and electric generators.
Diesel oil is a backup for all these uses. We use diesel oil to power mining equipment at our operations.
        Electricity:     Electricity is used as the main ener gy source at our mining complexes. We purchase most of our electricity from
Mexico Generadora de Ener gia S. de R. L. ("MGE"), a subsidiary of Grupo Mexico which has two power plants designed to supply
power to La Caridad and Buenavista units. MGE is supplying 17% of its power output to third party ener gy users. These plants are
natural gas-fired combined cycle power generating units, with a net total capacity of 516.2 megawatts. In 2012, we entered into a
power supply agreement with MGE through 2032. The first plant was completed in 2013 and the second was completed in the second
quarter of 2014. The first plant began to supply power to the Company in December 2013, and the second plant began to supply power
in June 2015.
        We also purchase electricity from the Comision Federal de Electricidad  (the Federal Electricity Commission or the "CFE"), the
state's electrical power producer . In addition, we recover some ener gy from waste heat boilers at the La Caridad smelter . Accordingly , a
significant portion of our operating costs in Mexico is dependent upon the pricing policies of CFE, as well as PEMEX, which reflect
government policy , as well as international market prices for crude oil, natural gas and conditions in the refinery markets.
        Some mining operations of IMMSA  also purchase electricity from Eolica el Retiro, S.A.P .I de C.V . ("Eolica"), a windfarm ener gy
producer that is an indirect subsidiary of Grupo Mexico. In August 2013, IMMSA  and other of the mining operations of the Company
entered into a purchase agreement and in late 2014 started to purchase electricity from Eolica. Due to the nature of the production
process there is not a fixed power capacity contracted. In 2018, the total purchases were approximately 41.7 million kilowatt hours.
        Water:    In Mexico, water is deemed a public property and industries not connected to a public service water supply must obtain a
water concession from Comision Nacional del Agua  (the National Water Commission or the "CNA"). Water usage fees are established
in the Ley Federal de Der echos  (the Federal Rights Law), which distinguishes several availability zones with dif ferent fees per unit of
volume according to each zone, with the exception of Mexicana de Cobre. All of our operations have one or several water concessions
and pump out the required water from wells. Mexicana de Cobre pumps water from the La Angostura dam, which is close to the mine
and plants. At our Buenavista facility , we maintain our own wells and pay the CNA  for water usage. Water conservation committees
have been established in each plant in order to conserve and recycle water . Water usage fees are updated on a yearly basis and have
been increasing in recent years.
ENVIRONMENT AL MATTERS
        For a discussion of environmental matters reference is made to the information contained under the caption "Environmental
matters" in Note 12 "Commitments and Contingencies" of the consolidated financial statements.
11
Table of Contents
MINING RIGHTS AND CONCESSIONS
Peru:
        We have 125,700 hectares in concessions from the Peruvian government for our exploration, exploitation, extraction and
production operations, at various sites, as follows:
        We believe that our Peruvian concessions are in full force and in ef fect under applicable Peruvian laws and that we are in
compliance with all material terms and requirements applicable to these concessions. The concessions have indefinite terms, subject to
our payment of concession fees of up to $3.00 per hectare annually for the mining concessions and a fee based on nominal capacity for
the processing concessions. Fees paid during 2018, 2017 and 2016, were approximately $1.5 million, $1.2 million and $1.3 million,
respectively . We have two types of mining concessions in Peru: metallic and non-metallic concessions.
        In 201 1, the Peruvian Congress approved an amendment to the mining royalty char ge. The new mining royalty char ge is based on
operating income mar gins with graduated rates ranging from 1% to 12% of operating profits, with a minimum royalty char ge assessed
at 1% of net sales. If the operating income mar gin is 10% or less, the royalty char ge is 1% and for each 5% increment in the operating
income mar gin, the royalty char ge rate increases by 0.75%, up to a maximum of 12%. In 2018, 2017 and 2016, we made provisions of
$32.9 million, $23.4 million and $16.8 million, respectively .
        At the same time the Peruvian Congress amended the mining royalty char ge, it enacted a new tax for the mining industry . This tax
is also based on operating income and its rates range from 2% to 8.4%. For additional information see Note 7 "Income Taxes" to the
consolidated financial statements.
Mexico:
        In Mexico we have 534,400 hectares in concessions from the Mexican government for our exploration and exploitation activities
as outlined on the table below .
        We believe that our Mexican concessions are in full force and in ef fect under applicable Mexican laws and that we are in
compliance with all material terms and requirements applicable to these concessions. Under Mexican law , mineral resources belong to
the Mexican nation and a concession from the Mexican federal government is required to explore or mine mineral reserves. Mining
concessions have a 50-year term that can be renewed for another 50 years. Holding fees for mining concessions can be from $0.36 to
$7.82 per hectare depending on the beginning date of the mining concession. Fees paid during 2018, 2017 and 2016 were
approximately $6.3 million, $5.8 million and $5.4 million, respectively . In addition, all of our operating units in Mexico have water
concessions that are in full force and ef fect. Although ownership is not required in order to explore or mine a concession, we generally
own the land related to our Mexican concessions. We also own all of the processing facilities of our Mexican operations and the land
on which they are constructed.
        In December 2013, the Mexican government enacted a new law which, among other things, established a mining royalty char ge
of 7.5% on earnings before taxes as defined by Mexican tax regulations and an additional royalty char ge of 0.5% over gross income
from sales of gold, silver and platinum. These char ges were ef fective January 2014 and are deductible for income tax purposes.
12  Toquepala  Cuajone  Ilo  Other  Total  
  (hectar es)  
Plants   360  919  421  —  1,700  
Operations   23,781   21,555   4,483   36,559   86,378  
Exploration   —  —  —  37,622   37,622  
                 
Total   24,141   22,474   4,904   74,181   125,700  
                                  
                 
  IMMSA  La Caridad  Buenavista  Projects  Total  
  (hectar es)  
Mine concessions   188,899   103,821   93,706   147,974   534,400  
Table of Contents
ITEM 1A.    RISK F ACT ORS
        Every investor or potential investor in Southern Copper Corporation should carefully consider the following risk factors.
Financial risks
Our financial performance is highly dependent on the price of copper and the other metals we produce.
        Our financial performance is significantly af fected by the market prices of the metals that we produce, particularly the market
prices of copper , molybdenum, zinc and silver . Historically , these prices have been subject to wide fluctuations and are af fected by
numerous factors out of our control, including international economic and political conditions, levels of supply and demand, the
availability and costs of substitutes, inventory levels maintained by users, actions of participants in the commodities markets and
currency exchange rates. In addition, the market prices of copper and certain other metals have on occasion been subject to rapid short-
term changes.
        In the last three years, approximately 80% of our revenues came from the sale of copper , 6% from molybdenum and 10% from
silver and zinc. Please see the distribution of our revenues per product on Item 7 "Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial
Condition and Results of Operations" caption "Results of operations—net sales" on page 79.
        See also historical average price of our products on Item 1 Business caption "Metals prices".
        We cannot speculate whether metals prices will rise or fall in the future. Future declines in metals prices, and in particular copper ,
will have an adverse impact on our results of operations and financial condition. In very adverse market conditions, we might consider
curtailing or modifying some of our mining and processing operations.
Our business requires levels of capital investments which we may not be able to maintain.
        Our business is capital intensive. Specifically , the exploration and exploitation of copper and other metal reserves, mining,
smelting and refining costs, the maintenance of machinery and equipment and compliance with laws and regulations require significant
capital investments. We must continue to invest capital to maintain or increase the amount of copper reserves that we exploit and the
amount of copper and other metals we produce. We cannot assure you that we will be able to maintain our production levels to
generate suf ficient cash, or that we have access to suf ficient financing to continue our exploration, exploitation and refining activities
at or above present levels.
Restrictive covenants in the agreements governing our indebtedness and the indebtedness of our Minera Mexico subsidiary may
restrict our ability to pursue our business strategies.
        Our financing instruments and those of our Minera Mexico subsidiary include financial and other restrictive covenants that,
among other things, limit our and Minera Mexico's abilities to incur additional debt and sell assets. If either we or our Minera Mexico
subsidiary do not comply with these obligations, we could be in default under the applicable agreements which, if not addressed or
waived, could require repayment of the indebtedness immediately . Our Minera Mexico subsidiary is further limited by the terms of its
outstanding notes, which also restrict the Company's applicable incurrence of debt and liens. In addition, future credit facilities may
contain limitations on our incurrence of additional debt and liens, on our ability to dispose of assets, or on our ability to pay dividends
to our common stockholders.
13
Table of Contents
We may not pay a significant amount of our net income as cash dividends on our common stock in the future.
        We distributed a significant amount of our net income as dividends since 1996. Our dividend practice is subject to change at the
discretion of our Board of Directors at any time. The amount that we pay in dividends is subject to a number of factors, including our
results of operations, financial condition, cash requirements, tax considerations, future prospects, legal restrictions, contractual
restrictions in credit agreements, limitations imposed by the government of Peru, Mexico or other countries where we have significant
operations and other factors that our Board of Directors may deem relevant. In light of our capital investment program and global
economic conditions, it is possible that future dividend distributions will be reduced from the levels of recent years.
Our ability to recognize the benefits of deferred tax assets is dependent on future cash flows and taxable income.
        Through 2018, the Company recognized the expected future tax benefit from deferred tax assets when the tax benefit was
considered to be more likely than not of being realized, otherwise, a valuation allowance was applied against deferred tax assets.
Assessing the recoverability of deferred tax assets requires management to make significant estimates related to expectations of future
taxable income and existing tax laws and there can be no assurance that the Company will be able to recognize the expected future
benefits of deferred tax assets; such inability could have a material adverse ef fect on the Company's results of operations. For more
information on the ef fects of U.S. Tax Reform, please see Note 7 "Income Taxes".
Operational risks
Our actual reserves may not conform to our current estimates of our ore deposits and we depend on our ability to replenish ore
reserves for our long-term viability .
        There is a degree of uncertainty attributable to the calculation of reserves. Until reserves are actually mined and processed, the
quantity of ore and grades must be considered as estimates only . The proven and probable ore reserves data included in this report are
estimates prepared by us based on evaluation methods generally used in the mining industry . We may be required in the future to revise
our reserves estimates based on our actual production. We cannot assure you that our actual reserves conform to geological,
metallur gical or other expectations or that the estimated volume and grade of ore will be recovered. Market prices of our metals,
increased production costs, reduced recovery rates, short-term operating factors, royalty char ges and other factors may render proven
and probable reserves uneconomic to exploit and may result in revisions of reserves data from time to time. Reserves data are not
indicative of future results of operations. Our reserves are depleted as we mine. We depend on our ability to replenish our ore reserves
for our long-term viability . We use several strategies to replenish and increase our ore reserves, including exploration and investment
in properties located near our existing mine sites and investing in technology that could extend the life of a mine by allowing us to
cost-ef fectively process ore types that were previously considered uneconomic. Acquisitions may also contribute to increase ore
reserves and we review potential acquisition opportunities on a regular basis. However , we cannot assure you that we will be able to
continue with our strategy to replenish reserves indefinitely .
Our operations are subject to risks, some of which are not insurable.
        The business of mining, smelting and refining copper , zinc and other metals is subject to a number of risks and hazards, including
industrial accidents, labor disputes, unusual or unexpected geological conditions, changes in the regulatory environment,
environmental hazards, weather and other natural phenomena, such as seismic activity , wall failures and rock slides in our open-pit
mines, structural
14
Table of Contents
collapses of our under ground mines or tailings impoundments, and lower than expected ore grades or recovery rates. The Company's
operations may also be af fected by mudslides and flash floods caused by torrential rains.
        Such occurrences could result in damage to, or destruction of, mining operations resulting in monetary losses and possible legal
liability . In particular , surface and under ground mining and related processing activities present inherent risks of injury to personnel,
loss of life and damage to equipment.
        The waste rock and tailings produced in our mining operations represent our lar gest volume of waste material. Managing the
volume of waste rock and tailings presents significant environmental, safety and engineering challenges and risks. We maintain lar ge
tailings impoundments containing sand of ground rock, moistened with water , which are ef fectively lar ge dams that must be
engineered, constructed and monitored to assure structural stability and avoid leakages or structural collapse. The failure of tailings
and other impoundments at any of our mining operations could cause severe property and environmental damage and loss of life. The
importance of careful design, management and monitoring of lar ge impoundments was emphasized in recent years by lar ge scale
tailings dam failures at unaf filiated mines, which caused extensive property and environmental damage and resulted in the loss of life.
For more information regarding our tailing dams, please see Item 2 "Properties—Slope Stability—T ailing Dams."
        We maintain insurance against many of these and other risks, which in certain circumstances may not provide adequate coverage.
Insurance against certain risks, including certain liabilities for environmental damage or hazards as a result of exploration and
production, is not generally available to us or other companies within the mining industry . Nevertheless recent environmental legal
initiatives have considered future regulations regarding environmental damage insurance. In case such regulations come into force, we
will have to analyze the need to obtain such insurance. We do not have, and do not intend to obtain, political risk insurance. We cannot
assure you that these and other uninsured events will not have an adverse ef fect on our business, properties, operating results, financial
condition or prospects.
Changes in the demand level for our products and copper sales agreements could adversely af fect our revenues.
        Our financial results are subject to fluctuations on the level of industrial and consumer demand for the refined, semi-refined metal
products and concentrates we sell, as well as global economic slow-downs or recessions. Also, changes in technology , industrial
processes, concerns over weaknesses in the global economy and consumer habits may af fect the level of demand to the extent that
those increase or decrease the need for our metal products. Likewise, our revenues could be adversely af fected by events of force
majeure that could have a negative impact on our sales agreements. These events include acts of nature, labor strikes, fires, floods,
wars, transportation delays, government actions or other events that are beyond the control of the parties of the agreement.
Interruptions of energy supply or increases in energy costs, shortages of water supply , critical parts, equipment, skilled labor and
other production costs may adversely af fect our results of operations.
        We require substantial amounts of fuel oil, electricity , water and other resources for our operations. Fuel, gas and power costs
constituted approximately 29%, 31% and 30% of our total production cost in 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively . We rely upon third
parties for our supply of the ener gy resources consumed in our operations so that prices for and availability of ener gy resources may be
subject to change or curtailment, due to, among other things, new laws or regulations, imposition of new taxes or tarif fs, interruptions
in production by suppliers, worldwide price levels and market conditions. Regarding water consumption, although each operation
currently has suf ficient water rights to cover its operational demands, the loss of some or all water rights for any of our mines or
15
Table of Contents
operations, in whole or in part, or shortages of water to which we have rights could require us to curtail or shut down mining
production and could prevent us from pursuing expansion opportunities. In addition, future shortages of critical parts, equipment and
skilled labor could adversely af fect our operations and development projects.
Our Company is subject to health and safety laws which may restrict our operations, result in operational delays or increase our
operating costs and adversely af fect our financial results of operations.
        We are required to comply with occupational health and safety laws and regulations in Peru and Mexico where our operations are
subject to periodic inspections by the relevant governmental authorities. These laws and regulations govern, among others, health and
safety work place conditions, including high risk labor and the handling, storage and disposal of chemical and other hazardous
substances. We believe our operations are in compliance in all material respects with applicable health and safety laws and regulations
in the countries in which we operate. Compliance with these laws and regulations and new or existing regulations that may be
applicable to us in the future could increase our operating costs and adversely af fect our financial results of operations and cash flows.
        Our ef forts are focused on the health and safety of our workforce in order to consistently improve performance and compliance
through the implementation of occupational health programs, adequate training and safety incentives at our operations. Despite the
Company's ef forts, we are not exempt from accidents. These are reported to Mexican and Peruvian authorities as required. Regarding
non-fatal accidents, in the last three years, the Company's Dart rate (rate to measure workplace injuries severe enough to warrant Day
Away from work, job Restrictions and/or job Transfers) was much lower than the MSHA  Dart rate (the MSHA  Dart rate is published
by the U.S.'s Mine Safety and Health Administration, and is used as an industry benchmark).
        In 2018, we did not have fatalities; but in 2017 and 2016 we had two and six fatalities, respectively , in Mexico and Peru. The
amounts paid to the Mexican and Peruvian authorities for reportable accidents did not have an adverse ef fect on our results. Under
Mexican and Peruvian law penalties and fines for safety violations are generally monetary , but in certain cases may lead to the
temporary or permanent shutdown of the af fected facility or the suspension or revocation of permits or licenses. Also, violations of
security and safety laws and regulations in our Peruvian operations can be considered a crime, punishable with a sentence of up to
10 years of prison.
Our metals exploration ef forts are highly speculative in nature and may be unsuccessful.
        Metals exploration is highly speculative in nature. It involves many risks and is frequently unsuccessful. Once mineralization is
discovered, it may take a number of years from the initial phases of drilling until production is possible, during which time the
economic feasibility of production may change. Substantial expenditures are required to establish proven and probable ore reserves
through drilling, to determine metallur gical processes to extract the metals from the ore and, in the case of new properties, to construct
mining and processing facilities. We cannot assure you that our exploration programs will result in the expansion or replacement of
current production with new proven and probable ore reserves.
        Development projects have no operating history upon which we can base estimates of proven and probable ore reserves and
estimates of future cash operating costs. Estimates are, to a lar ge extent, based upon the interpretation of geological data obtained from
drill holes and other sampling techniques, and feasibility studies that derive estimates of cash operating costs based upon anticipated
tonnage and grades of ore to be mined and processed, the configuration of the ore body , expected recovery rates of the mineral from
the ore, comparable facility and equipment operating costs, anticipated climatic conditions and other factors. As a result, actual cash
operating costs and economic returns based upon development of proven and probable ore reserves may dif fer significantly from
16
Table of Contents
those originally estimated. Moreover , significant decreases in actual or expected prices may mean reserves, once found, will be
uneconomical to produce.
We may be adversely af fected by challenges relating to slope stability .
        Our open-pit mines get deeper as we mine them, presenting certain geotechnical challenges including the possibility of slope
failure. If we are required to decrease pit slope angles or provide additional road access to prevent such a failure, our stated reserves
could be negatively af fected. Furthermore, hydrological conditions relating to pit slopes, renewal of material displaced by slope
failures and increased stripping requirements could also negatively af fect our stated reserves. We have taken actions in order to
maintain slope stability , but we cannot assure you that we will not have to take additional action in the future or that our actions taken
to date will be suf ficient. Unexpected failure or additional requirements to prevent slope failure may negatively af fect our results of
operations and financial condition, as well as have the ef fect of diminishing our stated ore reserves.
We may be adversely af fected by labor disputes.
        In the last several years we have experienced a number of strikes or other labor disruptions that have had an adverse impact on
our operations and operating results. As of December 31, 2018, unions represented approximately 74% of our workforce. Currently ,
we have labor agreements in ef fect for our Mexican and Peruvian operations.
        During 2017, the Unified Labor Union of SPCC workers and one of Toquepala's unions held three separate strikes. The Company
estimates that the loss of copper production resulting from the 2017 strikes was not significant and our sales contracts were not
affected.
        Our Taxco mine in Mexico has been on strike since July 2007. It is expected that operations at this mine will remain suspended
until these labor issues are resolved. In addition, the workers of the San Martin mine were on strike from July 2007 to August 2018 and
the Company is now working on a rehabilitation plan to restart operations at the San Martin mine with a budget of $77 million. For
additional information, see Item 2, "Properties—Mexican IMMSA  Unit—San Martin and Taxco", and Note 12, "Commitments and
Contingencies—Labor matters", to our consolidated financial statements.
        We cannot assure you when the pending strike will be settled, or that in the future we will not experience strikes or other labor
related work stoppages that could have a material adverse ef fect on our financial condition and results of operations.
Our mining or metal production projects may be subject to additional costs due to community actions and other factors.
        In recent years, worldwide mining activity has been pressured by neighboring communities for financial commitments to fund
social benefit programs and infrastructure improvements. Our projects in Peru are not exempt from these pressures. Our Tia Maria
project in Peru has experienced delays while trying to resolve issues with community groups.
        It appears that it is becoming a part of the Peruvian mining environment that in order to obtain acceptance from local
communities for projects in their localities, demands for substantial investments in community infrastructure and upgrades must be met
in order to proceed with the mining projects.
        We are confident that we will move forward with the Tia Maria project. However , we cannot assure you when and that we will not
continue to incur additional costs for community infrastructure and upgrades in order to obtain the approval of current or future mining
projects.
        In addition, there are a number of collective action lawsuits and civil action lawsuits, filed against the Company in Mexico´s
federal courts and the state courts of Sonora. A number of constitutional
17
Table of Contents
lawsuits have also been filed against various governmental authorities and against the Company . These lawsuits are seeking damages
and requesting remedial actions to restore the environment. The Company believes that it is not possible to determine the extent of the
damages sought and considers the lawsuits without merit. However the Company cannot of fer any assurances that the outcome of
these lawsuits will not have an adverse ef fect on the Company .
Environmental, regulatory response to climate change, and other regulations may increase our costs of doing business, restrict our
operations or result in operational delays.
        Our exploration, mining, milling, smelting and refining activities are subject to a number of Peruvian and Mexican laws and
regulations, including environmental laws and regulations, and certain industry technical standards. Additional matters subject to
regulation include, but are not limited to, concession fees, transportation, production, water use and dischar ge, power use and
generation, use and storage of explosives, surface rights, housing and other facilities for workers, reclamation, taxation, labor
standards, mine safety and occupational health.
        Environmental regulations in Peru and Mexico have become increasingly stringent over the last decade and we have been
required to dedicate more time and money to compliance and remediation activities. Furthermore, the Mexican authorities have
become more rigorous and strict in enforcing Mexican environmental laws. We expect additional laws and regulations will be enacted
over time with respect to environmental matters.
        Please refer to Note 12 "Commitments and Contingencies—Environmental matters" of our financial statements for further
information on this subject.
        The potential physical impacts of climate change on our operations are highly uncertain, and would be particular to the
geographic location of our facilities. These may include changes in rainfall patterns, water shortages, changing sea levels, changing
storm patterns and intensities, and changing temperatures. These ef fects may adversely impact the cost, production and financial
performance of our operations.
        We are aware of fluctuations in weather patterns in the areas where we operate. Aligned with government ef forts, we are working
in measuring its carbon footprint in order to reduce any contribution to greenhouse gases generated by our operations. Similarly , we
evaluate our water demand, as weather changes may result in increase/decrease scenarios that af fect our needs.
        The development of more stringent environmental protection programs in Peru and Mexico and in relevant trade agreements
could impose constraints and additional costs on our operations requiring us to make significant investments in the future. We cannot
assure you that current or future legislative, regulatory or trade developments will not have an adverse ef fect on our business,
properties, operating results, financial condition or prospects.
Our mining and metal production projects may subject us to new risks.
        Our Company is in the midst of a lar ge expansion program, which may subject us to additional risks of industrial accidents. While
we believe our contractors employ safety standards and other procedures to ensure these projects are completed with proper
governance, it is possible that the increased activity occurring at our sites could cause accidents of an environmental nature or danger
to human life.
        In August 2014, our new SX-EW  plant in Mexico had an industrial accident caused by a rock slide, coupled with a construction
defect in the seal of a pipe at the new leaching system containment dam, which caused a spill of copper sulfate solution into the
Bacanuchi River , a tributary of the Sonora River . As a result of this accident the Company absorbed char ges of $126.2 million through
2017. While this is an unusual event in the Company's history , we cannot of fer assurance that an accident
18
Table of Contents
related to our project development program will not occur again in the future and cause environmental damage or damage that causes
harm or loss of life.
Our business depends upon information technology systems which may be adversely af fected by disruptions, damage, failure and
risks associated with implementation and integration.
        Our operations depend upon information technology systems which may be subject to disruption, damage or failure from dif ferent
sources, including, without limitation, installation of malicious software, computer viruses, security breaches, cyber -attacks and
defects in design. In recent years, cybersecurity incidents have increased in frequency and include, but are not limited to, malicious
software, attempts to gain unauthorized access to data and other electronic security breaches that could lead to disruptions in systems,
unauthorized release of confidential or otherwise protected information and the corruption of data.
        However , given the unpredictability of the timing, nature and scope of information technology disruptions, we could potentially
be subject to manipulation or improper use of our systems and networks, operational delays, the compromising of confidential or
otherwise protected information, destruction or corruption of data, security breaches, financial losses from remedial actions, any of
which could have a material adverse ef fect on our cash flows, competitive position, financial condition or results of operations.
Other  risks
Applicable law restricts the payment of dividends from our Minera Mexico subsidiary to us.
        Our subsidiary , Minera Mexico, is a Mexican company and, as such, may pay dividends only out of net income that has been
approved by the shareholders. Shareholders must also approve the actual dividend payment, after mandatory legal reserves have been
created and losses for prior fiscal years have been satisfied. These legal constraints may limit the ability of Minera Mexico to pay
dividends to us, which in turn, may have an impact on our ability to pay stockholder dividends or to service debt.
Global and local market conditions, including the high competitiveness in the copper mining industry , may adversely af fect our
profitability .
        Our industry is cyclical by nature and fluctuates with economic cycles. Therefore, we are subject to the risks arising from adverse
changes in domestic and global economic and political conditions, such as lower levels of consumer and corporate confidence,
decreased business investment, increased unemployment, reduced income and asset values in many areas, currency volatility and
limited availability of credit and access to capital. Additionally , we face competition from other copper mining and producing
companies around the world; significant competition exists to acquire properties producing or capable of producing copper and other
metals as well as consolidation among some of our main competitors that make them more diversified than we are.
        We cannot assure you that changes in market conditions, including competition, will not adversely af fect us to compete in the
future on the basis of price or other factors with companies that may benefit from future favorable trading or other arrangements.
We are controlled by Grupo Mexico, which exercises control over our af fairs and policies and whose interests may be dif ferent
from yours.
        At December 31, 2018, Grupo Mexico owned indirectly 88.9% of our capital stock. Certain of our and Minera Mexico's of ficers
and directors are also directors and/or of ficers of Grupo Mexico and/or of its af filiates. We cannot assure you that the interests of
Grupo Mexico will not conflict with our minority stockholders.
19
Table of Contents
        Grupo Mexico has the ability to determine the outcome of substantially all matters submitted for a vote to our stockholders and
thus exercises control over our business policies and af fairs, including the following:
• the composition of our Board of Directors and, as a result, any determinations of our Board with respect to our business
direction and policy , including the appointment and removal of our of ficers;
• determinations with respect to mer gers and other business combinations, including those that may result in a change of
control;
• whether dividends are paid or other distributions are made and the amount of any dividends or other distributions;
• sales and dispositions of our assets;
• the amount of debt financing that we incur; and
• the approval of capital projects.
        We cannot assure you that increased financial obligations of Grupo Mexico or AMC resulting from financings or for other reasons
will not result in our parent corporations obtaining loans, increased dividends or other funding from us.
        In addition, we have in the past engaged in, and expect to continue to engage in, transactions with Grupo Mexico and its other
affiliates which are related party transactions and may present conflicts of interest. For additional information regarding the share
ownership of, and our relationships with, Grupo Mexico and its af filiates, see Note 16 "Related Party Transactions."
Unanticipated litigation or negative developments in pending litigation or with respect to other contingencies may adversely af fect
our financial condition and results of operations.
        We are currently , and may in the future become, subject to litigation, arbitration or other legal proceedings with other parties. If
decided adversely to the Company , these legal proceedings, or others that could be brought against us in the future, may adversely
affect our financial position or prospects. For further detailed discussion of pending litigation, please see Note 12 "Commitment and
Contingencies—Litigation matters".
Developments in the United States, Europe and emerging market countries may adversely af fect the Company business, our
common stock price and our debt securities .
        The business and market value of securities of companies with significant operations in Peru and Mexico is, to varying degrees,
affected by the economic policies and market conditions in the United States, Europe and emer ging market countries. Although
economic policies and conditions in such countries may significantly dif fer from economic conditions in Peru or Mexico, as the case
may be, the business community reactions to developments in any of these countries may adversely ef fect the Company business or
the market value or trading price of the securities, including debt securities, of issuers that have significant operations in Peru or
Mexico.
        In addition, in recent years economic conditions in Mexico have increasingly become correlated to U.S. economic conditions.
Therefore, changes in economic policies and conditions in the United States could also have a significant adverse ef fect on Mexican
economic conditions, af fecting our business, the price of our common stock or debt securities. In 2017, the United States, Canada and
Mexico began a discussion leading towards an update of the North American Free Trade Agreement ("NAFT A"). In September 2018,
the three countries reached an agreement on a new trade deal, which will be known
20
Table of Contents
as the United States—Mexico—Canada Agreement ("USMCA"). This was signed in November 2018 and is pending approval by the
legislatures of each country .
        In addition, rising trade tensions between the U.S. and China and ef forts by the Chinese government to reduce debt levels
contributed to a recent slowdown in China's growth. A continued slowing in China's economic growth and copper demand and
continued trade tensions between the U.S. and China could result in lower copper prices which could have a material adverse impact
on our business and results of operations. The adoption and expansion of trade restrictions, changes in the state of China-U.S.
relations, including the current trade tensions, or other governmental action related to tarif fs or trade agreements or policies are
difficult to predict and could adversely af fect demand for our products, our costs, our customers, our suppliers, and the U.S. economy ,
which in turn could have a material adverse ef fect on our cash flows, competitive position, financial condition or results of operations.
        We cannot assure you that the market value or trading prices of our common stock and debt securities, will not be adversely
affected by events in the United States or elsewhere, including in emer ging market countries.
Other  international risks.
        We are a company with substantial assets located outside of the United States. We conduct production operations in Peru and
Mexico and exploration activities in these countries as well as in Chile, Argentina and Ecuador . Accordingly , in addition to the usual
risks associated with conducting business in foreign countries, our business may be adversely af fected by political, economic and
social uncertainties in each of these countries. Such risks include possible expropriation or nationalization of property , confiscatory
taxes or royalties, possible foreign exchange controls, changes in the national policy toward foreign investors, extreme environmental
standards, etc.
        Our international operations must comply with the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and similar anti-corruption and anti-bribery
laws of the other jurisdictions in which we operate. There has been a substantial increase in the global enforcement of these laws in
recent years. As such, our corporate policies and processes may not prevent or detect all potential breaches of law . Any violation of
those laws could result in significant criminal or civil fines and penalties, litigation, and loss of operating licenses or permits, and may
damage our reputation, which could have a material adverse ef fect on our cash flows, results of operations and financial condition.
        Our insurance does not cover most losses caused by the above described risks. Consequently , our production, development and
exploration activities in these countries could be substantially af fected by factors out of control, some of which could materially and
adversely af fect our financial position or results of operations.
Risks Associated with Doing Business in Peru and Mexico
There is uncertainty as to the termination and renewal of our mining concessions.
        Under the laws of Peru and Mexico, mineral resources belong to the state and government and concessions are required in both
countries to explore for or exploit mineral reserves. In Peru, our mineral rights derive from concessions from Ministry of Ener gy and
Mines ("MINEM") for our exploration, exploitation, extraction and/or production operations. In Mexico, our mineral rights derive
from concessions granted, on a discretionary basis, by the Ministry of Economy , pursuant to Mexican mining law and regulations
thereunder .
        Mining concessions in both Peru and Mexico may be terminated if the obligations of the concessioner are not satisfied. In Peru,
we are obligated to pay certain fees for our mining concession. In Mexico, we are obligated, among other things, to explore or exploit
the relevant concession, to pay
21
Table of Contents
any relevant fees, to comply with all environmental and safety standards, to provide information to the Ministry of Economy and to
allow inspections by the Ministry of Economy . Any termination or unfavorable modification of the terms of one or more of our
concessions, or failure to obtain renewals of such concessions subject to renewal or extensions, could have a material adverse ef fect on
our financial condition and prospects.
Peruvian economic and political conditions may have an adverse impact on our business.
        A significant part of our operations are conducted in Peru. Accordingly , our business, financial condition or results of operations
could be af fected by changes in economic or other policies of the Peruvian government or other political, regulatory or economic
developments in the country . During the past several decades, Peru has had a succession of regimes with dif fering policies and
programs. Past governments have frequently intervened in the nation's economy and social structure. Among other actions, past
governments have imposed controls on prices, exchange rates and local and foreign investments, as well as limitations on imports,
have restricted the ability of companies to dismiss employees and have prohibited the remittance of profits to foreign investors.
        In 2018 Peru experienced heightened political instability derived from various currently ongoing investigations into allegations of
money laundering and corruption linked to the Operation Car Wash investigation that was initiated by Brazilian authorities.Because we
have significant operations in Peru, we cannot provide any assurance that political developments and economic conditions, including
any changes to economic policies or the adoption of other reforms proposed by existing or future administrations, in Peru and/or other
factors will not have a material adverse ef fect on market conditions, prices of our securities, our ability to obtain financing and our
results of operations and financial condition.
Mexican economic and political conditions, as well as drug-related violence, may have an adverse impact on our business.
        The Mexican economy is highly sensitive to economic developments in the United States, mainly because of its high level of
exports to this market. Other risks in Mexico are increases in taxes on the mining sector and higher royalties as were enacted in 2013.
As has occurred in other metal producing countries, the mining industry may be perceived as a source of additional fiscal revenue.
        In addition, security institutions in Mexico are under significant stress, as a result of drug-related violence. This situation creates
potential risks especially for transportation of minerals and finished products, which af fect a small part of our production. However ,
drug-related violence has had a limited impact on our operations as it has tended to concentrate outside our areas of production. The
potential risks to our operations might increase if the violence was to spread to our areas of production.
        Because we have significant operations in Mexico, we cannot provide any assurance that political developments and economic
conditions, including any changes to economic policies or the adoption of other reforms proposed by existing or future administrations,
or drug-related violence, in Mexico will not have a material adverse ef fect on market conditions, prices of our securities, on our ability
to obtain financing, and on our results of operations and financial condition.
Peruvian inflation and fluctuations in the sol exchange rate may adversely af fect our financial condition and results of operations.
        Although the U.S. dollar is our functional currency and our revenues are primarily denominated in U.S. dollars, as we operate in
Peru, portions of our operating costs are denominated in Peruvian soles. Accordingly , when inflation or deflation in Peru is not of fset
by a change in the exchange rate of the sol, our financial position, results of operations, cash flows and the market price of our
common stock could be af fected.
22
Table of Contents
        Inflation in Peru in 2018, 2017 and 2016 was 2.5%, 1.5% and 3.2%, respectively . The value of the sol depreciated against the U.S.
dollar 4.1% in 2018, and it appreciated 3.4% and 1.6% in 2017 and 2016, respectively . Although the Peruvian government's economic
policy reduced inflation and the economy has experienced significant growth in recent years, we cannot assure you that inflation will
not increase from its current level or that such growth will continue in the future at similar rates or at all. Additionally a global
financial economic crisis could negatively af fect the Peruvian economy .
        To manage the volatility related to the risk of currency rate fluctuations, we may enter into forward exchange contracts. We
cannot assure you, however , that currency fluctuations will not have an impact on our financial condition and results of operations.
Mexican inflation, restrictive exchange control policies and fluctuations in the peso exchange rate may adversely af fect our
financial condition and results of operations.
        Although all of our Mexican operations' sales of metals are priced and invoiced in U.S. dollars, a substantial portion of its costs
are denominated in pesos. Accordingly , when inflation in Mexico increases without a corresponding depreciation of the peso, the net
income generated by our Mexican operations is adversely af fected. The annual inflation rate in Mexico was 4.8% in 2018, 6.8% in
2017 and 3.4% in 2016.
        At the same time, the peso has been subject in the past to significant volatility , which may not have been proportionate to the
inflation rate and may not be proportionate to the inflation rate in the future. The value of the peso relative to the U.S. dollar increased
by 0.3% and 4.5% in 2018 and 2017, and decreased by 20.1% in 2016.
        The Mexican government does not currently restrict the ability of Mexican companies or individuals to convert pesos into dollars
or other currencies. While we do not expect the Mexican government to impose any restriction or exchange control policies in the
future, it is an area we closely monitor . We cannot assure you the Mexican government will maintain its current policies with regard to
the peso or that the peso's value will not fluctuate significantly in the future. The imposition of exchange control policies could impair
Minera Mexico's ability to obtain imported goods and to meet its U.S. dollar -denominated obligations and could have an adverse ef fect
on our business and financial condition.
ITEM 1B.    UNRESOL VED ST AFF  COMMENTS
        None.
23
Table of Contents
ITEM 2.    PROPER TIES
        We were incorporated in Delaware in 1952. Our corporate of fices in the United States are located at 1440 East Missouri Avenue
Suite 160, Phoenix, Arizona 85014. Our Phoenix telephone number is (602) 264-1375. Our corporate of fices in Mexico are located in
Mexico City and our corporate of fices in Peru are located in Lima. Our website is www .southerncoppercorp.com. We believe that our
existing properties are in good condition and suitable for the conduct of our business.
REVIEW  OF OPERA TIONS
        The following maps set forth the locations of our principal mines, smelting facilities and refineries. We operate open-pit copper
mines in the southern part of Peru—at Toquepala and Cuajone—and in Mexico, at La Caridad and Buenavista. We also operate five
under ground mines that produce zinc, copper , silver and gold, as well as a coal mine and a coke oven.
EXTRACTION, SMEL TING AND REFINING PROCESSES
        Our operations include open-pit and under ground mining, concentrating, copper smelting, copper refining, copper rod production,
solvent extraction/electrowinning ("SX-EW"), zinc refining, sulfuric acid production, molybdenum concentrate production and silver
and gold refining. The extraction and production process are summarized below .
OPEN-PIT  MINING
        In an open-pit mine, the production process begins at the mine pit, where waste rock, leaching ore and copper ore are drilled and
blasted and then loaded onto diesel-electric trucks by electric shovels. Waste is hauled to dump areas and leaching ore is hauled to
leaching dumps. The ore to be milled is transported to the primary crushers.
UNDERGROUND MINING
        In an under ground mine, the production process begins at the stopes, where copper , zinc and lead veins are drilled and blasted and
the ore is hauled to the under ground crusher station. The crushed ore is then hoisted to the surface for processing.
CONCENTRA TING
        The copper ore with a copper grade over 0.4% from the primary crusher or the copper , zinc and lead-bearing ore from the
under ground mines is transported to a concentrator plant where gyratory
24
Table of Contents
crushers break the ore into sizes no lar ger than three-quarter of an inch. The ore is then sent to a mill section where it is ground to the
consistency of fine powder . The finely ground ore is mixed with water and chemical reagents and pumped as a slurry to the flotation
separator where it is mixed with certain chemicals. In the flotation separator , reagent solutions and air pumped into the flotation cells
cause the minerals to separate from the waste rock and bubble to the surface where they are collected and dried.
        If the bulk concentrated copper contains molybdenum, it is first processed in a molybdenum plant as described below under
"Molybdenum Production."
COPPER SMEL TING
        Copper concentrates are transported to a smelter , where they are smelted using a furnace, converter and anode furnace to produce
either blister copper (which is in the form of cakes with air pockets) or copper anodes (which are cleaned of air pockets). At the
smelter , the concentrates are mixed with flux (a chemical substance intentionally included for high temperature processing) and then
sent to reverberatory furnaces producing copper matte and slag (a mixture of iron and other impurities). Copper matte contains
approximately 65% copper . Copper matte is then sent to the converters, where the material is oxidized in two steps: (i) the iron sulfides
in the matte are oxidized with silica, producing slag that is returned to the reverberatory furnaces, and (ii) the copper contained in the
matte sulfides is then oxidized to produce copper that, after casting, is called blister copper , containing approximately 98% to 99%
copper , or anodes, containing approximately 99.7% copper . Most of the blister and anode production is sent to the refinery and the
remainder is sold to customers.
COPPER REFINING
        Anodes are suspended in tanks with a solution containing water , sulfuric acid and copper sulfate. A weak electrical current is
passed through the anodes and chemical solution and the dissolved copper is deposited on very thin starting sheets to produce copper
cathodes containing approximately 99.99% copper . During this process, silver , gold and other metals (for example, palladium,
platinum and selenium), along with other impurities, settle on the bottom of the tank (anodic muds). This anodic mud is processed at a
precious metal plant where selenium, silver and gold are recovered.
COPPER ROD PLANT
        To produce copper rod, copper cathodes are first smelted in a furnace and then dosified in a casting machine. The dosified copper
is then extruded and passed through a cooling system that begins solidification of copper into a 60×50 millimeter copper bar . The
resulting copper bar is gradually stretched in a rolling mill to achieve the desired diameter . The rolled bar is then cooled and sprayed
with wax as a preservation agent and collected into a rod coil that is compacted and sent to market.
SOLVENT  EXTRACTION/ELECTROWINNING ("SX-EW")
        A complementary processing method is the leaching and SX-EW  process. During the SX-EW  process, low-grade sulfides ore and
copper oxides are leached with sulfuric acid to allow copper content recovery . The acid and copper solution is then agitated with a
solvent that contains chemical additives that attract copper ions. As the solvent is lighter than water , it floats to the surface carrying
with it the copper content. The solvent is then separated using an acid solution, freeing the copper . The acid solution containing the
copper is then moved to electrolytic extraction tanks to produce copper cathodes.
MOL YBDENUM PRODUCTION
        Molybdenum is recovered from copper -molybdenum concentrates produced at the concentrator . The copper -molybdenum
concentrate is first treated with a thickener until it becomes slurry with 60%
25
Table of Contents
solids. The slurry is then agitated in a chemical and water solution and pumped to the flotation separator . The separator creates a froth
that carries molybdenum to the surface but not the copper mineral (which is later filtered to produce copper concentrates containing
approximately 27% copper). The molybdenum froth is skimmed of f, filtered and dried to produce molybdenum concentrates of
approximately 58% contained molybdenum.
ZINC REFINING
        Metallic zinc is produced through electrolysis using zinc concentrates and zinc oxides. Sulfur is eliminated from the concentrates
by roasting and the zinc oxide is dissolved in sulfuric acid solution to eliminate solid impurities. The purified zinc sulfide solution is
treated by electrolysis to produce refined zinc and to separate silver and gold, which are recovered as concentrates.
SULFURIC ACID PRODUCTION
        Sulfur dioxide gases are produced in the copper smelting and zinc roasting processes. As a part of our environmental preservation
program, we treat the sulfur dioxide emissions at two of our Mexican plants and at our Peruvian processing facilities to produce
sulfuric acid, some of which is, in turn, used for the copper leaching process, with the balance sold to mining and fertilizer companies
located principally in Mexico, Peru, United States and Chile.
SILVER AND GOLD REFINING
        Silver and gold are recovered from copper , zinc and lead concentrates in the smelters and refineries, and from slimes through
electrolytic refining.
KEY  PRODUCTION CAP ACITY  DATA
        All production facilities are owned by us. The following table sets forth as of December 31, 2018, the locations of production
facilities by reportable segment, the processes used, as well as the key production and capacity data for each location:
26Facility Name  Location  Process  Nominal Capacity(1)  2018
Production  2018 Capacity
Use(4)  
PERUVIAN OPEN-PIT  UNIT            
Mining Operations 
  
   
   
  
Cuajone open-
pit mine Cuajone (Peru)  Copper ore milling and recovery ,
copper and molybdenum
concentrate production 90.0 ktpd—ore milled   82.2  91.3%
Toquepala
open-pit
mine;
Concentrator
I Toquepala (Peru)  Copper ore milling and recovery ,
copper and molybdenum
concentrate production 60.0 ktpd—ore milled   59.9  99.9%
Concentrator
II     60.0 ktpd—ore milled   30.5  50.9%
Toquepala
SX-EW
plant Toquepala (Peru)  Leaching, solvent extraction and
cathode electrowinning 56.0 ktpy—refined   26.5  47.4%
Processing Operations 
  
   
   
  
Ilo copper
smelter Ilo (Peru)  Copper smelting, blister , anodes
production 1,200.0 ktpy—
concentrate feed  1,187.7   99.0%
Ilo copper
refinery Ilo (Peru)  Copper refining  280 ktpy—refined
cathodes  292.7   104.5 %
Ilo acid plants  Ilo (Peru)  Sulfuric acid  1,050 ktpy—sulfuric
acid  1,169.1   111.3%
Ilo precious
metals
refinery Ilo (Peru)  Slime recovery & processing,
gold & silver refining 320 tpy   462.7   144.6 %
Table of Contents
Facility Name  Location  Process  Nominal Capacity(1)  2018
Production  2018 Capacity
Use(4)  
MEXICAN OPEN-PIT  UNIT            
Mining Operations 
  
   
   
  
Buenavista
open-pit
mine;
Concentrator
I Sonora (Mexico)  Copper ore milling & recovery ,
copper concentrate production 82.0 ktpd—milling   83.0  101.2 %
Concentrator
II     100.0 ktpd—milling   109.7   109.7 %
Buenavista:
SX-EW
plant I Sonora (Mexico)  Leaching, solvent extraction &
refined cathode electrowinning 11.0 ktpy—refined   —  —%
SX-EW  plant
II     43.8 ktpy—refined   6.7  15.4%
SX-EW  plant
III     120.0 ktpy—refined   82.1  68.4%
La Caridad
open-pit
mine Sonora (Mexico)  Copper ore milling & recovery ,
copper & molybdenum concentrate
production 94.5 ktpd—milling   94.7  100.2 %
La Caridad
SX-EW
plant Sonora (Mexico)  Leaching, solvent extraction &
cathode electrowinning 21.9 ktpy—refined   26.4  120.6 %
Processing Operations 
  
   
   
  
La Caridad
copper
smelter Sonora (Mexico)  Concentrate smelting, anode
production 1,000 ktpy—concentrate
feed  1,042   104.2 %
La Caridad
copper
refinery Sonora (Mexico)  Copper refining  300 ktpy copper cathode   239  79.7%
La Caridad
copper rod
plant Sonora (Mexico)  Copper rod production  150 ktpy copper rod   147  98.1%
La Caridad
precious
metals
refinery Sonora (Mexico)  Slime recovery & processing,
gold & silver refining 1.8 ktpy—slime   1.1  61.8%
La Caridad
sulfuric
acid plant Sonora (Mexico)  Sulfuric acid  1,565.5 ktpy—sulfuric
acid  1,002.5   64.0%
IMMSA  UNIT 
  
   
   
  
Undergr ound mines 
  
   
   
  
Charcas  San Luis Potosi
(Mexico) Copper , zinc, lead milling,
recovery & concentrate production 1,460 ktpy—ore milled   1,290   88.4%
San Martin(2)  Zacatecas
(Mexico) Lead, zinc, copper & silver
mining, milling recovery &
concentrate production 1,606 ktpy—ore milled   —  —%
Santa Barbara  Chihuahua
(Mexico) Lead, copper and zinc mining &
concentrates production 2,190 ktpy—ore milled   1,671   76.3%
Santa Eulalia  Chihuahua
(Mexico) Lead & zinc mining and milling
recovery & concentrate production 547.5 ktpy—ore milled   316  57.8%
Taxco(2)  Guerrero
(Mexico) Lead, zinc silver & gold mining
recovery & concentrate production 730 ktpy—ore milled   —  —%
Nueva Rosita
coal & coke
complex(3) Coahuila
(Mexico) Clean coal production  900 ktpy clean coal   42.8  4.8%
     100 ktpy coke   —  —%
Processing Operations 
  
   
   
  
San Luis
Potosi zinc
refinery San Luis Potosi
(Mexico) Zinc concentrates refining  105.0 ktpy zinc cathode   107.5   102.4 %
San Luis
Potosi
sulfuric
acid plant San Luis Potosi
(Mexico) Sulfuric acid  180.0 ktpy sulfuric acid   184.2   102.3 %
ktpd = thousands of tons per day
ktpy = thousands of tons per year
Tpy = tons per year
(1) Our estimates of actual capacity under normal operating conditions with allowance for normal downtime for repairs and maintenance and based on
the average metal content for the relevant period.
(2) The Taxco mine has been on strike since July 2007. The Company expects to have production from the San Martin mine in the second quarter of
2019.
(3) At December 31, 2018, the coal reserves for the Nueva Rosita coal plant were 94.8 million tons with average sulfur content of 1.38% and a BTU
content of 10,022 per pound.
(4) In some cases, real production exceeds the nominal capacity due to higher grades and recovery rates.
27
Table of Contents
PROPER TY BOOK VALUE
        At December 31, 2018, net book values of property are as follows (in millions):
28Peruvian operations:     
Cuajone  $ 704.3  
Toquepala   1,018.9  
Tia Maria project   333.9  
Ilo and other support facilities   599.7  
Construction in progress   1,611.4 
     
Total Peru  $4,268.2  
     
Mexican open-pit operations:     
Buenavista mine and concentrator plants  $2,324.6  
Buenavista SX-EW  and Quebalix   1,105.9  
La Caridad mine and concentrator plant   352.0  
La Caridad support facilities   400.2  
Construction in progress   280.2  
     
Total Mexico Open Pit  $4,462.9  
Mexican IMMSA  unit:     
San Luis Potosi  $ 96.9 
Zinc electrolytic refinery   79.2 
Charcas   60.9 
San Martin   20.4 
Santa Barbara   64.5 
Taxco   2.2 
Santa Eulalia   37.3 
Nueva Rosita   8.7 
Construction in progress and other facilities   77.2 
     
Total IMMSA  Unit  $ 448.3  
Other  property:     
El Pilar  $ 86.7 
Mexicana del Arco   39.0 
     
Total  $ 125.7  
Mexican administrative of fices  $ 98.7 
     
Total Mexico  $5,135.6  
     
Total Southern Copper Corporation  $9,403.8  
          
     
Table of Contents
SUMMAR Y OPERA TING DA TA
        The following table sets out certain operating data underlying our financial and operating information for each of the periods
indicated.
29        Variance  
  Year Ended December  31,  2018 - 2017  2017 - 2016  
  2018  2017  2016  Volume  %  Volume  %  
COPPER  (thousand pounds) :                       
Mined                       
Peru open-pit                       
Toquepala   316,849   271,056   256,894   45,793   16.9% 14,162   5.5%
Cuajone   354,016   348,562   377,978   5,454   1.6% (29,416 ) (7.8)%
SX-EW  Toquepala   58,480   55,320   54,851   3,160   5.7% 469  0.9%
Mexico open-pit                       
La Caridad   233,882   234,287   231,373   (405) (0.2)% 2,914   1.3%
Buenavista   716,239   703,074   696,681   13,165   1.9% 6,393   0.9%
SX-EW  La Caridad   58,232   62,586   62,406   (4,354 ) (7.0)% 180  0.3%
SX-EW  Buenavista   196,788   246,426   289,705   (49,638 ) (20.1 )% (43,279 ) (14.9 )%
IMMSA  unit   13,715   12,093   14,171   1,622   13.4% (2,078 ) (14.7 )%
                       
Total Mined   1,948,201   1,933,404   1,984,059   14,797   0.8% (50,655 ) (2.6)%
                       
Smelted                       
Peru open-pit                       
Blister Ilo   5,799   3,953   2,048   1,846   46.7% 1,905   93.0%
Anodes Ilo   760,060   762,460   711,137   (2,400 ) (0.3)% 51,323   7.2%
Mexico open-pit                       
Anodes La Caridad   631,056   595,717   590,492   35,339   5.9% 5,225   0.9%
                       
Total Smelted   1,396,915   1,362,130   1,303,677   34,785   2.6% 58,453   4.5%
                       
Refined                       
Peru Open-pit                       
Cathodes Ilo   645,191   642,367   595,652   2,824   0.4% 46,715   7.8%
SX-EW  Toquepala   58,480   55,320   54,851   3,160   5.7% 469  0.9%
Mexico Open-pit                       
Cathodes La Caridad   527,306   502,783   494,175   24,523   4.9% 8,608   1.7%
SX-EW  La Caridad   58,232   62,586   62,406   (4,354 ) (7.0)% 180  0.3%
SX-EW  Buenavista   196,788   246,426   289,705   (49,638 ) (20.1 )% (43,279 ) (14.9 )%
                       Total Refined   1,485,997   1,509,482   1,496,789   (23,485 ) (1.6)% 12,693   0.8%
                       
Rod Mexico Open-pit—La Caridad   324,403   293,435   318,604   30,968   10.6% (25,169 ) (7.9)%
                       
SILVER  (thousand ounces)                       
Mined                       
Peru Open-pit                       
Toquepala   2,132   1,779   1,586   353  19.8% 193  12.2%
Cuajone   2,280   2,390   2,178   (110) (4.6)% 212  9.7%
Mexico Open-pit                       
La Caridad   2,085   2,009   1,967   76  3.8% 42  2.1%
Buenavista   5,162   4,988   4,819   174  3.5% 169  3.5%
IMMSA  unit   5,649   4,760   5,622   889  18.7% (862) (15.3 )%
                       Total Mined   17,308   15,926   16,172   1,382   8.7% (246) (1.5)%
                       
Refined                       
Peru—Ilo   3,884   3,953   3,295   (69) (1.7)% 658  20.0%
Mexico—La Caridad   8,496   7,152   8,260   1,344   18.8% (1,108 ) (13.4 )%
IMMSA  unit   1,203   2,583   3,641   (1,380 ) (53.4 )% (1,058 ) (29.0 )%
                       
Total Refined   13,583   13,688   15,196   (105) (0.8)% (1,508 ) (9.9)%
                       
MOL YBDENUM  (thousand pounds)                       
Mined                       
Toquepala   9,169   9,224   13,942   (55) (0.6)% (4,718 ) (33.8 )%
Cuajone   6,832   8,259   8,655   (1,427 ) (17.3 )% (396) (4.6)%
Buenavista   10,842   7,636   3,472   3,206   42.0% 4,164   119.9%
La Caridad   21,626   21,900   21,850   (274) (1.2)% 50  0.2%
                       
Total Mined   48,469   47,019   47,919   1,450   3.1% (900) (1.9)%
                       
ZINC (thousand pounds)                       
Mined IMMSA   156,038   151,380   163,107   4,658   3.1% (11,727 ) (7.2)%
Refined IMMSA   237,076   230,166   233,894   6,910   3.0% (3,728 ) (1.6)%
Table of Contents
SLOPE ST ABILITY :
Peruvian Operations
        The Toquepala and Cuajone pits are approximately 825 meters and 930 meters deep, respectively . Under the present mine plan
configuration the Toquepala pit will reach a depth of 1,605 meters and the Cuajone pit will reach a depth of 1,380 meters. The
deepening pits present us with a number of geotechnical challenges. Perhaps the foremost concern is the possibility of slope failure, a
possibility that all open-pit mines face. In the past, in order to maintain slope stability , we have decreased pit slope angles, installed
additional or duplicate haul road access, and increased stripping requirements. We have also responded to hydrological conditions and
removed material displaced by slope failures. To meet the geotechnical challenges relating to slope stability of the open-pit mines, we
have taken the following steps:
        In the late 1990s, we hosted round table meetings in Vancouver , B.C. with a group of recognized slope stability and open-pit
mining specialists. The agenda for these meetings was principally a review of pit design for mines with greater than 700 meter depth.
The discussions included practices for monitoring, data collection and blasting processes.
        Based on the concepts defined at the Vancouver meetings, we initiated slope stability studies to define the mining of reserves by
optimum design. These studies were performed by outside consultants and included slope stability appraisals, evaluation of the
numerical modeling, slope performance and inter -ramp angle design and evaluation of hydrological conditions.
        The studies were completed in 2000 and we believe we implemented the study recommendations. One of the major changes
implemented was slope angle reduction at both mines, at Toquepala by an average of five degrees and at Cuajone by an average of
seven degrees. Although this increased the waste included in the mineable reserve calculation, it also improved the stability of the pits.
        Since 1998, a wall depressurization program has been in place in both pits. This consists of a horizontal drilling program, which
improves drainage thereby reducing saturation and increasing wall stability . Additionally , a new blasting control program was put in
place, implementing vibration monitoring and blasting designs of low punctual ener gy and pre-split techniques. Also a new slope
monitoring system was implemented using reflection prisms, deformation inclinometers and piezometers for water level control, as
well as real-time robotic monitoring equipment.
Toquepala :
        In 2007, we installed 20 meter wide geotechnical berms every 10 benches at the Toquepala mine. We believe this will further
strengthen the stability of the Toquepala pit. In October 2012, two interferometric radars were put in place to monitor slope stability at
the Toquepala mine, and in September 2013, new full monitoring software (FMS360) was installed. These systems improve the
reliability of instrumentation, the information quality for assessing the behavior of the slopes and anticipates the risks of instability .
        In 2013, a mining consulting group began a study of dump stability at the Toquepala mine. This study assessed the current
stability of the dumps and is developing a geotechnical campaign to obtain information to assess the stability of the future and final
stages of the dumps. In 2016, the stability study was resumed by executing geophysical test and test pits for the characterization of the
dumps. The execution of sonic perforations and complementary geophysical tests are currently pending. On December 2016, the
consultants also presented the report "Slope Stability Analysis in Deposits of W aste and Leachable Material".
        In 2016, the mining consultants presented the final report " Physical Stability of the Quebrada Honda tailings dam ". This study
consisted in the development of geotechnical investigations, static,
30
Table of Contents
seismic and post-seismic stability analysis, filtration analysis, deformation analysis, liquefaction potential analysis and dynamic
analysis.
        In 2016, as part of the slope stability upgrade study , a geotechnical and hydrological oriented drill program of 3,470 meters was
executed at the Toquepala mine. This program was conducted in order to complement the study and to get a better understanding of the
behavior of the rock mass. The geotechnical drilling program involved 1 1 diamond drill holes, six geotechnical drills and five
hydrogeological drills, all of them with geological and geotechnical logging. During the execution of these hydrogeological drills,
permeability tests in the rock were executed as well as slug tests and constant load tests. Additionally , instrumentation was
implemented with five vibrating wire piezometers for the monitoring of water table and to give support to the hydrogeological model.
Also in 2016, the external mining consultants began the report for phase three of this study , which was concluded in 2017. They
submitted and updated the block models of inter -ramp angles, the model of rock mass, the hydrogeological model and the 3D
structural model. In addition, fieldwork continued on the "Slope Stability Analysis in Deposits of W aste and Leachable Material"  study
by executing geophysical tests, sampling and laboratory tests of soil mechanics. This study was concluded and submitted by the
external consultants in 2018. Additionally , in 2018 we dedicated ef forts to update the geotechnical pit models, which are essential to
perform the analysis of slope stability . Related to this, we have carried out actions, including the completion of the geotechnical
database implementation, laboratory testing, training, and other important aspects.
        In recent years, we have destined ef forts for the development of stability studies of slopes of the pit, dumps and leachable deposits
and tailings; thus guaranteeing the safety of personnel and equipment, the continuity of the operation, and complying with Peruvian
regulations.
Cuajone :
        At the Cuajone mine, in 2007 in order to minimize the damage to the slopes caused by production blast vibrations, blasting
control using three pre-split drills was implemented. Also, the slope monitoring system with reflection prisms has been replaced by a
system using slope monitoring radar . In February 2012, the first radar equipment was put in service followed in August 2013 with the
second radar installation and a geotechnical surveillance camera was added. This system improved the reliability and continuity of
monitoring, improved the quality of information used to evaluate the performance of the slopes and helped better anticipate the risk of
instability . The sub-surface deformation and the water level are still monitored with inclinometers and piezometers. In September
2012, we completed a program of oriented geotechnical drilling totaling 17,938 meters, and in May 2013 we completed a program of
vertical geotechnical drilling totaling 2,814 meters, with hydraulic tests performed on rock and subsequently instrumented with
inclinometers/piezometers. The geotechnical and hydraulic information obtained from the two programs will be used in the
development of a geotechnical study for the new 15 year mine development plan (2015-2029). Also during 2013, we drilled 772
meters of sub-horizontal holes in order to drain the east slope of the pit. The geotechnical study for the new 15-year mine development
plan was completed at the end of 2015 and the result of this study is the increase by an average of three degrees of the inter ramp angle
and include 40 meters wide geotechnical berms for inter ramp heights above 150 meters. This study also contains recommendations for
improving the stability of the pit slopes.
        In 2013, the Board of Directors approved a project to improve slope stability at the south area of the Cuajone mine, which will
remove approximately 148 million tons of waste material in order to improve the mine design without reducing our actual production
level. As of December 31, 2018, 96.1 million tons of waste material have been removed. For further information see Item 7
"Management Discussion and Analysis—Capital Investment Program."
31
Table of Contents
        In 2017, we installed three vibration monitoring stations and ten digital extensometers to monitor surface deformations on waste
dumps in real time. We also completed the detailed engineering for the construction of the coronation channel in the west Torata waste
dump. In 2018, we began to operate the first radar for monitoring blasting vibrations and a second geotechnical surveillance camera.
This equipment will allow us to improve control over the walls of the pit and to anticipate possible damages.
        To increase the possibility of mining in the event of a slide, we have provided for two extraction ramps for each open-pit mine.
While these measures cannot guarantee that a slope failure will not occur , we believe that our mining practices are sound and that the
steps taken and the ongoing reviews performed are a prudent methodology for open-pit mining.
Mexican operations
        In 2004, our 15-year mine plan study for the La Caridad mine was awarded to an independent consulting firm to conduct a
geotechnical evaluation. The purpose of the plan was to develop a program of optimum bench design and inter -ramp slope angles for
the open-pit. The results of the evaluation presented by the consultants included a recommendation of a maximum average bench face
angle of 72 degrees. Additionally , single benching was recommended for the upper sections of the west, south and east walls of the
main pit. Likewise, double benching was recommended for the lower levels of the main pit and single benching for the upper slope
segments that consist of either alluvial material, mine waste dumps or mineralized stockpile material. Alternatively , slopes in these
types of materials, may be designed with an overall 37 degree slope. The geostructural and geotechnical parameters recommended
were applied in the pit design for the new life of the mine plan for La Caridad mine prepared in 2015. This mine plan replaced the 15-
year mine plan prepared in 2010. However , since final pit limits have not been yet established at La Caridad, all current pit walls are
effectively working slopes. Geostructural and geotechnical data collected at the open-pit mine from cell-mapping and oriented-core
drilling databases provided the basis for the geotechnical evaluation and recommendations. We continue to collect new information
related to geotechnical data and other geology features from the mine pit and diamond drill hole, in order to ensure the structural
security and also to improve the geotechnical data base for future studies.
        At the Buenavista mine, we are following the recommendations of a geotechnical evaluation of design slope for the 15-year pit
plan. This evaluation was prepared by an independent mine consulting firm. This evaluation included the determination of optimum pit
slope design angles and bench design parameters for the proposed mine plan. The objective of the study was: (1) to determine
optimum inter -ramp slope angles and bench design parameters for the 15-year plan and (2) to identify and analyze any potential major
instability that could adversely impact mine operation. In 2012, we installed a radar system to monitor the walls of the mine.
        The following recommendations were made for the Buenavista mine: inter -ramp slope design angles for the 15-year pit plan, for
all of the 21 design sectors, defined on a rock-fabric-based catch bench analysis, using double bench, can range from 48° and 55°, and
the inter -ramp slope angles are based on geometries that resulted from the back-break analysis using 80% reliability of achieving the
required 7.5 meter catch bench width for a single bench configuration and 10.6 meter catch bench width for a double bench
configuration. Preliminary observations suggest the 15-year pit walls may be relative free-draining, the back-break analysis assumed
depressurized conditions of mine benches, and the inter -ramp stability analysis were performed for both, saturated and depressurized
conditions.
        A pit dewatering/depressurization plan for the Buenavista mine was also recommended to address the issues of open-pit drainage,
dewatering plan and future slope depressurization. Phase I of the geohydrological study was completed by an independent consultant.
The analysis included a preliminary assessment and work plan implementations.
32
Table of Contents
        In 201 1, five wells for extraction and monitoring were drilled close to the mine. Also, we began a drilling program to monitor
possible water filtration beyond the limits of the open-pit mine. All the information obtained from these well drilling programs has
been analyzed and included in the hydrologic model. The open-pit dewatering program from the bottom benches also continued during
2012 with a drilling program of 3,797 meters in several monitoring wells in order to allow us to continue with the current mining plan.
        In 2013, Buenavista continued the drilling program monitoring the extraction wells in the area of Increment (Phase) five of the
mine and beyond the current limits of the open pit mine.
        During 2013, the program to dewater the Buenavista pit bottom was continued in accordance with the short and medium term
mine plans. Pumping from sumps located in Increment five, permitted mining of high grade copper blocks. Concurrent with this
operational task, a geophysical study was conducted to determine the best locations for water extraction wells to control the inflow of
water to the pit bottom and thus allow us to continue our mining operations. The water extracted is being used for various purposes,
including road irrigation for dust mitigation. The geophysical investigation also permitted the location of under ground workings and
the filtration and seepage through fractures.
        A total of 7,339 meters were drilled during 2013 for 30 extraction wells, three of these wells are located in the area of Increment
(Phase) five. The rest were drilled at various locations outside of the current open pit mine limit.
        In 2014, we continued collecting new geotechnical information from two exploration drilling projects; this data is available to
analyze the geotechnical data base for new studies in accordance with slope angle for the open pit excavations. In the free face benches
at the open pit mine operations, the cell-mapping were prepared to increment the geotechnical data base. Following the
recommendations of geotechnical evaluation we continued monitoring the walls using the radar system.
        Various studies are now being conducted by outside specialized consultants in order to establish long-range mine water
management objectives and to implement recommendations for the ef ficient use of this resource.
Tailings Dams
        Tailings are comprised of solid particles originating at the concentrator plants during the grinding process that, combined with
water , are sent to specially built structures where they are impounded. The water is recovered to be reused in the process.
        Tailings dams are basically built in two manners: by using the coarse fraction from the same tailings or by using external material,
often known as "borrowed material" such as rock, clay etc. We believe SCC's tailings dams are built with the highest quality standards
and engineering practices. We comply with and at times exceed the national norms and recommendations of the International
Commission on Lar ge Dams (ICOLD). In addition we maintain a committee including both internal and external specialists, which
periodically review the safety and operation of each dam.
33
Table of Contents
        We have six tailings dams in operation in Mexico and one in Peru as follows:
MET AL PRODUCTION BY  SEGMENTS
        Set forth below are descriptions of the operations and other information relating to the operations included in each of our three
segments.
PERUVIAN OPERA TIONS
        Our Peruvian segment operations include the Cuajone and Toquepala mine complexes and the smelting and refining plants,
industrial railroad which links Ilo, Toquepala and Cuajone and the port facilities.
        Following is a map indicating the approximate location of, and access to, our Cuajone and Toquepala mine complexes, as well as
our Ilo processing facilities:
34Country  Operation  Name  Curr ent Height  Material  Method
Mexico  Buenavista  Tailings dam # 3  90 meters  Borrowed  Downstream
Mexico  Buenavista  New tailings dam  70 meters  Borrowed  Downstream
Mexico  La Caridad  Tailings dam # 7  168 meters  Borrowed  Downstream
Mexico  Charcas  Tailings dam  50 meters  Coarse tailings  Upstream
Mexico  Santa Barbara  Noriega dam  45 meters  Coarse tailings  Upstream
Mexico  Santa Eulalia  Tailings dam  70 meters  Coarse tailings  Upstream
Peru  Cuajone and
Toquepala Quebrada Honda  128 meters  Coarse tailings  Downstream
Table of Contents
        We have ongoing maintenance and improvement programs to ensure the satisfactory performance of our equipment. We believe
all our Peruvian plant's equipment is in good physical condition and suitable for our operations.
Cuajone
        Our Cuajone operations consist of an open-pit copper mine and a concentrator located in southern Peru, 30 kilometers from the
city of Moquegua and 840 kilometers from Lima, at an altitude of 3,430 meters above sea level. Access to the Cuajone property is by
plane from Lima to Tacna (1:40 hours) and then by highway to Moquegua and Cuajone (3:30 hours). The concentrator has a milling
capacity of 90,000 tons per day . Overburden removal commenced in 1970 and ore production commenced in 1976. Our Cuajone
operations utilize a conventional open-pit mining method to collect copper ore for further processing at the concentrator .
        The table below sets forth 2018, 2017 and 2016 production information for our Cuajone operations:
        Copper and molybdenum grades are referred to as total copper grade and total molybdenum grade, respectively .
Geology
        The Cuajone porphyry copper deposit is located on the western flank of Cordillera Occidental, in the southern-most region of the
Andes mountains range of Peru. The deposit is part of a mineral district that contains two additional known deposits, Toquepala and
Quellaveco. The copper mineralization at Cuajone is typical of porphyry copper deposits.
35          Variance 2018 -
2017  
    2018  2017  2016  Volume  %  
Mine annual operating days     365  365  366       
Mine                   
Total ore mined  (kt)  29,571   29,769   30,825   (198) (0.7)%
Copper grade  (%)  0.651   0.617   0.649   0.034   5.5%
Leach material mined  (kt)  1,122   —  —  1,122   100%
Leach material grade  (%)  0.456   —  —  0.456   100%
Stripping ratio  (x)  4.92  4.01  4.68  0.91  22.7%
Total material mined  (kt)  175,177   149,265   175,009   25,912   17.4%
Concentrator                   
Total material milled  (kt)  29,575   29,751   30,681   (176) (0.6)%
Copper recovery  (%)  83.40   86.10   86.12   (2.70 ) (3.1)%
Copper concentrate  (kt)  660.7   607.5   656.5   53.2  8.8%
Copper in concentrate  (kt)  160.6   158.1   171.4   2.5  1.6%
Copper concentrates average grade  (%)  24.31   26.03   26.11  (1.72 ) (6.6)%
Molybdenum                   
Molybdenum grade  (%)  0.019   0.019   0.019   —  — 
Molybdenum recovery  (%)  55.63   66.62   68.60   (10.99 ) (16.5 )%
Molybdenum concentrate  (kt)  5.8  6.9  7.1  (1.1) (16.0 )%
Molybdenum concentrate average grade  (%)  53.30   54.16   55.01   (0.86 ) (1.6)%
Molybdenum in concentrate  (kt)  3.1  3.7  3.9  (0.6) (17.3 )%
Key: kt = thousand tons
   x = Stripping ratio obtained dividing waste plus leachable material by ore mined.
Table of Contents
        The Cuajone deposit is located approximately 30 kilometers north-west from the Toquepala deposit and is part of the Toquepala
Group dated approximately 60 to 100 million years (Upper Cretaceous to Lower Tertiary). The Cuajone lithology contains volcanic
rocks from the Cretaceous to the Quaternary period. The deposit contains 50 rock types including, pre-mineral rocks, basaltic andesite,
porphyritic rhyolite, Toquepala dolerite, Toquepala rhyolite and intrusive rocks, including diorite, porphyritic latite, breccias and dikes.
In addition, the following post-mineral rocks are present: the Huaylillas and Chuntacala formations that have been formed by
conglomerates, tuf fs sequence, traquites and agglomerates. These formations date from nine to 23 million years. There is also the
occurrence of Quaternary rocks formed by alluvial and colluvial mainly located in slopes of hills and streams.
        The mineralogy is simple and is evenly distributed. It is mainly composed of minerals such as chalcopyrite (CuFeS2), chalcosine
(Cu2S) and molybdenite (MoS2) with occasional presence of galena, enar gite and tetraedrite without economic value.
Mine exploration
        Exploration activities during the drill campaign in 2018 were as follows:
Concentrator
        Our Cuajone operations use state-of-the-art computer monitoring systems at the concentrator , the crushing plant and the flotation
circuit in order to coordinate inflows and optimize operations. Material with a copper grade over 0.35% is loaded onto an overland
conveyor belt and sent to the milling circuit, where giant rotating crushers reduce the size of the rocks to approximately one-half of an
inch. The ore is then sent to the ball mills, which grind it to the consistency of fine powder . The finely ground powder is agitated in a
water and reagents solution and is then transported to flotation cells. Air is pumped into the cells to produce foam for floating the
copper and molybdenum minerals, but separating waste material called tailings. This copper -molybdenum bulk concentrate is then
treated by inverse flotation where molybdenum is floated and copper is depressed. The copper concentrate is shipped by rail to the
smelter at Ilo and the molybdenum concentrate is packaged for shipment to customers. Sulfides under 0.35% copper are considered
waste.
        Tailings are sent to thickeners where water is recovered. The remaining tailings are sent to the Quebrada Honda dam, our
principal tailings storage facility .
        A major mill expansion was completed in 1999 and the eleventh primary mill was put in operation in January 2008. In December
2013, the high pressure grinding roll was put in operation. At the end of 2016, the Larox filter press for molybdenum concentrate
began operations. The overland primary crusher began operations in May 2018. The new tailings thickener is expected to start
operations in early 2019.
Toquepala
        Our Toquepala operations consist of an open-pit copper mine and two concentrators. We also refine copper at the SX-EW  facility
through a leaching process. Toquepala is located in southern Peru, 30 kilometers from Cuajone and 870 kilometers from Lima, at an
altitude of 3,220 meters above sea level. Access is by plane from Lima to the city of Tacna (1:40 hours) and then by the Pan-American
highway to Camiara (1:20 hours) and by road to Toquepala (1 hour). Each concentrator has a milling
36Studies  Meters  Holes  Notes
Infill drilling   15,077   33 To obtain additional information to improve confidence in
our block model.
Reverse circulation   3,850   72 To corroborate presence of oxides in Dump N°3
Geotechnical   4,404   21 To confirm the continuity of major structures.
Table of Contents
capacity of 60,000 tons per day . The SX-EW  facility has a production capacity of 56,000 tons per year of LME grade A copper
cathodes. Overburden removal commenced in 1957 and ore production commenced in 1960. Our Toquepala operations utilize a
conventional open-pit mining method to collect copper ore for further processing in our concentrators. The second concentrator began
operations in the fourth quarter of 2018.
        The table below sets forth 2018, 2017 and 2016 production information for our Toquepala operations:
        Copper and molybdenum grades are referred to as total copper grade and total molybdenum grade, respectively .
Geology
        The Toquepala porphyry deposit is located on the western slopes of Cordillera Occidental, in the southern-most region of the
Andes mountains range of Peru, approximately 120 kilometers from the border with Chile. This region extends into Chile and is home
to many of the world's most significant known copper deposits. The deposit is part of a mineral district that contains two additional
known deposits, Cuajone and Quellaveco. The deposit is in a territory with intrusive and eruptive activities of rhyolitic and andesitic
rocks which are 70 million years old (Cretaceous-T ertiary) and which created a series of volcanic lava. The lava is composed of
rhyolites, andesites and volcanic agglomerates with a western dip and at an altitude of 1,500 meters. These series are known as the
Toquepala Group.
37          Variance 2018 -
2017  
    2018  2017  2016  Volume  %  
Mine annual operating days     365  365  366       
Mine                   
Total ore mined  (kt)  22,701   20,41 1  19,940   2,290   11.2%
Copper grade  (%)  0.686   0.663   0.647   0.023   3.5%
Leach material mined  (kt)  104,126   85,048   78,485   19,078   22.4%
Leach material grade  (%)  0.160   0.201   0.191   (0.041 ) (20.4 )%
Stripping ratio  (x)  9.64  8.98  9.48  0.66  7.4%
Total material mined  (kt)  241,514   203,778   209,064   37,736   18.5%
Concentrator                   
Total material milled  (kt)  23,060   20,392   20,071   2,668   13.1%
Copper recovery  (%)  90.99   90.94   89.73   0.05  0.1%
Copper concentrate  (kt)  528.2   451.9   424.5   76.3  16.9%
Copper in concentrate  (kt)  143.7   122.9   116.5  20.8  16.9%
Copper concentrate average grade  (%)  27.21   27.21   27.45   —  — 
SX-EW plant                   
Estimated leach recovery  (%)  24.11  24.62   25.29   (0.51 ) (2.1)%
SX-EW  cathode production  (kt)  26.5  25.1  24.8  1.4  5.7%
Molybdenum                   
Molybdenum grade  (%)  0.028   0.029   0.043   (0.001 ) (3.5)%
Molybdenum recovery  (%)  68.42   69.69   73.61   (1.27 ) (1.8)%
Molybdenum concentrate  (kt)  7.5  7.5  11.3  —  — 
Molybdenum concentrate average grade  (%)  55.54   55.76   55.96   (0.22 ) (0.4)%
Molybdenum in concentrate  (kt)  4.2  4.2  6.3  —  — 
Key: kt = thousand tons
   x = Stripping ratio obtained dividing waste plus leachable material by ore mined.
Table of Contents
Subsequently , different intrusive activities occurred which broke and smelted the rocks of the Toquepala Group. These intrusive
activities resulted in diorites, granodiorites and dikes of porphyritic dacite. Toquepala has a simple mineralogy with regular copper
grade distribution. Economic ore is found as disseminated sulfurs throughout the deposit as veinlets, replenishing empty places or as
small aggregates. Ore minerals include chalcopyrite (CuFeS2), chalcosine (Cu2S) and molybdenite (MoS2). A secondary enrichment
zone is also found with thicknesses between 0 and 150 meters.
Mine Exploration
        Exploration activities during the drill campaign in 2018 were as follows:
Concentrator
        Our Toquepala concentrator operations use state-of-the-art computer monitoring systems in order to coordinate inflows and
optimize operations. Material with a copper grade over 0.40% is loaded onto rail cars and sent to the crushing circuit, where rotating
crushers reduce the size of the rocks by approximately 85%, to less than one-half of an inch. The ore is then sent to the rod and ball
mills, which grind it in a mix with water to the consistency of fine powder . The finely ground powder mixed with water is then
transported to flotation cells. Air is pumped into the cells producing a froth, which carries the copper mineral to the surface but not the
waste rock, or tailings. The bulk concentrate with suf ficient molybdenum content is processed to recover molybdenum by inverse
flotation. This final copper concentrate with a content of approximately 26.5% of copper is filtered in order to reduce moisture to 8.5%
or less. Concentrates are then shipped by rail to the Ilo smelter .
        Tailings are sent to thickeners where water is recovered. The remaining tailings are sent to the Quebrada Honda dam, our
principal tailings storage facility .
SX-EW Plant
        The SX-EW  facility at Toquepala produces grade A LME electrowon copper cathodes of 99.999% purity from solutions obtained
by leaching low-grade ore stored at the Toquepala and Cuajone mines. The leach plant commenced operations in 1995 with a design
capacity of 35,629 tons per year of copper cathodes. In 1999, the capacity was expanded to 56,000 tons per year .
        Copper oxides from Cuajone with a copper grade higher than 0.275%, with an acid solubility index higher than 48% and a
cyanide solubility index higher than 24% are leached. In Toquepala, the copper sulfides cutof f grade is 0.041% and therefore material
with a total copper grade between 0.041% and 0.223% are leached. Copper in solution produced at Cuajone is sent to Toquepala
through an eight-inch pipe laid alongside the Cuajone-T oquepala railroad track.
38Studies  Meters  Holes  Notes
Ore and leach confirmation to reserves and
phases 
 14,758   23 To confirm the continuity of the ore and
leach material.
Study of Slopes Stability Instability-W est
Sector 
 400  2 To define the potential depth of instability .
Exploration geotechnical and
hydrogeological drill 
 6,081   16 To define rock mass quality and
hydrogeological behavior .
         
Total   21,239   41  
Table of Contents
        Plant and equipment are supported by a maintenance plan and a quality management system to assure good physical condition
and high availability . The SX-EW  plant management quality system (including leaching operations) has been audited periodically
since 2002 by an external audit company , and found to be in compliance with the requirements of the ISO 9001-2008 standard. In
2012, we obtained the certification OHSAS 18001-2007 of our occupational health and safety system and the ISO14001-2015 for our
environmental standards at the SX-EW  plant.
Processing Facilities—Ilo
        Our Ilo smelter and refinery complex is located in the southern part of Peru, 17 kilometers north of the city of Ilo, 121 kilometers
from Toquepala, 147 kilometers from Cuajone and 1,240 kilometers from the city of Lima. Access is by plane from Lima to Tacna
(1:40 hours) and then by highway to the city of Ilo (2:00 hours). Additionally , we maintain a port facility in Ilo, from which we ship
our products and receive supplies. Products shipped and supplies received are moved between Toquepala, Cuajone and Ilo on our
industrial railroad.
Smelter
        Our Ilo smelter produces copper anodes for the refinery we operate as part of the same facility . When the copper produced by the
smelter exceeds the refinery's capacity , the excess is sold to other refineries around the world. In 2007, we completed a major
modernization of the smelter . The nominal installed capacity of the smelter is 1,200,000 tons of copper concentrate per year . Copper
concentrates from Toquepala and Cuajone are transported by railroad to the smelter , where they are smelted using an ISASMEL T
furnace, converters and anode furnaces to produce copper anodes with 99.7% copper . At the smelter , the concentrates are mixed with
flux and other material and sent to the ISASMEL T furnace producing a mixture of copper matte and slag, which is tapped through a
taphole to either of two rotary holding furnaces, where these smelted phases will be separated. Copper matte contains approximately
63% copper . Copper matte is then sent to the four Pierce Smith converters, where the material is oxidized in two steps: (1) the iron
sulfides in the matte are oxidized with oxygen enriched air and silica is added producing slag that is sent to the slag cleaning furnaces,
and (2) the copper contained in the matte sulfides is then oxidized to produce blister copper , containing approximately 99.3% copper .
The blister copper is refined in two anode furnaces by oxidation to remove sulfur with compressed air injected into the bath. Finally ,
the oxygen content of the molten copper is adjusted by reduction with injection of liquefied petroleum gas with steam into the bath.
Anodes, containing approximately 99.7% copper , are cast in two casting wheels. The smelter also can produce blister copper bars,
especially when an anode furnace is in general repair .
        The table below sets forth 2018, 2017 and 2016 production and sales information for our Ilo smelter plant:
39          Variance 2018 -
2017  
Smelter    2018  2017  2016  Volume  %  
Concentrate smelted  (kt)  1.187.7   1,153.5   1,070.6   34.2  3.0%
Average copper recovery  (%)  97.4  97.4  97.4  —  — 
Anode production  (kt)  345.6   346.6   323.3   (1.0) (0.3)%
Average anode grade  (%)  99.77   99.77   99.77   —  — 
Blister production  kt  2.7  1.8  0.9  0.9  46.8%
Average blister grade  (%)  99.24   99.32   99.23   (0.08 ) (0.09 )%
Sulfuric acid produced  (kt)  1,169.1   1,119.6  1,036.3   49.5  4.4%
Key: kt = thousand tons
Table of Contents
        The of f gases from the smelter are treated to recover over 92% of the incoming sulfur received in the concentrates producing
98.5% sulfuric acid. The gas stream from the smelter with 1 1.34% SO2 is split between two plants: The No. 1 acid plant (single
absorption/single contact) and the No. 2 plant (double absorption/double contact). Approximately , 16% of the acid produced is used at
our facilities with the balance sold to third parties. We anticipate that our internal usage will be over 80% when the Tia Maria project
begins operation. The smelter also has two oxygen plants. Plant No. 1, with 272 tons per day of production capacity , and Plant No.2,
with 1,045 tons per day of capacity .
        In 2010, the Ilo smelter marine trestle started operation. This facility allows us to of fload directly to of fshore ships the sulfuric
acid produced, avoiding hauling car go through the city of Ilo. The 500 meter long marine trestle is the last part of the Ilo smelter
modernization project. Currently all overseas shipments of sulfuric acid are being made using the marine trestle.
Refinery
        The Ilo refinery consists of an electrolytic plant, a precious metal plant and a number of ancillary installations. The refinery is
producing grade A copper cathode of 99.998% purity . The nominal capacity is 280,000 tons per year . Anodic slimes are recovered
from the refining process and then sent to the precious metals facility to produce refined silver , refined gold and commercial grade
selenium.
        Anodes are suspended in tanks containing a solution of sulfuric acid and copper sulfate. A low voltage but high amperage
electrical current is passed through the anodes, chemical solution and cathodes in order to dissolve copper which is deposited on
initially very thin starting sheets increasing its thickness to produce high grade copper cathodes. During this process, silver , gold and
other metals, including palladium, platinum and selenium, along with other impurities, settle on the bottom of the tank in the form of
anodic slime. This anodic slime is processed in a precious metal plant where silver , gold and selenium are recovered.
        The table below sets forth 2018, 2017 and 2016 production and sales information for our Ilo refinery and precious metals plants:
        In addition to the processing facilities, the refinery has a production control section, a laboratory which provides sample analysis
throughout the Company , a maintenance department, a desalinization plant and other support facilities.
        Other facilities in Ilo are a coquina plant with a production capacity of 200,000 tons per year of seashells and a lime plant with a
capacity of 80,000 tons per year . We also operate an industrial railroad to haul production and supplies between Toquepala, Cuajone
and Ilo.
        The industrial railroad's main equipment includes locomotives of dif ferent types and rolling stock with dif ferent types of cars and
capacities. The track runs in a single 214 kilometer standard gauge line and supports a 30-ton axle load. The total length of the track
system is around 257 kilometers including main yards and sidings. The infrastructure includes 27 kilometers of track under tunnels and
one concrete bridge. The industrial railroad includes a car repair shop which is responsible for maintenance and repair of the car fleet.
Annual tonnage transported is approximately 4.7 million tons.
40          Variance 2018 -
2017  
Refinery    2018  2017  2016  Volume  %  
Cathodes produced  (kt)   292.7   291.4   270.2   1.3  0.4%
Average copper grade  (%)   99.999   99.999   99.998   —  — 
Refined silver produced  (000 Kg)   120.8   123.0   102.5   (2.2) (1.8)%
Refined gold produced  (kg)   282.4   237.7   209.9   44.7  18.8%
Commercial grade selenium produced  (tons)   52.2  49.2  48.7  3.0  5.9%
Key: kt = thousand tons
Table of Contents
MEXICAN OPERA TIONS
        Following is a map indicating the approximate locations of our Mexican mines and processing facilities:
MEXICAN OPEN-PIT  SEGMENT
        Our Mexican open-pit segment operations combine two units of Minera Mexico, La Caridad and Buenavista, which include La
Caridad and Buenavista mine complexes and smelting and refining plants and support facilities, which service both complexes.
41
Table of Contents
        Following is a map indicating the approximate location of, and access to, our Mexican open-pit mine complexes, as well as our
processing facilities:
        We have ongoing maintenance and improvement programs to ensure the satisfactory performance of our equipment. We believe
all our Mexican open-pit segment equipment is in good physical condition and suitable for our operations.
42
Table of Contents
Buenavista
        The Buenavista mining unit operates an open-pit copper mine, two concentrators and three SX-EW  plants. It is located 100 air -
kilometers northwest of La Caridad and 40 kilometers south of the Arizona, U.S.—Mexican border , at an altitude of 1,900 meters
above sea level. It lies on the outskirts of the city of Cananea. Buenavista is connected by paved highways to the border city of Agua
Prieta to the northeast, to the town of Nacozari in the southeast and to the town of Imuris to the west. Buenavista is also connected by
railway to Agua Prieta and Nogales. A municipal airport is located approximately 20 kilometers to the northeast of Buenavista.
        We have concluded our $3.5 billion investment program in Mexico and all of the projects of this program are in full operation.
The program included a third SX-EW  plant, completed in June 2014, with a rated annual capacity of 120,000 tons of copper . A new
concentrator , completed in 2015, with an annual copper production capacity of 188,000 tons. The program includes two molybdenum
plants with a combined annual capacity of 4,600 tons. The first plant was completed in 2013 and the second one, in 2016. Additionally ,
the program included the Crushing, Conveying and Spreading System for Leachable Ore (Quebalix IV), which has been completed on
time and under budget and is currently operating steadily . This project will reduce mining costs as well as increase SX-EW  copper
recovery , allowing the Buenavista unit to reach its copper production capacity of 500,000 tons.
        The original concentrator currently has a nominal milling capacity of 76,700 tons per day . The second concentrator began
operations in 2015 with a nominal milling capacity of 100,000 tons per day . The SX-EW  facilities have a cathode production capacity
of 174,470 tons per year . The Buenavista ore body is considered one of the world's lar gest porphyry copper deposits. Buenavista is the
oldest continuously operated copper mine in North America, with operations dating back to 1899. High grade ore deposits in the
district were mined exclusively using under ground methods. The Anaconda Company acquired the property in 1917. In the early
1940s, Anaconda started developing the first open-pit in Buenavista. In 1990, through a public auction procedure, Minera Mexico
acquired 100% of the Buenavista mining assets for $475 million. Buenavista is currently applying conventional open-pit mining
methods to extract copper ore for further processing in the concentrator .
43
Table of Contents
        The following table shows 2018, 2017 and 2016 production information for Buenavista:
Geology
        The Buenavista mining district lies on the southern cordilleran orogen, which extends from southern Mexico to northwestern
United States. It also falls within the Basin and Range metallogenic province. Geological and structural features in the district are
representative of lar ge, disseminated type, porphyry copper deposits. A calcareous sedimentary sequence of lower Paleozoic age,
lithologically correlated with a similar section in southeastern Arizona, uncomformably overlies Precambrian granite basement. The
entire section was covered by volcanic rocks of Mesozoic age and later intruded by deep seated granodiorite batholith of Tertiary age,
with further quartz monzonite porphyry dif ferentiates of Laramide age.
        Mineralization in the district is extensive covering a surface area of approximately 30 square kilometers. An early pegmatitic
stage associated with bornite-chalcopyrite-molybdenite assemblage was followed by a widespread flooding of hydrothermal solutions
with quartz-pyrite-chalcopyrite. A pervasive quartz-sericite alteration is evident throughout the district's igneous rock fabric.
        An extensive and economically important zone of super gene enrichment, with disseminated and stockworks of chalcocite (Cu2S),
developed below the iron oxide capping. This zone coincides with the topography and has an average thickness of 300 meters. A
mixed zone of secondary and primary
44          2018 - 2017
Variance  
    2018  2017  2016  Volume  %  
Mine annual operating days     365  365  366       
Mine :                   
Total ore mined  (kt)  70,464   69,773   66,328   691  1.0%
Copper grade  (%)  0.537   0.547   0.566   (0.010 ) (1.8)%
Leach material mined  (kt)  145,253   157,802   123,738   (12,549 ) (8.0)%
Leach material grade  (%)  0.242   0.261   0.281   (0.019 ) (7.3)%
Stripping ratio  (x)  3.23  3.14  2.88  0.09  2.9%
Total material mined  (kt)  297,718   288,716   257,395   9,002   3.1%
Concentrator :                   
Total material milled  (kt)  70,328   69,294   66,112  1,034   1.5%
Copper recovery  (%)  86.02   84.12   84.50   1.90  2.3%
Copper concentrate  (kt)  1,371.1   1,361.8   1,329.6   9.3  0.7%
Copper in concentrate  (kt)  325.0   319.0   316.0   6.0  1.9%
Copper concentrate average grade  (%)  23.7  23.42   23.77   0.3  1.3%
SX-EW plant                   
Estimated leach recovery  (%)  60.00   70.00   70.77   (10.00 ) (14.3 )%
SX-EW  cathode production  (kt)  89.3  111.8  131.4   (22.5 ) (20.1 )%
Molybdenum                   
Molybdenum grade  (%)  0.012   0.013   0.013   (0.001 ) (7.7)%
Molybdenum recovery  (%)  58.44   39.85   25.11  18.59   46.7%
Molybdenum concentrate  (kt)  9.62  6.74  3.19  2.88  42.4%
Molybdenum concentrate average
grade  (%)  51.13   51.38   49.45   (0.25 ) (0.5)%
Molybdenum in concentrate  (kt)  8.41  3.46  1.58  4.95  143.0 %
Key: kt = thousand tons
   x = Stripping ratio obtained dividing waste plus leachable material by ore mined.
   The copper and molybdenum grade are total grade.
Table of Contents
sulfides underlay the chalcocite blanket. The hypogene mineralization, principally chalcopyrite (CuFeS2), extensively underlies the ore
body . Molybdenite occurs throughout the deposit and the content tends to increase with depth.
        The Buenavista copper porphyry is considered world-class and unique. The deepest exploration results in the core of the deposit
have confirmed significant increase in copper grades. Similar porphyry copper deposits usually contain lower grades at depth. The
district is also unique for the occurrence of high-grade breccia pipes, occurring in clusters following the trend of the district.
        Current dimensions of the mineralized ore body are 5x3 kilometers, and projects to more than one kilometer at depth. Considering
the geological and economic potential of the Buenavista porphyry copper deposit, it is expected that the operation can support a
sizeable increase in copper production capacity .
Mine Exploration
        In-fill core drilling was conducted in 201 1 at the Buenavista zinc-copper -silver deposit, including directional drilling for
geotechnical purposes. A deep drilling campaign was initiated in 201 1 to explore the extent of the deposit at depth, drilling a total of
3,860 meters in 2012. For short-term mine planning, 6,652 meters were drilled to confirm copper grade and metallur gical recoveries.
Also, in 201 1, a condemnation drilling program was initiated to define areas for future infrastructure, as well as areas where leach and
waste dumps will be deposited. A total of 28,369 meters of core drilling were completed in 201 1. A geohydrology program was
initiated in 201 1 to explore the possibility of groundwater sources within the mine limits, and a total of 29,750 meters of diamond
drilling were drilled in 2012. In addition, 3,797 meters were drilled for water monitoring wells. We did not have a drilling campaign in
2013. In 2014, we performed a drilling program of 20,000 meters in order to verify the reserves. In 2015, we complied with our
drilling program tar get of 15,000 meters to define reserves and to confirm copper and molybdenum grades. In 2018, we drilled 4,434
meters to further define reserves and confirm grades.
Concentrator
        Buenavista uses state-of-the-art computer monitoring systems at the concentrators, the crushing plant and the flotation circuit in
order to coordinate inflows and optimize operations. In the original concentrator , material with a copper grade over 0.38% is loaded
onto trucks and sent to the milling circuit, where giant rotating crushers reduce the size of the ore to approximately one-half of an inch.
The ore is then sent to the ball mills, which grind it to the consistency of fine powder . The finely ground powder is agitated in a water
and reagents solution and is then transported to flotation cells. Air is pumped into the cells producing a froth, which carries the copper
mineral to the surface but not the waste rock, or tailings. Recovered copper , with the consistency of froth, is filtered and dried to
produce copper concentrates with an average copper content of approximately 24%. Concentrates are then shipped by rail to the
smelter at La Caridad.
        In the second concentrator , material with a copper grade over 0.57% is sent to a three-phase milling circuit, where the ore size is
reduced to approximately one-half inch. The ore is then sent to a circuit of six ball mills, which grind it to the consistency of fine
powder . The finely ground powder is agitated in a water and reagents solution and is then transported to flotation cells. Air is pumped
into the cells producing a froth, which carries the copper mineral to the surface but not the waste rock, or tailings. Recovered copper ,
with the consistency of froth, is filtered and dried to produce copper concentrates with an average copper content of approximately
24%. Concentrates are then sent by trucks or by railroad to the La Caridad smelter or to the Guaymas port, at Sonora, for exporting.
        As part of the expansion program for this unit, in 2013 we completed the construction of the first molybdenum plant with an
annual production capacity of 2,000 tons of molybdenum contained in
45
Table of Contents
concentrate. The plant was designed to process 1,500 tons of copper -molybdenum concentrates per day with a recovery of
approximately 80%of copper and 50% of molybdenum content. The molybdenum plant consists of thickeners, homogenizer tanks,
flotation cells, column cells and a holo-flite dryer . The second molybdenum plant obtained its first production lot in July 2016 and
fully initiated operations in November 2016.
SX-EW Plant
        The Buenavista unit operates a leaching facility and three SX-EW  plants. All copper ore with a grade lower than the mill cut-of f
grade of 0.38%, but higher than 0.25%, is delivered to the leach dumps. A cycle of leaching and resting occurs for approximately five
years in the run-of-mine dumps and three years for the crushed leach material.
        There are three irrigation systems for the dumps and eleven dams for the pregnant leach solution (PLS). Plant I has four solvent
extraction tanks with a nominal capacity of 18,000 liters per minute of PLS and 54 electrowinning cells and has a daily production
capacity of 30 tons of copper cathodes with 99.999% purity . Plant II has five trains of solvent extraction with a nominal capacity of
62,000 liters per minute of PLS and 220 cells distributed in two bays and has a daily production capacity of 120 tons of copper
cathodes with 99.9% purity . Plant III has three trains of solvent extraction with a nominal capacity of 167,100 liters per minute of PLS
and 270 cells distributed in two bays and has a daily production capacity of 328 tons of copper cathodes with 99.9% purity . The plant
produces copper cathodes of LME grade A. Please see "Capital Investment Program" under Item 7 for further information.
La Caridad
        The La Caridad complex includes an open-pit mine, concentrator , smelter , copper refinery , precious metals refinery , rod plant,
SX-EW  plant, lime plant and two sulfuric acid plants.
        La Caridad mine and mill are located about 23 kilometers southeast of the town of Nacozari in northeastern Sonora, at an altitude
of 2,000 meters above sea level. Nacozari is about 264 kilometers northeast of the Sonora state capital of Hermosillo and 121
kilometers south of the U.S.—Mexico border . Nacozari is connected by paved highway with Hermosillo and Agua Prieta and by rail
with the international port of Guaymas, and the Mexican and United States rail systems. An airstrip with a reported runway length of
2,500 meters is located 36 kilometers north of Nacozari, less than one kilometer away from the La Caridad copper smelter and
refinery . The smelter and the sulfuric acid plants, as well as the refineries and rod plant, are located approximately 24 kilometers from
the mine. Access is by paved highway and by railroad.
        The concentrator began operations in 1979, the molybdenum plant was added in 1982, the smelter in 1986, the first sulfuric acid
plant in 1988, the SX-EW  plant in 1995, the second sulfuric acid plant in 1997, the copper refinery in 1997, the rod plant in 1998, the
precious metals refinery in 1999 and the dust and ef fluents plant in 2012.
46
Table of Contents
        The table below sets forth 2018, 2017 and 2016 production information for La Caridad:
Geology
        The La Caridad deposit is a typical porphyry copper and molybdenum deposit as seen also in the southwestern basin of United
States. The La Caridad mine uses a conventional open-pit mining method. The ore body is at the top of a mountain, which gives La
Caridad the advantage of a relative low waste-stripping ratio, natural pit drainage and relative short haul for both ore and waste. The
mining method involves drilling, blasting, loading and haulage of ore mill and waste to the primary crushers and the leach materials
and waste to dumps, respectively .
        La Caridad deposit is located in northeastern Sonora, Mexico. The deposit is situated near the crest of the Sierra Juriquipa, about
23 kilometers southeast of the town of Nacozari, Sonora, Mexico. The Sierra Juriquipa rises to elevations of around 2,000 meters in
the vicinity of La Caridad and is one of the many north-trending mountain ranges in Sonora that form a southern extension of the basin
and range province.
        The La Caridad porphyry copper -molybdenum deposit occurs exclusively in felsic to intermediate intrusive igneous rocks and
associated breccias. Host rocks include diorite and granodiorite. These rocks are intruded by a quartz monzonite porphyry stock and by
numerous breccia masses, which contain fragments of all the older rock types.
47          Variance
2018 - 2017  
    2018  2017  2016  Volume  %  
Mine annual operating days     365  365  366       
Mine                   
Total ore mined  (kt)  34,675   34,699   34,648   (24) (0.1)%
Copper grade  (%)  0.353   0.360   0.355   (0.007 ) (1.9)%
Leach material mined  (kt)  30,764   36,540   41,342   5,776   (15.8 )%
Leach material grade  (%)  0.221   0.230   0.228   (0.009 ) (3.9)%
Stripping ratio  (x)  1.78  1.84  1.84  (0.06 ) (3.3)%
Total material mined  (kt)  96,541   98,534   98,435   (1,993 ) (2.0)%
Concentrator                   
Total material milled  (kt)  34,548   34,548   34,539   —  — 
Copper recovery  (%)  87.09   85.51   85.66   1.58  1.9%
Copper concentrate  (kt)  446.2   443.3   447.1   2.9  0.7%
Copper in concentrate  (kt)  106.1   106.3   104.9   (0.2) (0.2)%
Copper concentrate average grade  (%)  23.78   23.98   23.47   (0.20 ) (0.8)%
SX-EW plant                   
Estimated leach recovery  (%)  37.99   38.16   38.26   (0.17 ) (0.5)%
SX-EW  cathode production  (kt)  26.41   28.39   28.31   (1.98 ) (7.0)%
Molybdenum                   
Molybdenum grade  (%)  0.034   0.035   0.035   (0.001 ) (2.9)%
Molybdenum recovery  (%)  83.28   82.50   81.15   0.78  1.0%
Molybdenum concentrate  (kt)  18.0  18.3  18.7  (0.3) (1.6)%
Molybdenum concentrate average grade  (%)  54.61   54.31   52.96   0.3  0.6%
Molybdenum in concentrate  (kt)  9.8  9.9  9.9  (0.1) (1.0)%
Key: kt = thousand tons
   x = Stripping ratio obtained dividing waste plus leachable material by ore mined
   The copper and molybdenum grade are total grade.
Table of Contents
        Super gene enrichment consists of complete to partial chalcosite (Cu2S) replacement of chalcopyrite (CuFeS2). The zone of
super gene enrichment occurs as a flat and tabular blanket with an average diameter of 1,700 meters and thickness generally between 0
and 90 meters.
        Economic ore is found as disseminated sulfurs within the central part of the deposit. Sulfide-filled breccia cavities are most
abundant in the intrusive breccia. This breccia-cavity mineralization occurs as sulfide aggregates which have crystallized in the spaces
separating breccia clasts. Near the mar gins of the deposit, mineralization occurs almost exclusively in veinlets. Ore minerals include
chalcopyrite (CuFeS2), chalcosite (Cu2S) and molybdenite (MoS2).
Mine Exploration
        The La Caridad ore body has been mined for over 35 years. The extent of the model area is approximately 6,000 meters by 4,000
meters with elevation ranging from 750 to 1,800 meters. Seventeen drilling campaigns have been conducted on the property since
1968. These campaigns drilled a total of 3,349 drill holes: 1,186 were diamond drill holes and 2,163 were reverse circulation. We have
also drilled some hammer and percussion drill holes.
        In 2008, La Caridad finished a lar ge exploration program of 50,000 meters. The tar get was to reach to the 900 level in order to
reduce the drilling space and to define the copper and molybdenum mineralization continuity and also carry out metallur gical testing
for the flotation and leaching processes. There was no exploration program in 2009, 201 1 and 2013. In 2012 we drilled 10,000 meters
and further defined the extent of the copper and molybdenum mineralization. From 2014 to 2017 we drilled 96 diamond drill holes
equivalent to 38,984 meters in order to define a high grade ore body located in the south western edge of the pit (Bella Union location).
In 2018 we drilled 18 diamond drill holes equivalent to 5,132 meters in the Bella Union location.
Concentrator
        La Caridad uses state-of-the-art computer monitoring systems at the concentrator , the crushing plant and the flotation circuit in
order to coordinate inflows and optimize operations. The concentrator has a current capacity of 94,500 tons of ore per day .
        Ore extracted from the mine with a copper grade over 0.30% is sent to the concentrator and is processed into copper concentrates
and molybdenum concentrates. The copper concentrates are sent to the smelter and the molybdenum concentrate is sold to a Mexican
customer . The molybdenum recovery plant has a capacity of 2,000 tons per day of copper -molybdenum concentrates. The lime plant
has a capacity of 340 tons of finished product per day .
SX-EW Plant
        Approximately 856.8 million tons of leaching ore with an average grade of approximately 0.251% copper have been extracted
from the La Caridad open-pit mine and deposited in leaching dumps from May 1995 to December 31, 2018. All copper ore with a
grade lower than the mill cut-of f grade 0.30%, but higher than 0.15% copper , is delivered to the leaching dumps. In 1995, we
completed the construction of a SX-EW  facility at La Caridad that has allowed processing of this ore and certain leach ore reserves
that were not mined and has resulted in a reduction in our copper production costs. The SX-EW  facility has an annual design capacity
of 21,900 tons of copper cathodes.
        The plant has three trains of solvent extraction with a nominal capacity of 2,400 cubic meters per hour and 94 electrowinning
cells distributed in one single electrolytic bay . The plant has a daily production capacity of 65 tons of copper cathodes with 99.999%
purity .
48
Table of Contents
Processing Facilities—La Caridad
        Our La Caridad complex includes a smelter , an electrolytic copper refinery , a precious metal refinery , a copper rod plant and an
effluent and dust treatment plant. The distance between this complex and the La Caridad mine is approximately 24 kilometers.
Smelter
        Copper concentrates from Buenavista, Santa Barbara, Charcas and La Caridad are transported by rail and truck to the La Caridad
smelter where they are processed and cast into copper anodes of 99.2% purity . Sulfur dioxide of f-gases collected from the flash
furnace, the El Teniente converter and conventional converters are processed into sulfuric acid at two sulfuric acid plants.
Approximately 2% to 3% of this acid is used by our SX-EW  plants and the balance is sold to third parties.
        All of the anodes produced in the smelter are sent to the La Caridad copper refinery . The actual installed capacity of the smelter is
1,000,000 tons per year , a capacity that is suf ficient to treat all the concentrates of La Caridad and almost 40.5% of total production of
the OMIMSA  I and OMIMSA  II concentrators from Buenavista, and starting in 2010, the concentrates from the IMMSA  mines, as we
closed the San Luis Potosi smelter .
        Other facilities in the smelter include two sulfuric acid plants with capacities of 2,625 and 2,135 tons per day , three oxygen plants
each with a production capacity of 275 tons per day; and one power turbine which generates 1 1.5 MWh.
Refinery
        La Caridad includes an electrolytic copper refinery that uses permanent cathode technology . The installed capacity of the refinery
is 300,000 tons per year . The refinery consists of an anode plant with a preparation area, an electrolytic plant with an electrolytic cell
house with 1,1 15 cells and 32 liberator cells, two cathode stripping machines, an anode washing machine, a slime treatment plant and a
number of ancillary installations. The refinery is producing grade A (LME) and grade 1 (COMEX) copper cathode of 99.99% purity .
Anodic slimes are recovered from the refining process and sent to the slimes treatment plant where additional copper is extracted. The
slimes are then filtered, dried, packed and shipped to the La Caridad precious metals refinery to produce silver and gold.
Precious Metals Plant
        The operations of the precious metal refinery begin with the reception of anodic slimes, which are dried in a steam dryer . After
this, the dried slime is smelted and a gold and silver alloy is obtained, which is known as Dore. The precious metal refinery plant has a
hydrometallur gical stage and a pyrometallur gical stage, besides a steam dryer , Dore casting system, Kaldo furnace, 20 electrolytic cells
in the silver refinery , one induction furnace for fine silver , one silver ingot casting system and two reactors for obtaining fine gold. The
process ends with the refining of the gold and silver alloy . We also recover commercial selenium from the gas produced by the Kaldo
furnace process.
Copper Rod Plant
        A rod plant at the La Caridad complex began operations in 1998 and reached its full annual operating capacity of 150,000 tons in
1999. The plant is producing eight millimeter copper rods with a purity of 99.99%.
Effluent and Dust T reatment Plant
        In 2012, we started operating a dust and ef fluent plant with a treatment capacity of 5,000 tons of smelter dusts per year which will
produce 1,500 tons of copper by-products and 2,500 tons of lead sulfates per year . This plant is designed to reduce dust emissions from
La Caridad metallur gical complex.
49
Table of Contents
        The table below sets forth 2018, 2017 and 2016 production information for the La Caridad processing facilities:
MEXICAN IMMSA  UNIT
        Our IMMSA  unit (under ground mining poly-metallic division) operates five under ground mining complexes situated in central
and northern Mexico and produces zinc, lead, copper , silver and gold, and has a coal mine. These complexes include industrial
processing facilities for zinc, lead, copper and silver . All of IMMSA's mining facilities employ exploitation systems and conventional
equipment. We believe that all the plants and equipment are in satisfactory operating condition. IMMSA's principal mining facilities
include Charcas, Santa Barbara, San Martin, Santa Eulalia and Taxco.
50          Variance
2018 - 2017  
    2018  2017  2016  Volume  %  
Smelter                   
Total copper concentrate smelted  (kt)   1,041.7   997.7   1,004.8   44.0  4.4%
Anode copper production  (kt)   287.7   271.8   269.5   15.9  5.9%
Average copper content in anode  (%)   99.49   99.41   99.38   0.08  0.1%
Average smelter recovery  (%)   96.9  97.4  96.8  (0.5) (0.5)%
Sulfuric acid production  (kt)   1,002.5   976.4   1,007.9   26.1  2.7%
Refinery                   
Refined cathode production  (kt)   239.2   228.1   224.2   11.1  4.9%
Refined silver production  (000 kg)   264.3   222.5   256.9   41.8  18.8%
Refined gold production  (Kg)   1,228.5   1,264.2   4,805.8   (35.7 ) (2.8)%
Rod Plant                   
Copper rod production  (kt)   147.1   133.1   144.5   14.0  10.5%
Key: kt = thousand tons
Kg = kilograms
Table of Contents
        The table below sets forth 2018, 2017 and 2016 production information for our Mexican IMMSA  unit:
Charcas
        The Charcas mining complex is located 1 11 kilometers north of the city of San Luis Potosi in the State of San Luis Potosi,
Mexico. Charcas is connected to the state capital by a paved highway of 130 kilometers. It was discovered in 1573 and operations in
the 20th century began in 191 1. The complex includes three under ground mines (San Bartolo, Rey-Reina and La Aurora) and one
flotation plant that produces zinc, lead and copper concentrates, with significant amounts of silver . The Charcas mine is characterized
by low operating costs and good quality ores and is situated near the zinc refinery . Regarding its geology , economic ore is found as
replacement sulfurs in carbonates host rock. The ore mineralogy is comprised predominantly of calcopyrite (CuFeS2), sphalerite
(ZnS), galena (PbS) and silver minerals as diaphorite (Pb2Ag3Sb3S8). The Charcas mine is now Mexico's lar gest producer of zinc.
        In October 2015, an earthquake damaged some under ground facilities as well as the access to the mine. Consequently , normal
mine operations were interrupted. In 2016, operations took place normally and a production compliance of 97% was reached.
51          Variance
2018 - 2017  
    2018  2017  2016  Volume  %  
Average annual operating
days(*)     353  352  353       
Total material mined and milled  (kt)   3,277   2,871   3,031   406  14.1%
Zinc:                   
Zinc average ore grade  (%)   2.51  2.76  2.81  (0.25 ) (9.0)%
Zinc average recovery  (%)   86.07   86.75   86.93   (0.68 ) (0.8)%
Zinc concentrate produced  (kt)   135.3   129.2   140.0   6.1  4.7%
Zinc concentrate average grade  (%)   52.30   53.13   52.96   (0.83 ) (1.6)%
Zinc in concentrate  (kt)   70.8  68.7  73.9  2.1  3.1%
Lead:                   
Lead average ore grade  (%)   0.91  0.95  1.00  (0.04 ) (5.0)%
Lead average recovery  (%)   74.32   73.91   80.41   0.41  0.6%
Lead concentrate produced  (kt)   39.1  33.6  40.7  5.5  16.4%
Lead concentrate average grade  (%)   56.51   60.29   59.88   (3.8) (6.3)%
Lead in concentrate  (kt)   22.1  20.2  24.4  1.9  9.4%
Copper:                   
Copper average ore grade  (%)   0.35  0.35  0.37  —  — 
Copper average recovery  (%)   54.56   54.65   56.83   (0.09 ) (0.2)%
Copper concentrate produced  (kt)   23.5  21.3  24.9  2.2  10.3%
Copper concentrate average
grade  (%)   26.45   25.71   25.86   0.73  2.9%
Copper in concentrate  (kt)   6.2  5.5  6.4  0.7  12.7%
Silver:                   
Silver average ore grade  (ounces)   2.25  2.19  2.35  0.06  2.7%
Silver average recovery  (%)   76.59   75.72   79.41   0.87  1.2%
Silver concentrate average grade  (%)   28.5  25.8  30.4  2.7  10.5%
Silver in concentrates  ((000) ounces)   5,649.5   4,759.9   5,622.0   889.6   18.7%
kt = thousand tons
(*) Weighted average annual operating days based on total material mined and milled in the three active mines:
Charcas, Santa Barbara, and Santa Eulalia.
Table of Contents
        Mine exploration in 2015 included 32,144 meters of surface drilling and 20,536 meters from under ground stations, which
increased our reserves by 3,089,797 tons. For 2016, it included 20,000 meters of surface drilling and 20,754 meters from under ground
stations, which increased our reserves by 1,778,728 tons. For 2017, it included 5,999 meters of surface drilling and 23,098 meters from
under ground stations, which increased our reserves by 2,004,577 tons. For 2018, 1 1,757 meters of diamond drilling and 20,285 meters
from under ground stations were drilled, which increased our reserves by 2,282,322 tons. For 2019, 25,000 meters of diamond drilling
are planned to identify additional reserves.
Santa Barbara
        The Santa Barbara mining complex is located approximately 26 kilometers southwest of the city of Hidalgo del Parral in southern
Chihuahua, Mexico. The area can be reached via paved road from Hidalgo del Parral, a city on a federal highway . It was discovered in
1536 and mining activities in the 20th century began in 1913. Santa Barbara includes three main under ground mines (San Diego,
Segovedad and Tecolotes) and a flotation plant and produces lead, copper and zinc concentrates, with significant amounts of silver .
        Regarding its geology , economic ore minerals include sphalerite (ZnS), marmatite (ZnFeS), galena (PbS), chalcopyrite (CuFeS2)
and tetrahedrite (CuFe12Sb4S13). Due to the variable characteristics of the ore bodies, four types of mining methods are used:
shrinkage stoping, long-hole drilled open stoping, cut-and-fill stoping and horizontal bench stoping. The ore, once crushed, is
processed in the flotation plant to produce concentrates.
        Mine exploration in 2015 included 5,977 meters of surface drilling and 16,609 meters from under ground stations, which increased
our reserves by 1,135,750 tons. For 2016, it included 14,300 meters from under ground stations, which increased our reserves by
1,416,756 tons. For 2017, it included 2,571 meters of surface drilling and 1 1,838 meters from under ground stations, which increased
our reserves by 613,872 tons. For 2018, 10,769 meters from under ground stations were drilled, which increased our reserves by
418,345 tons. For 2019, 14,160 meters of diamond drilling are planned to identify additional reserves.
Santa Eulalia
        The mining district of Santa Eulalia is located in the central part of the state of Chihuahua, Mexico, approximately 26 kilometers
east of the city of Chihuahua, and is connected to the city of Chihuahua by a paved road (highway no. 45). It was discovered in 1590
but exploitation began in 1870. The main mines in Santa Eulalia are The Buena Tierra mine and the San Antonio mine.
        Regarding its geology , the mineralization corresponds in its majority to ore skarns: silicoaluminates of calcium, iron and
manganese with variable quantities of lead, zinc, copper and iron sulfides. Economic ore include sphalerite (ZnS), galena (PbS) and
small quantities of pyrar gyrite (Ag3SbS3).
        Mine exploration in 2015 included 3,014 meters from under ground stations, which increased our reserves by 64,800 tons. For
2017, it included 936 meters from under ground stations, which increased our reserves by 60,525 tons. For 2018, 1,930 meters from
under ground stations were drilled, which increased our reserves by 249,930 tons. For 2019, 8,700 meters of diamond drilling from
under ground stations in San Antonio and Buena Tierra are planned to identify additional reserves.
San Martin and Taxco
        The San Martin mining complex is located in the municipality of Sombrerete in the western part of the state of Zacatecas,
Mexico. It was discovered in 1555 and mining operations in the 20th century
52
Table of Contents
began in 1949. The complex includes an under ground mine and a flotation plant. The ore body contains lead, copper and zinc
concentrates, with significant amounts of silver .
        After eleven years of an illegal stoppage, we resumed control of the San Martin mine in August 2018. The San Martin facilities
deteriorated during this period and we are undertaking a major renovation in order to restart operations, with an estimated capital
budget of $77 million.
        The Taxco mining complex has been on strike since July 2007. It is located on the outskirts of the city of Taxco in the northern
part of the state of Guerrero, Mexico. It was discovered in 1519 and mining activities in the 20th century began in 1918. The complex
includes several under ground mines (San Antonio, Guerrero and Remedios) and a flotation plant. The ore contains lead and zinc
concentrates, with some amounts of gold and silver .
        There was no mine exploration drilling in San Martin and Taxco during the three years ended December 31, 2018 because of the
strikes. Please see Note 12 "Commitments and Contingencies—Labor matters" to our consolidated financial statements.
Processing Facilities—San Luis Potosi
        Our San Luis Potosi electrolytic zinc refinery is located in the city of San Luis Potosi, in the state of San Luis Potosi, Mexico. The
city of San Luis Potosi is connected to our refinery by a major highway .
Zinc Refinery
        The San Luis Potosi electrolytic zinc refinery was built in 1982 and was designed to produce 105,000 tons of refined zinc per year
by treating up to 200,000 tons of zinc concentrate from our own mines, principally Charcas, which is located 1 13 kilometers from the
refinery . The refinery produces special high grade zinc (99.995%), high grade zinc (over 99.9%) and zinc-based alloys with aluminum,
lead, copper or magnesium in varying quantities and sizes depending on market demand. Refined silver and gold production is
obtained from tolling services provided by a third party mining company .
        The electrolytic zinc refinery has an acid plant, a steam recovery boiler and a roaster . There is also a calcine processing area with
five leaching stages: neutral, hot acid, intermediate acid, acid, purified fourth and jarosite, as well as two stages for solution purifying.
        The table below sets forth 2018, 2017 and 2016 production information for our San Luis Potosi zinc refinery:
53          Variance
2018 - 2017  
    2018  2017  2016  Volume  %  
Total zinc concentrate treated  (kt)   204.0   202.3   202.0   1.7  0.84%
Refined zinc produced  (kt)   107.5   104.4   106.1   3.1  3.0%
Sulfuric acid produced  (kt)   184.2   180.6   181.3   3.6  2.0%
Refined silver produced  (kt)   16.8  14.5  10.5  2.3  15.9%
Refined gold produced  (k)   23.8  17.8  14.4  6.0  33.1%
Refined cadmium produced  (kt)   0.6  0.6  0.7  —  — 
Average refinery recovery  (%)   94.4  94.3  93.8  0.1  0.1%
kt = thousand tons
Table of Contents
Nueva Rosita Coal and Coke Complex
        The Nueva Rosita coal and coke complex began operations in 1924 and is located in the state of Coahuila, Mexico, on the
outskirts of the city of Nueva Rosita near the Texas border . It includes (a) an under ground coal mine, which has been closed since
2006; (b) an open-pit mine with a yearly capacity of approximately 350,000 tons of coal; (c) a coal washing plant with a capacity of
900,000 tons per year that produces high quality clean coal; and d) a re-engineered and modernized 21 ovens coke facility capable of
producing 100,000 tons of coke per year (metallur gical, nut and fine) of which, 95,000 tons are metallur gical coke. There is also a by-
product plant to clean the coke gas oven in which tar , ammonium sulfate and light crude oil are recovered. There are also two boilers,
which produce 80,000 pounds of steam that is used in the by-products plant. In September 2017, a decision was made to close the coke
plant, and initiate the cleaning and remediation process.
Carbon mine exploration
        In Coahuila, an intensive exploration program of diamond drilling has identified two additional areas, Esperanza with a potential
for more than 30 million tons of "in place" mineralized coal and Guayacan with a potential for 15 million tons of "in place"
mineralized coal, that could be used for a future coal-fired power plant. In 2015, we drilled 3,046 meters and increased our reserves by
465,509 tons. In 2016, we drilled 1,052 meters and finished the last stage of exploration in two areas for open pit, San Jose y Cuatro y
medio, and increased reserves by 607,532 tons. In 2017 and 2018, we did not undertake exploration activites.
        The table below sets forth 2018, 2017 and 2016 production information for our Nueva Rosita coal and coke complex:
ORE RESER VES
        Ore reserves are those estimated quantities of proven and probable material that may be economically mined and processed for
extraction of their mineral content, at the time of the reserve determination. "Proven" (measured) reserves are reserves for which
(a) quantity is computed from dimensions revealed in outcrops, trenches, workings or drill holes; (b) grade and/or quality are
computed from the results of detailed samplings; and (c) the sites for inspection, sampling and measurement are spaced so closely and
the geologic character is so well defined that size, shape, depth and mineral content of reserves are well-established. "Probable"
(indicated) reserves are reserves for which quantity and grade and/or quality are computed from information similar to that used for
proven (measured) reserves, but the sites for inspection, sampling, and measurement are farther apart or are otherwise less adequately
spaced. The degree of assurance, although lower than that for proven (measured) reserves, is high enough to assume continuity
between points of observation. "Mineralized material," on the other hand, is a mineralized body that has been delineated by
appropriately spaced
54          Variance 2018 - 2017  
    2018  2017  2016  Volume  %  
Coal mined—open-pit  (kt)   108.6   132.7   194.3   (24.1 ) (18.0 )%
Average BTU content  BTU/Lb   10,022   10,022   9,485   —  — 
Average percent sulfur  %   1.38  1.38  1.49  —  — 
Clean coal produced  (kt)   42.8  66.4  86.2  (23.6 ) (36.0 )%
Coke tonnage produced  (kt)   —  45.4  71.7  (45.4 ) (100.0 )%
Average realized price—Coal  ($ per ton)   39.0  29.2  40.2  9.8  34.0%
Average realized price—Coke  ($ per ton)   265.0   233.0   215.0   32.0  14.0%
kt = thousand tons
Table of Contents
drilling and/or under ground sampling to support the reported tonnage and average grade of metal(s). Such a deposit does not qualify as
a reserve until legal and economic feasibility are concluded based upon a comprehensive evaluation of unit costs, grade, recoveries and
other material factors.
        Our proven and probable ore reserve estimates are based on engineering evaluations of assay values derived from the sampling of
drill holes and other openings. We believe that the samplings taken are spaced at intervals close enough and the geological
characteristics of the deposits are suf ficiently well defined to render the estimates reliable. The ore reserves estimates include
assessments of the resource, mining and metallur gy, as well as economic, marketing, legal, environmental, governmental, social and
other necessary considerations.
        Our Peruvian operations, including the Toquepala and Cuajone reserves, are classified into proven (measured), probable
(indicated) and possible (inferred) categories based on a Relative Confidence Bound Index ("RCB Index") that measures our level of
geologic knowledge and confidence in each block. The RCB index is a measure of relative confidence in the block grade estimate.
This approach combines the local variability of the composites used to krig a block with the kriging variance and incorporates the use
of confidence intervals in measuring uncertainty of the block estimates relative to each other . The final resource classification is then
based on the distribution of these RCB values for blocks above 0.05% copper . It is the distribution that is used to find the breaks
between proven/probable and probable/possible.
        Our Mexican operations, including the Buenavista and La Caridad reserves, are calculated using a mathematical block model and
applying the MineSight software system. The estimated grades per block are classified as proven and probable. These grades are
calculated applying a three-dimensional interpolation procedure and the inverse distance squared. Likewise, the quadrant method or
spherical search is implemented in order to limit the number of composites that will af fect the block's interpolated value. The
composites data is derived from the geological exploration of the ore body . In order to classify the individual blocks in the model, a
thorough geostatistical variogram analysis is conducted, taking into consideration the principal characteristics of the deposit. Based on
this block model classification, and with the implementation of the Lerch-Grossman algorithm, and the MineSight Pit Optimizer
procedure, mineable reserves are determined. The calculated proven and probable reserves include those blocks that are economically
feasible to mine by open-pit method within a particular mine design.
        For the IMMSA  unit, the basis for reserve estimations are sampling of mining operations and drilling exploration, geographical
and topographic surveys, tracking down all the foregoing in the corresponding maps, measurement, calculation and interpretation
based on the maps and reports from the mines, the mills and/or smelters. Mineral reserves are mineral stock which is estimated for
extraction, to exploit if necessary , to sell or utilize economically , all or in part, taking into consideration the quotations, subsidies,
costs, availability of treatment plants and other conditions which we estimate will prevail in the period for which reserves are being
calculated. The reserves are divided into proven (85% reliable or more according to statistical studies) and probable (70% - 80%
reliable or more according to statistical studies) categories according to their level of reliability and availability . In order to comply
with SEC regulations, proven reserves is a classification that can only be used for such mineral found on top of the last level of the
mine (either mineral up to 15 meters below the last level or below the first 15 meters only with suf ficient drilling (25 or 30 meters
between each drill)).
        Annually our engineering department reviews in detail the reserve computations. In addition, our engineering department reviews
the computation when changes in assumptions occur . Changes can occur for price or cost assumptions, results in field drilling or new
geotechnical parameters. We also engage third party consultants to review mine planning procedures.
        Pursuant to SEC guidance, the reserves information in this report are calculated using average metals prices over the most recent
three years unless otherwise stated. We refer to these three-year
55
Table of Contents
average metals prices as "current prices." Our current prices for copper are calculated using prices quoted by COMEX, and our current
prices for molybdenum are calculated according to Platt's Metals Week. Unless otherwise stated, reserves estimates in this report use
$2.64 per pound for copper and $8.88 per pound for molybdenum, both current prices as of December 31, 2018. The current prices for
copper and molybdenum were $2.50 and $7.07 as of December 31, 2017 and $2.61 and $8.10 as of December 31, 2016, respectively .
        For internal ore reserve estimation, our management uses long-term metal price assumptions for copper and molybdenum, which
are intended to approximate average prices over the long term. At December 31, 2018 and 2017, we considered $2.90 per pound of
copper and $7.50 per pound of molybdenum.
        The average metal prices over the last 10 and 15 years periods and the continued positive outlook for these metals have led us to
use these prices. For other forecast and planning purposes, particularly related to mer ger and acquisition activities, our management
considers other price scenarios. These changes, however , do not af fect the preparation of our financial statements.
        For the years 2018, 2017 and 2016, we have used reserve estimates based on current average prices as of the most recent three
years then ended to determine amortization of mine development and intangible assets.
        We periodically reevaluate estimates of our ore reserves, which represent our estimate as to the amount of unmined copper
remaining in our existing mine locations that can be produced and sold at a profit. These estimates are based on engineering
evaluations derived from samples of drill holes and other openings, combined with assumptions about copper market prices and
production costs at each of our mines.
        The persons responsible for ore reserve calculations are as follows:
Peruvian open-pit :
Cuajone mine—Edgar A. Peña Valenzuela, Mine Engineering Superintendent
Toquepala mine—W ilbert Perez, Mine Engineering Superintendent
Tia Maria project :
Jaime Arana Murriel, Investment Projects Leaching Manager
Los Chancas project :
Jaime Arana Murriel, Investment Projects Leaching Manager
Juan Fernando Núñez Chavez, Technical Manager of Explorations
Mexican open-pit :
La Caridad Mine—Gilberto Quintana, Mine Manager
Buenavista mine—Jesus Molinares, Engineering and Mine Planning Superintendent
IMMSA  unit:
Santa Barbara—Raul Guerrero Valdez, Manager
Charcas—Juan J. Aguilar , Planning and Control Superintendent
Santa Eulalia—Jose Rovelo Saenz, Manager
Taxco—Jose M. Espinosa, Manager
San Martin—Maria I. Carrillo, Planning Manager
56
Table of Contents
El Arco project :
Michelle P . Cerecer A., Planning Engineer (with support of Hexagon Mining)
El Pilar project :
Michelle P . Cerecer A., Planning Engineer (with support of Hexagon Mining)
Pilares project :
Michelle P . Cerecer A., Planning Engineer (with support of Hexagon Mining)
        For more information regarding our reserve estimates, please see Item 7 "Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial
Condition and Results of Operations—Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates—Ore Reserves."
57
Table of Contents
Ore Reserves Estimated at Curr ent Prices:
        The table below details our estimated proven and probable copper and molybdenum reserves at December 31, 2018 based on the
last three year average market prices following SEC guidance:
 
 PERUVIAN
OPEN-PIT
UNIT  MEXICAN OPEN-
PIT
UNIT             
     
 DEVELOPMENT
PROJECTS 
 
 Cuajone
Mine(1)  Toquepala
Mine(1)  Buenavista
Mine(1)  La
Caridad
Mine(1)  TOTAL
OPEN-
PIT
MINES  MEXICAN
IMMSA
UNIT(2) 
  Tia
Maria  El Arco El Pilar  Pilar es 
Mineral
Reserves                                
Metal prices:                                
Copper ($/lb.)   2.6424   2.6424   2.6424   2.6424   2.642   2.642   2.642   2.642   2.642   2.642  
Molybdenum
($/lb.)   8.876   8.876   8.876   8.876   8.876   —  —  8.876   —  — 
Cut-of f grade   0.215 % 0.234 % 0.171 % 0.112% 0.176 % —  —  0.207 % 0.150 % 0.150 %
Proven                                
Sulfide ore
reserves (kt)   1,016,568   1,885,610   2,760,641   2,119,208   7,782,027   18,102   —  1,368,191   —  13,026  
Average grade:                                
Copper   0.570 % 0.556 % 0.461 % 0.227 % 0.435 % 0.460 % —  0.443 % —  0.768 %
Molybdenum   0.019 % 0.033 % 0.008 % 0.029 % 0.021 % —  —  0.007 % —  — 
Lead   —  —  —  —  —  1.210 % —  —  —  — 
Zinc   —  —  —  —  —  2.710 % —  —  —  — 
Leachable
material (kt)   725  653,441   1,912,370   429,028   2,995,564   —  213,559   188,689   255,756   249 
Leachable
material
grade   0.625 % 0.214 % 0.169 % 0.185 % 0.181 % —  0.329 % 0.330 % 0.297 % 0.241 %
Probable                                
Sulfide ore
reserves (kt)   749,563   179,051   1,341,362   1,124,643   3,394,619   29,166   —  985,147   —  31,447  
Average grade:                                
Copper   0.408 % 0.367 % 0.407 % 0.212 % 0.341 % 0.510 % —  0.404 % —  0.692 %
Molybdenum   0.016 % 0.012 % 0.009 % 0.030 % 0.018 % —  —  0.007 % —  — 
Lead   —  —  —  —  —  0.890 % —  —  —  — 
Zinc   —  —  —  —  —  2.750 % —  —  —  — 
Leachable
material (kt)   3,093   1,038,707   739,766   150,927   1,932,493   —  517,552   66,103   13,225   928 
Leachable
material
grade   0.752 % 0.146 % 0.147 % 0.174 % 0.150 % —  0.368 % 0.159 % 0.275 % 0.252 %
Total                                
Sulfide ore
reserves (kt)   1,766,131   2,064,661   4,102,003   3,243,851   11,176,646   47,268   —  2,353,337   —  44,473  
Average grade:                                
Copper   0.501 % 0.540 % 0.443 % 0.222 % 0.406 % 0.491 % —  0.427 % —  0.715 %
Molybdenum   0.018 % 0.031 % 0.008 % 0.030 % 0.020 % —  —  0.007 % —  — 
Lead   —  —  —  —  —  1.013 % —  —  —  — 
Zinc   —  —  —  —  —  2.735 % —  —  —  — 
Leachable
material (kt)   3,818   1,692,148   2,652,136   579,955   4,928,057   —  731,1 11  254,792   268,981   1,178  
Leachable
material
grade   0.728 % 0.172 % 0.163 % 0.182 % 0.169 % —  0.356 % 0.286 % 0.296 % 0.250 %
Waste (kt)   4,672,393   7,738,634   5,742,183   2,353,527   20,506,737   —  654,239   2,107,905   418,441   162,033  
Total material
(kt)   6,442,342   11,495,443   12,496,322   6,177,333   36,61 1,440   47,268   1,385,350   4,716,034   687,422   207,684  
Stripping ratio
((W+L)/O)   2.65  4.57  2.05  0.90  2.28  —  —  1.00  —  3.67 
Stripping ratio
(W/(L+O))   2.64  2.06  0.85  0.62  1.27  —  0.89  0.81  1.56  3.55 
Leachable
material                                
Reserves in
stock (kt)   18,332   1,550,834   1,676,237   866,31 1  4,111,714   —  —  —  —  — 
Average
copper grade   0.486 % 0.155 % 0.161 % 0.243 % 0.178 % —  —  —  —  — 
In pit reserves:                                
Proven (kt)   725  653,441   1,912,370   429,028   2,995,564   —  213,559   188,689   255,756   249 
Average
copper grade   0.625 % 0.214 % 0.169 % 0.185 % 0.181 % —  0.329 % 0.330 % 0.297 % 0.241 %
Probable (kt)   3,093   1,038,707   739,766   150,927   1,932,493   —  517,552   66,103   13,225   928 
Average
copper grade   0.752 % 0.146 % 0.147 % 0.174 % 0.150 % —  0.368 % 0.159 % 0.275 % 0.252 %
Total leachable
reserves (kt)   22,150   3,242,982   4,328,373   1,446,266   9,039,771   —  731,1 11  254,792   268,981   1,178  
Average
copper grade   0.528 % 0.164 % 0.162 % 0.219 % 0.173 % —  0.356 % 0.286 % 0.296 % 0.250 %
Copper
contained in
ore reserves
in pit(kt)(3)   8,876   14,060   22,495   8,257   53,688   232  2,603   10,777   796  321 
58kt = Thousand tons
W= Waste, L= Leachable material; O= Ore.
(1) The Cuajone, Toquepala, Buenavista and La Caridad concentrator recoveries calculated for these reserves were 85.2%, 87.5%, 82.8%, and 81.7%,
respectively , obtained by using recovery formulas according to the dif ferent milling capacity and geo-metallur gical zones.
(2) The IMMSA  unit includes the Charcas, Santa Barbara, San Martin, Santa Eulalia and Taxco mines. Zinc and lead contained in ore reserves are as
follows:
(in thousand tons)  Proven  Probable  Total  
Zinc   490.6   802.1   1,292.6  
Lead   219.0   259.6   478.6  
(3) Copper contained in ore reserves for open-pit mines is (i) the product of sulfide ore reserves and the average copper grade proven plus (ii) the
product of sulfide ore reserves and the average copper grade probable plus (iii) the product of in-pit leachable reserves and the average copper
grade. Copper contained in ore reserves for under ground mines is the product of sulfide ore reserves and the average copper grade.
Table of Contents
Metal Price Sensitivity:
        In preparing the sensitivity analysis, we recalculated our reserves based on the assumption that current average metal prices were
20% higher and 20% lower , respectively , than the actual current average prices for year -end 2018. Reserve results of this sensitivity
analysis are not proportional to the increase or decrease in metal price assumptions.
59  INCREASE—20%  DECREASE—20%  
  Open-Pit
Mines  IMMSA  Development
Projects  Open-Pit
Mines  IMMSA  Development
Projects  
Mineral Reserves                    
Metal prices:                    
Copper ($/lb.)   3.171   3.171   3.171   2.114  2.114  2.114 
Molybdenum ($/lb.)   10.651   —  10.651   7.101   —  7.101  
Cut-of f grade   0.148 % —  0.166 % 0.219 % —  0.273 %
Proven                    
Sulfide ore reserves (kt)   8,725,233   18,523   1,421,635   5,981,795   16,616   1,303,826  
Average grade:                    
Copper   0.420 % 0.450 % 0.437 % 0.470 % 0.470 % 0.462 %
Molybdenum   0.020 % —  0.007 % 0.021 % —  0.008 %
Lead   —  1.190 % —  —  1.270 % — 
Zinc   —  2.670 % —  —  2.840 % — 
Leachable material (kt)   2,559,596   —  686,837   3,421,331   —  568,105  
Leachable material grade   0.159 % —  0.313 % 0.201 % —  0.329 %
Probable                    
Sulfide ore reserves (kt)   4,051,016   29,884   1,098,034   2,396,010   26,959   855,646  
Average grade:                    
Copper   0.326 % 0.500 % 0.398 % 0.388 % 0.530 % 0.443 %
Molybdenum   0.017 % —  0.007 % 0.018 % —  0.008 %
Lead   —  0.880 % —  —  0.920 % — 
Zinc   —  2.710 % —  —  2.850 % — 
Leachable material (kt)   1,904,207   —  621,267   1,670,539   —  557,596  
Leachable material grade   0.133 % —  0.335 % 0.164 % —  0.355 %
Total                    
Sulfide ore reserves (kt)   12,776,249   48,407   2,519,670   8,377,805   43,575   2,159,472  
Average grade:                    
Copper   0.390 % 0.481 % 0.420 % 0.447 % 0.507 % 0.455 %
Molybdenum   0.019 % —  0.007 % 0.020 % —  0.008 %
Lead   —  0.999 % —  —  1.053 % — 
Zinc   —  2.695 % —  —  2.846 % — 
Leachable material (kt)   4,463,803   —  1,308,104   5,091,870   —  1,125,701  
Leachable material grade   0.148 % —  0.323 % 0.189 % —  0.342 %
Waste (kt)   23,329,106   —  3,582,155   16,066,791   —  2,725,797  
Total material (kt)   40,569,158   48,407   7,409,929   29,536,466   43,575   6,010,970  
Stripping ratio ((W+L)/O)   2.18  —  1.94  2.53  —  1.78 
Stripping ratio (W/(L+O))   1.35  —  0.94  1.19  —  0.83 
Leachable material                    
Reserves in stock (kt)   4,111,714   —  —  4,111,714   —  — 
Average copper grade   0.178 % —  —  0.178 % —  — 
In pit reserves:                    
Proven (kt)   2,559,596   —  686,837   3,421,331   —  568,105  
Average copper grade   0.159 % —  0.313 % 0.201 % —  0.329 %
Probable (kt)   1,904,207   —  621,267   1,670,539   —  557,596  
Average copper grade   0.133 % —  0.335 % 0.164 % —  0.355 %
Total leachable reserves (kt)   8,575,517   —  1,308,104   9,203,584   —  1,125,701  
Average copper grade   0.162 % —  0.323 % 0.184 % —  0.342 %
Copper  contained in or e reserves
in pit(kt)(1)   56,437   233  14,792   47,055   221  13,660  
(1) Copper contained in ore reserves for open-pit mines is (i) the product of sulfide ore reserves and the average copper grade proven plus (ii) the
product of sulfide ore reserves and the average copper grade probable plus (iii) the product of in-pit leachable reserves and the average copper
grade. Copper contained in ore reserves for under ground mines is the product of sulfide ore reserves and the average copper grade.
Table of Contents
Internal Or e Reserves Estimates:
        The table below details our proven and probable copper and molybdenum reserves as of December 31, 2018, estimated based on
long-term price assumptions of $2.90 for copper and $7.50 for molybdenum. As discussed on page 52 the presentation of these internal
ore reserve estimates are not compliant with SEC requirements, as the long-term price assumptions dif fer from the current prices used
pursuant to SEC guidance. These internal ore reserve estimates do not af fect the preparation of our financial statements.
 
 PERUVIAN
OPEN-PIT
UNIT  MEXICAN OPEN-
PIT
UNIT             
     
 DEVELOPMENT
PROJECTS 
 
 Cuajone
Mine  Toquepala
Mine  Buenavista
Mine  La
Caridad
Mine  TOTAL
OPEN-
PIT
MINES  MEXICAN
IMMSA
UNIT(1) 
  Tia
Maria  El Arco El Pilar  Pilar es 
Mineral
Reserves                                
Metal prices:                                
Copper
($/lb.)   2.900   2.900   2.900   2.900   2.900   2.900   2.900   2.900   2.900   2.900  
Molybdenum
($/lb.)   7.500   7.500   7.500   7.500   7.500   —  —  7.500   —  — 
Cut-of f grade   0.200 % 0.224 % 0.150 % 0.102 % 0.162 % —  —  0.208 % 0.150 % 0.144 %
Proven                                
Sulfide ore
reserves(kt)   1,020,580   2,022,766   3,035,978   2,185,681   8,265,005   18,119  —  1,373,089   —  13,026  
Average grade:                                
Copper   0.569 % 0.547 % 0.441 % 0.224 % 0.425 % 0.460 % —  0.442 % —  0.768 %
Molybdenum   0.019 % 0.032 % 0.008 % 0.030 % 0.021 % —  —  0.007 % —  — 
Lead   —  —  —  —  —  1.210 % —  —  —  — 
Zinc   —  —  —  —  —  2.710 % —  —  —  — 
Leachable
material (kt)   867  578,504   1,800,652   423,903   2,803,926   —  217,124   188,689   270,825   249 
Leachable
material
grade   0.562 % 0.208 % 0.155 % 0.185 % 0.171 % —  0.325 % 0.330 % 0.295 % 0.241 %
Probable                                
Sulfide ore
reserves(kt)   778,781   234,842   1,475,012   1,204,523   3,693,158   28,991   —  991,741   —  31,447  
Average grade:                                
Copper   0.400 % 0.363 % 0.390 % 0.211% 0.332 % 0.510 % —  0.403 % —  0.692 %
Molybdenum   0.015 % 0.011% 0.009 % 0.030 % 0.017 % —  —  0.007 % —  — 
Lead   —  —  —  —  —  0.890 % —  —  —  — 
Zinc   —  —  —  —  —  2.760 % —  —  —  — 
Leachable
material (kt)   3,736   930,576   722,123   153,901   1,810,336   —  528,940   66,103   15,259   928 
Leachable
material
grade   0.668 % 0.154 % 0.136 % 0.173 % 0.149 % —  0.363 % 0.159 % 0.274 % 0.252 %
Total                                
Sulfide ore
reserves(kt)   1,799,361   2,257,608   4,510,990   3,390,204   11,958,163   47,111  —  2,364,831   —  44,473  
Average grade:                                
Copper   0.496 % 0.528 % 0.424 % 0.220 % 0.397 % 0.491 % —  0.425 % —  0.715 %
Molybdenum   0.017 % 0.030 % 0.008 % 0.030 % 0.020 % —  —  0.007 % —  — 
Lead   —  —  —  —  —  1.013 % —  —  —  — 
Zinc   —  —  —  —  —  2.741 % —  —  —  — 
Leachable
material (kt)   4,603   1,509,080   2,522,775   577,804   4,614,262   —  746,064   254,792   286,084   1,178  
Leachable
material
grade   0.648 % 0.175 % 0.149 % 0.182 % 0.162 % —  0.352 % 0.286 % 0.294 % 0.250 %
Waste (kt)   4,638,378   8,458,803   5,925,063   2,559,035   21,581,279   —  672,277   2,096,412   441,510   162,033  
Total material
(kt)   6,442,342   12,225,491   12,958,828   6,527,043   38,153,704   47,111  1,418,341   4,716,035   727,594   207,684  
Stripping ratio
((W+L)/O)   2.58  4.42  1.87  0.93  2.19  —     0.99     3.67 
Stripping ratio
(W/(L+O))   2.57  2.25  0.84  0.64  1.30  —  0.90  0.80  1.54  3.55 
Leachable
material                                
Reserves in
stock (kt)   18,332   1,550,834   1,676,237   866,31 1  4,111,714   —  —  —  —  — 
Average
copper grade   0.486 % 0.155 % 0.161 % 0.243 % 0.178 % —  —  —  —  — 
In-pit reserves:                                
Proven (kt)   867  578,504   1,800,652   423,903   2,803,926   —  217,124   188,689   270,825   249 
Average
copper grade   0.562 % 0.208 % 0.155 % 0.185 % 0.171 % —  0.325 % 0.330 % 0.295 % 0.241 %
Probable(kt)   3,736   930,576   722,123   153,901   1,810,336   —  528,940   66,103   15,259   928 
Average
copper grade   0.668 % 0.154 % 0.136 % 0.173 % 0.149 % —  0.363 % 0.159 % 0.274 % 0.252 %
Total leachable
reserves   22,935   3,059,914   4,199,012   1,444,1 15  8,725,976   —  746,064   254,792   286,084   1,178  
Average
copper grade   0.519 % 0.165 % 0.154 % 0.219 % 0.169 % —  0.352 % 0.286 % 0.294 % 0.250 %
60Copper
contained in
ore reserves
(kt)(2)   8,955   14,561   22,886   8,510   54,912   231  2,626   10,779   841  321 
(kt) = Thousand tons
W= Waste, L= Leachable material; O= Ore.
(1) The IMMSA  unit includes the Charcas, Santa Barbara, San Martin, Santa Eulalia and Taxco mines. Zinc and lead contained in ore reserves are as
follows:
(in thousand tons)  Proven  Probable  Total  
Zinc   491.0   800.2   1,291.2  
Lead   219.2   258.0   477.3  
Copper contained in ore reserves for open-pit mines is (i) the product of sulfide ore reserves and the average copper grade plus (ii) the
product of in-pit leachable reserves and the average grade of copper . Copper contained in ore reserves for under ground mines is the
product of sulfide ore reserves and the average copper grade.
Table of Contents
OVER VIEW  OF BLOCK MODEL  RECONCILIA TION PROCESS
        We apply the following block model to mill reconciliation procedure.
        The following stages are identified at the Cuajone, Toquepala, Buenavista and La Caridad mines:
1. The mine geologists gather the necessary monthly statistical data from our information system ("SRP"), which provides
ore tons milled and ore grades in the concentrator .
2. Mined areas are topographically determined and related boundaries are built.
3. Using the "interactive planner" option in our mining software (MineSight), ore tons and grades are calculated inside
mined areas over the block model. At this point the current cut-of f grade is considered.
4. In the final stage, accumulated tons mined, weighted average grade for ore material and leach is compared to data
coming from our SRP  system.
        Tonnage and grade reconciliation for 2018 are as follows:
        If the estimation error appears greater than 3%, a detailed evaluation is done to review the dif ferences, which normally could
result in more in-fill drilling, in order to better understand the geological characteristics (grade, rock type, mineralization and
alteration) and the spacing of drill holes which are considered in the ore body zone.
AVERAGE DRILL-HOLE SP ACING
        The following is the average drill-hole spacing for proven and probable sulfide reserves as of December 31, 2018:
EXPLORA TION ACTIVITIES
        We are engaged in ongoing extensive exploration to locate additional ore bodies in Peru, Mexico, Argentina, Ecuador and Chile.
We also conduct exploration in the areas of our current mining operations. We invested $29.6 million in exploration programs in 2018,
$28.8 million in 2017 and $40.1 million in 2016 and we expect to spend approximately $44.5 million in exploration programs in 2019.
        Currently , we have direct control of 37,622 hectares and 147,974 hectares of exploration concessions in Peru and in Mexico,
respectively . We also currently hold 63,453 hectares, 42,615 hectares and 7,298 hectares of exploration concessions in Argentina, Chile
and Ecuador , respectively .
61  Long Range Model  Mill  Variance  
Mine  Tons
(thousands)  % Copper  Tons
(thousands)  % Copper  Tons
(thousands)  % Copper  
Cuajone   29,613   0.645   29,571   0.651   42  (0.006 )
Toquepala   25,127   0.659   22,701   0.686   2,426   (0.027 )
Buenavista   70,784   0.531   70,465   0.537   319  (0.006 )
La Caridad   30,654   0.378   34,675   0.353   (4,021 ) 0.025  
  Proven  Probable  
  (average spacing
in meters)  
Cuajone   75.67   114.43  
Toquepala   77.83   117.71  
Buenavista   54.23   106.91  
La Caridad   46.52   104.71  
Table of Contents
Peru
        Los Chancas.     This property , located in the department of Apurimac in southern Peru, is a copper and molybdenum porphyry
deposit. Current estimates indicate the presence of 545 million tons of mineralized material with a copper content of 0.59%,
molybdenum content of 0.04% and 0.039 grams of gold per ton and 181 million tons of mineralized leachable material with a total
copper content of 0.357%. In 2018, we continued developing of social and environmental improvements for the local communities,
and plan to complete the environmental impact assessment in 2020.
        Michiquillay .    This property , located in the district of La Encañada, in the province and department of Cajamarca in northern
Peru, is a copper porphyry deposit. In February 2018, we won the public bidding process for the project, and in June 2018 we signed
the acquisition contract with the Peruvian government. In 2019, we plan to develop social and environmental programs for the local
communities. We also expect to verify and update the estimated mineral resources through an initial 40,000 meter diamond drilling
program.
        Other Peruvian Pr ospects.     During 2018, we completed a diamond drilling program of 6,952 meters on prospects with
mineralization evidence of copper porphyry deposits, with inconclusive results.
        In addition, we conducted a 28,600 meter diamond drilling program at a western mountains project in southern Peru, which
allowed us to define and estimate existing mineral resources in oxide zones and copper porphyritic mineralization.
        For 2019, we plan to conduct a diamond drilling program of 13,000 meters at various prospects, which have evidence of copper
and copper -gold porphyry deposits, located on the coast of Peru. We also expect to conduct a diamond drilling program of 10,000
meters in the western mountains of Peru, north of our Cuajone operations. Additionally , we will continue with several prospection
programs at other Peruvian metallogenic zones.
Mexico
        In addition to exploration and drilling programs at existing mines, we are currently conducting exploration to locate mineral
deposits at various other sites in Mexico. The following are some of the more significant exploration projects:
        Buenavista-Zinc.     The Buenavista-Zinc site is located in the state of Sonora, Mexico and is part of the northwest Buenavista ore
body . It is a skarn deposit containing zinc, copper , silver and lead sulfide mineralization. The deposit contains approximately
102.6 million tons of mineralized material, containing 1.88% of zinc, 0.47% of copper and 17 grams of silver per ton. In 2016, we
reviewed the geological model of the deposit and the lithological description of prior drill holes, which were analyzed using infrared
spectrometry . The results were included in the reserves database. Currently , we have concluded the conceptual design of the flotation
plant. Additionally , the mining plan and economic studies have been prepared by external companies.
        The Chalchihuites.     This is a skarn type deposit located in the state of Zacatecas, close to the San Martin mining unit. Drilling
programs conducted between 1980 and 2014 identified 12.6 million of mineralized material with an average silver content of 1 10
grams per ton, 2.66% of zinc, 0.37% of lead and 0.67% of copper . Current results indicate that mineralization consists of a complex
mixture of oxides and sulfides of silver , lead and zinc that requires additional metallur gical research. In 2017, we started a new drilling
program of 21,000 meters in order to continue the metallur gical research and testing. In 2018, this exploration program of 48 drill
holes was completed. This program has been carried out in compliance with QA/QC protocol that includes testing of specific density
of the dif ferent rocks and mineralized types and geochemistry sampling. In addition, 5,000 meters of core sample from the drilling
program were analyzed with a hyperspectral scanner , and a study of 498 kilometers of
62
Table of Contents
hyperspectral imaging was conducted in order to recognize the geology of the entire Chalchihuites mineral district.
        Bella Union (La Caridad).     This prospect is a mineralized copper and molybdenum breccia deposit; the site is located at less
than one kilometer from the border of La Caridad pit. In 2016 and 2017, we conducted a 28,217 meter drilling program to define the
geometry of the deposit. The results identified 36.2 million tons of mineralized material with an average of 0.44% copper content and
0.05% of molybdenum. In May 2018, the drilling in this project was completed, totaling 46,400 meters distributed in 1 13 drill holes.
The test results were received in June 2018. Currently , work on the estimation of resources and reserves is in progress in order to
define the potential of the Bella Union project.
        Campo Medio (Santa Eulalia).     This prospect is located close to the west border of the Santa Eulalia mine. Preliminary
geological surveying in the zone indicates the possible presence of replacement ore bodies in limestone, similar to ore bodies currently
being mined at Santa Eulalia. During 2016, we completed a geochemical and geological survey of 800 hectares between the two
currently operating mines and from which we obtained in the past more than 25 million metric tons of ore. The results obtained
indicate the presence of potential mineralization in five dif ferent zones. In 2017, 1,000 geochemical samples were taken to define in
more detail the five zones highlighted by the geological survey . In 2018, the surveying of 800 hectares using an electrical geophysical
method was completed. With the results obtained from this study , a drilling program of 10,000 meters was designed to test the
geophysical anomalies, and will be conducted in 2019.
Chile
        El Salado (Montoner o).    A copper -gold prospect located in the Atacama region, northern Chile is being explored for copper and
molybdenum porphyry since 2014. In 2016, we conducted a diamond drilling program of 12,169 meters in order to define mineral
classification. In 2017, we drilled a total of 9,939 meters and finished the conceptual study , which is currently under evaluation.
        Other Chilean Pr ospects.     In 2018, we concluded exploration work at the Blanco y Negro prospect, located in the Antofagasta
region. We drilled 3,574 meters and the results were not satisfactory . For 2019, we plan to conduct a diamond drilling program of
10,500 meters at three tar gets located in the copper -gold strip of the Antofagasta region in the north of Chile.
Ecuador
        Chaucha.     The Ruta del Cobre ("Copper Road") project is located west of Cuenca city and south of Guayaquil. The
mineralization is characteristic of a copper -molybdenum porphyry system which is being explored since 2014. In 2016, we conducted
a diamond drilling program of 25,081 meters, in compliance with the socioenvironmental regulations of Ecuador . This drilling allowed
us to consolidate the information obtained for a better geological and economic interpretation. In 2017, we conducted a diamond
drilling program of 12,980 meters, which has allowed us to consolidate information in order to begin the conceptual study for an initial
economic evaluation of the project. In 2018, we drilled 6,812 meters which allowed us to consolidate project information. In addition,
the economic evaluation of the project is being concluded. For 2019, we plan to continue with the development of social and
environmental activities and obtain authorization from the local authorities to move from the exploration phase into the economic
evaluation phase of the project.
Argentina
        In 201 1, we started exploration activities in Argentina. In 2015, we performed geological exploration in the Salta, Rio Negro and
Neuquen provinces where we expected to locate copper
63
Table of Contents
porphyry with precious metals epithermal systems. In 2017, we performed prospection and geological evaluation work in the
provinces of San Juan and Rio Negro. In 2018, we conducted a diamond drilling program of 5,815 meters in order to continue with the
exploration of the silver -gold epithermal systems, denominated the Caldera project, located in the Rio Negro province. The results are
currently under evaluation and we expect to conclude exploration work in 2019. Also for 2019, we plan to drill 5,000 meters in the
Esperanza project, also located in the Rio Negro province.
ITEM 3.    LEGAL  PROCEEDINGS
        Reference is made to the information under the caption "Litigation Matters" in the consolidated financial statement Note 12
"Commitments and contingencies."
ITEM 4.    MINE SAFETY  DISCLOSURE
        Not applicable.
64
Table of Contents
PART II
ITEM 5.    MARKET  FOR REGISTRANT'S COMMON EQUITY , RELA TED ST OCKHOLDER MA TTERS AND ISSUER
PURCHASES OF  EQUITY  SECURITIES
SCC COMMON ST OCK:
        SCC's common stock is traded on the New York Stock Exchange ("NYSE") and the Lima Stock Exchange ("BVL"). SCC's
common stock symbol is SCCO on both the NYSE and the BVL. At December 31, 2018, there were 954 holders of record of our
common stock.
DIVIDEND AND ST OCK MARKET  PRICES:
        The table below sets forth the cash dividends paid per share of capital stock and the high and low stock prices on both the NYSE
and the BVL  for the periods indicated.
 
        On January 24, 2019, the Board of Directors ("BOD") authorized a dividend of $0.40 per share paid on February 26, 2019, to
shareholders of record at the close of business on February 12, 2019. In addition, as part of the settlement of claims brought on behalf
of the Company and its shareholders against Grupo Mexico, AMC and certain current and former directors (together with Grupo
Mexico and AMC, the "Defendants") a dividend of $0.44428 per share was payable on February 21,2019 to shareholders of record at
the close of business on February 1 1, 2019, other than the Defendants. The settlement dividend, totaling $36.5 million is an obligation
of Grupo Mexico and AMC and therefore, have been funded by them. In addition, Grupo Mexico and AMC paid $13.5 million of legal
fees. For more information, please see "Litigation matters—Corporate operations" in Note 12 "Commitments and Contingencies" of
our consolidated financial statements.
        For a description of limitations on our ability to make dividend distributions, see "Management's Discussion and Analysis of
Financial Condition and Results of Operations—"Liquidity and Capital Resources" and Note 10 "Financing" to our consolidated
financial statements.
65  For the year  2018  
   
 NYSE:  BVL: 
 
 Dividend
per Shar e 
Quarters  High  Low  High  Low  
1st  $ 0.30 $55.85  $45.47  $55.10  $45.63  
2nd  $ 0.30 $57.34  $45.90  $57.37  $45.85  
3rd  $ 0.40 $49.36  $39.80  $49.55  $39.70  
4th  $ 0.40 $43.75  $29.78  $43.76  $29.50  
Year  $ 1.40 $57.34  $29.78  $57.37  $29.50  
  For the year  2017  
   
 NYSE:  BVL: 
 
 Dividend
per Shar e 
Quarters  High  Low  High  Low  
1st  $ 0.08 $39.10  $32.38  $39.15  $32.27  
2nd  $ 0.12 $36.48  $33.01  $36.44  $33.00  
3rd  $ 0.14 $41.77  $34.75  $41.64  $34.65  
4th  $ 0.25 $47.63  $39.76  $47.56  $40.54  
Year  $ 0.59 $47.63  $32.38  $47.56  $32.27  
Table of Contents
DIRECT ORS' ST OCK AWARD PLAN
        The following table sets forth certain information related to our shares held as treasury stock for the Directors' stock award plan at
December 31, 2018:
        Equity Compensation Plan Information
        For additional information see Note 13—"Stockholders Equity—Directors' Stock Award Plan."
SCC COMMON ST OCK REPURCHASE PLAN:
        In 2008, our BOD authorized a $500 million share repurchase program that has since been increased by the BOD and is currently
authorized to $3 billion. Pursuant to this program, the Company purchased common stock as shown in the table below . These shares
are available for general corporate purposes. The Company may purchase additional shares of its common stock from time to time,
based on market conditions and other factors. This repurchase program has no expiration date and may be modified or discontinued at
any time.
        There has not been any activity in the SCC share repurchase program since the third quarter of 2016. The NYSE closing price of
SCC common shares at December 31, 2018 was $30.77 and the maximum number of shares that the Company could purchase at that
price is 2.7 million shares.
        As a result of the repurchase of shares of SCC's common stock, Grupo Mexico's direct and indirect ownership was 88.9% as of
December 31, 2018 and 2017.
SHAREHOLDER RETURN PERFORMANCE PRESENT ATION
        Set forth below is a line graph comparing the yearly change in the cumulative total returns on the Company's common stock
against cumulative total return on the S&P  500 Stock Index and the S&P  Metals and Mining Select Industry Index, for the five year
period ending December 31, 2018. The chart below analyzes the total return on SCC's common stock for the period commencing
December 31, 2013 and ending December 31, 2018, compared to the total return of the S&P  500 and the S&P  Metals and Mining
Select Industry Index for the same five-year period.
66Plan Category  Number  of securities to be
issued upon exer cise of
outstanding options  Weighted-average
exercise price of
outstanding options  Number  of securities
remaining available
for futur e issuance  
Directors' stock award plan  N/A  N/A   237,200  
       
 Total
Number  of
Shar es
Purchased
as Part of
Publicly
Announced Plan  Maximum
Number  of
Shar es that
May Yet Be
Purchased
Under  the
Plan @ $30.77(1)   
Period
 Total
Number  of
Shar es
Purchased     
 Average
Price Paid
per Shar e  Total Cost
($ in millions) 
From  To  
2008  2012   46,914,486  $ 18.72   46,914,486      878.1  
2013:     10,245,000   27.47   57,159,486      281.4  
2014:     22,71 1,428   30.06   79,870,914      682.8  
2015:     36,689,052   27.38   116,559,966      1,004.4  
2016:     2,937,801   24.42   119,497,767      71.7 
Total
purchased     119,497,767  $ 24.42      2,653,018  $ 2,918.4  
                                      
                   
(1) NYSE closing price of SCC common shares at December 31, 2018.
Table of Contents
Comparison of Five Year Cumulative Total Return *
SCC Stock, S&P  500 Index and S&P  Metals and Mining Select Industry Index **
* Total return assumes reinvestment of dividends
** The comparison assumes $100 invested on December 31, 2013
        The foregoing Performance Graph and related information shall not be deemed "soliciting material" or "filed" with the SEC or
subject to Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, nor shall such information be incorporated by reference into
any future filing under the Securities Act of 1933 or Securities Exchange Act of 1934, each as amended, except to the extent that the
Company specifically incorporates it by reference into such filing.
67  Total Return per  Year  
  2014  2015  2016  2017  2018  
SCC   (0.3)% (6.3)% 23.1% 50.8% (33.0 )%
S&P  500   11.4% (0.7)% 9.5% 19.4% (6.2)%
S&P  M + MS   (26.6 )% (51.5 )% 102.4 % 19.4% (27.0 )%
Table of Contents
ITEM 6.    SELECTED FINANCIAL  DATA
FIVE-YEAR SELECTED FINANCIAL  AND ST ATISTICAL  DATA
        The selected historical financial data presented below as of and for the five years ended December 31, 2018, includes certain
information that has been derived from our consolidated financial statements. The selected financial data should be read in conjunction
with Item 7, "Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations" and the consolidated financial
statements and notes thereto. The financial data is presented in millions, except per share and capital stock amounts and financial
ratios.
 
 
68  Years Ended December  31,  
Statement of Earnings Data  2018  2017  2016  2015  2014  
Net sales(1)  $7,096.7  $6,654.5  $5,379.8  $5,045.9  $5,787.7  
Operating income   2,881.2   2,618.9   1,564.2   1,414.4   2,232.7  
Net income   1,548.2   732.4   778.8   741.1   1,337.9  
Net income attributable to:                 
Non-controlling interest   5.2  3.9  2.3  4.7  4.9 
Southern Copper Corporation  $1,543.0  $ 728.5  $ 776.5  $ 736.4  $1,333.0  
Per share amounts:                 
Earnings basic and diluted  $ 2.00 $ 0.94 $ 1.00 $ 0.93 $ 1.61 
Dividends paid  $ 1.40 $ 0.59 $ 0.18 $ 0.34 $ 0.46 
  As of December  31,  
Balance Sheet Data  2018  2017  2016  2015  2014  
Cash and cash equivalents  $ 844.6  $1,004.8  $ 546.0  $ 274.5  $ 364.0  
Total assets(2)   14,484.8   13,780.1   13,234.3   12,593.2   11,393.9  
Total long-term debt, including
current portion(2)   5,960.1   5,957.1   5,954.2   5,951.5   4,180.9  
Total liabilities(2)   7,871.9   7,630.7   7,363.4   7,294.0   5,557.3  
Total equity  $6,612.9  $6,149.4  $5,870.9  $5,299.2  $5,836.6  
  Years Ended December  31,  
Statement of Cash Flows Data  2018  2017  2016  2015  2014  
Net income  $1,548.2  $ 732.4  $ 778.8  $ 741.1  $1,337.9  
Depreciation, amortization and
depletion   674.3   671.1   647.1   510.7   445.0  
Cash provided by operating
activities   2,235.1   1,976.6   923.1   879.8   1,355.9  
Capital investments(3)   (1,121.4 ) (1,023.5 ) (1,118.5) (1,149.6 ) (1,529.8 )
Debt repaid   —  —  —  (266.0 ) — 
Debt incurred   —  —  —  2,045.8   — 
Dividends paid to common
stockholders   (1,082.3 ) (456.1 ) (139.3 ) (271.2 ) (381.0 )
SCC common shares buyback   —  —  (71.7 ) (1,004.4 ) (682.7 )
Increase (decrease) in cash and cash
equivalents  $ (160.2 )$ 458.8  $ 271.5  $ (89.5 )$(1,308.7 )
Table of Contents
 
69  Years Ended December  31,  
Capital Stock  2018  2017  2016  2015  2014  
Common shares outstanding—basic
and diluted (in thousands)   773,044   773,028   773,016   775,942   812,618  
NYSE Price—high  $ 57.34  $ 47.63  $ 34.98  $ 33.14  $ 33.54  
NYSE Price—low  $ 29.78  $ 32.38  $ 22.29  $ 24.40  $ 26.08  
Book value per share   8.50  7.90  7.54  6.78  7.14 
P/E ratio(4)   15.42   50.35   31.82   28.19   17.52  
  Years Ended December  31,  
Financial Ratios  2018  2017  2016  2015  2014  
Gross mar gin(5)   42.5% 41.0% 31.6% 31.9% 43.2%
Operating income mar gin(6)   40.6% 39.4% 29.1% 28.0% 38.6%
Net mar gin(7)   21.7% 10.9% 14.4% 14.6% 23.0%
Current assets to current liabilities   2.61  2.71  2.57  2.70  2.07 
Net debt/Net capitalization(8)   42.6% 44.4% 47.7% 48.9% 37.3%
Total debt/T otal capitalization(9)   47.4% 49.2% 50.4% 52.9% 41.7%
(1) Please see copper and metal prices for the last 10 years on Item 1 "Business—Metal Prices" and sales volumes
for the last three years on Item 7 "Management Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations—Segments Results Analysis."
(2) In the second quarter of 2015, the Company adopted ASU 2015-03 whereby debt issuance costs are presented net
of the related debt. This adoption was applied on a retrospective basis. As a consequence, certain balance sheet
data for 2014 has been modified to reflect this presentation.
(3) Please see Item 7 "Management Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations—
Capital Investment Programs."
(4) Represents closing Price divided by Earnings per share.
(5) Represents net sales less cost of sales (including depreciation, amortization and depletion), divided by net sales,
as a percentage.
(6) Represents operating income divided by net sales, as a percentage.
(7) Represents net income divided by net sales, as a percentage.
(8) Net debt, which is a Non-GAAP  measure, is defined as total debt minus cash, cash equivalents and short-term
investments balance. Please see Item 7 "Management Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results
of Operations—Financing Section". During 2015, management decided to include short-term investments as a
reduction to debt to arrive at net debt given that the Company can liquidate these investments at any time as
needed. This change was applied on a retrospective basis for all years presented herein.
Net capitalization is defined as Net debt plus Equity .
Net debt/Net capitalization: represents net debt divided by net debt plus equity . Net debt to net capitalization is a
Non-GAAP  measure. This non-GAAP  information should not be considered in isolation or as substitute for
measures of performance determined in accordance with GAAP . A reconciliation of our net debt to net
capitalization ratio to total debt and capitalization as presented in the consolidated balance sheet is presented
under the subheading "Non-GAAP  information reconciliation" in Item 7 "Management's Discussion and Analysis
of Financial Condition and Results of Operations."
(9) Total capitalization is defined as Total debt plus Equity .
Total debt/T otal capitalization: represents total debt divided by total debt plus equity .
Table of Contents
ITEM 7.    MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANAL YSIS OF  FINANCIAL  CONDITION AND RESUL TS OF
OPERA TIONS
EXECUTIVE SUMMAR Y
        This Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations r elates to and should be r ead
together with our Audited Consolidated Financial Statements as of and for each of the years in the thr ee-year period ended
December 31, 2018. Ther efore, unless otherwise noted, the discussion below of our financial condition and r esults of operations is for
Southern Copper Corporation and its subsidiaries (collectively , "SCC," "Southern Copper ," "the Company ," "our ," and "we") on a
consolidated basis for all periods. Our financial r esults may not be indicative of our futur e results.
        This discussion contains forwar d-looking statements that ar e based on management's curr ent expectations, estimates and
projections about our business and operations. Our actual r esults may differ materially fr om those curr ently anticipated and expr essed
in the forwar d-looking statements as a r esult of a number of factors. See Item 1 "Business—Cautionary Statement."
EXECUTIVE OVER VIEW
        Business:     Our business is primarily the production and sale of copper . In the process of producing copper , a number of valuable
metallur gical by-products are recovered, which we also produce and sell. Market forces outside of our control lar gely determine the
sale prices for our products. Our management, therefore, focuses on value creation through copper production, cost control, production
enhancement and maintaining a prudent capital structure to remain profitable. We endeavor to achieve these goals through capital
spending programs, exploration ef forts and cost reduction programs. Our aim is to remain profitable during periods of low copper
prices and to maximize financial performance in periods of high copper prices.
        We are one of the world's lar gest copper mining companies in terms of production and sales with our principal operations in Peru
and Mexico. We also have an active ongoing exploration program in Chile, Argentina and Ecuador . In addition to copper , we produce
significant amounts of other metals, either as a by-product of the copper process or in a number of dedicated mining facilities in
Mexico.
        Net sales in 2018 were $7.1 billion, the highest amount in Southern Copper history .
        In 2018, we invested $1,121.4 million in capital programs, along with $29.6 million in our exploration ef forts. We believe this
commitment to growth will continue to benefit our Company , our investors, our neighboring communities, and the countries in which
we operate.
        We believe we hold the world's lar gest copper reserve position. At December 31, 2018, our copper ore reserves, calculated at a
copper price of $2.90 per pound, totaled 69.7 million tons of contained copper , at the following locations:
        Outlook:     Various key factors af fect our outcome. These include, but are not limited to, the following:
• Changes in copper , molybdenum, silver and zinc prices:   In 2018, the average LME and COMEX per pound copper
prices were $2.96 and $2.93, approximately 5.7% and 4.6% higher than 2017,
70Copper  contained in or e reserves  Thousand tons  
Mexican open-pit   31,396  
Peruvian operations   23,516  
IMMSA   231 
Development projects   14,567  
     
Total   69,710  
          
     
Table of Contents
respectively . In 2018, per pound LME spot copper prices ranged from $2.64 to $3.29. Average molybdenum and zinc
prices increased in 2018 by 45.9% and 1.5%, respectively , compared to 2017. The average silver price decreased by
8.1% in 2018 compared to 2017.
• Sales structure:   In the last three years, approximately 80% of our revenues came from the sale of copper , 6% from
molybdenum, 5% from silver , 5% from zinc and 4% from various other products, including gold, sulfuric acid and
other materials.
• Copper:   During the last quarter of 2018, the LME per pound copper price decreased 9.3%, from an average of $3.09 in
the fourth quarter of 2017 to $2.80 in the fourth quarter of 2018. Despite a stable copper physical market, we believe
this fall in prices reflects the market uncertainty in connection with a possible escalation of trade protectionism between
the United States and China. We anticipate a recovery in copper prices in 2019.
In 2018, refined copper demand growth was approximately 3.0%. On the supply side, there were no significant
disruptions due to labor negotiations or technical dif ficulties, leading to an unexpected growth in supply of
approximately 2.5%, much higher than the 1.5% forecasted by several analysts at the beginning of 2018. Even though
the market was in balance with these marks, there was a significant reduction of copper inventories in 2018, reflecting a
refined copper scarcity . From its March 2018 peak of 1.4 million tons, as of January 2019, inventories in the major
warehouses decreased to 813,000 tons, a 42% reduction.
For 2019, our base case assumes a slowdown in world's economic growth, but not a recession. Consequently , we
believe refined copper demand will grow at about 2.5% and supply at 1.5%, yielding a year of market deficit that will
put upward pressure on copper prices.
• Molybdenum:   It represented approximately 7.2% of our sales in 2018. Molybdenum prices averaged $1 1.86 per pound
in 2018, compared to $8.13 in 2017 a 45.9% increase.
Molybdenum is mainly used for the production of special alloys of stainless steel that require significant hardness,
corrosion and heat resistance. A new use for this metal is in lubricants and sulfur filtering of heavy oils and shale gas
production.
• Zinc:   It has very good long term fundamentals due to its significant industrial consumption and the expected
production. Zinc represented 4.6% of our sales in 2018.
• Silver:   We believe that silver prices will have support due to its industrial uses as well as being perceived as a value
shelter in times of economic uncertainty . Silver represented 4.2% of our sales in 2018.
• Production:   In the fourth quarter of 2018, we began operations at the new Toquepala concentrator which produced
8,630 tons of copper in 2018. For 2019 we expect to produce 986,700 tons of copper , a 11.7% increase from the
883,689 tons we produced in 2018.
We also expect to produce 21.4 million ounces of silver , about 24% higher than the 2018 production of 17.3 million
ounces, mainly resulting from the contribution of the San Martin, Santa Barbara and Toquepala mines. In 2019, we
expect to produce 96,400 tons of zinc from our mines, up 36% from 2018 production of 70,778 tons, as a result of the
recovery of production at the San Martin mine. Additionally , we expect to produce 25,300 tons of molybdenum, an
increase of 15% due to the significant contribution of the molybdenum plant at the new Toquepala concentrator .
71
Table of Contents
• Cost:   Our operating costs and expenses for the three years ended December 31, 2018 have increased in total in each of
the years. Our comparison of costs for the three year period is as follows:
Operating costs and expenses in 2018 increased $179.9 million, compared to 2017, mainly due to higher cost of sales in
all our operating segments, principally due to increases in fuel costs and other materials.
Operating costs and expenses in 2017 increased $220.0 million, compared to 2016, mainly due to higher cost of sales in
all our operating segments, as well as higher depreciation, amortization and depletion at our Mexican operations. This
was partially of fset by lower depreciation, amortization and depletion at our Peruvian operations, lower exploration
expenses and a $10.2 million credit related to a previously accrued environmental remediation cost at our Mexican
operations which was reversed in the first quarter of 2017.
• Capital investments:   Capital investments were $1,121.4 million for 2018. This is 9.6% higher than in 2017, and
represented 72.4% of net income. Our growth program to develop the full production potential of our Company is
underway . We are currently developing a new or ganic growth plan to increase our copper volume production to
1.5 million tons by 2025 with the development of new projects.
        For 2019, the Board of Directors approved a capital investment program of $1,752.8 million.
KEY  MATTERS
        We discuss below several matters that we believe are important to understand our results of operations and financial condition.
These matters include (i) earnings, (ii) production, (iii) "operating cash costs" as a measure of our performance, (iv) metal prices,
(v) business segments, (vi) the ef fect of inflation and other local currency issues and (vii) our capital investment and exploration
program.
        Earnings:     The table below highlights key financial and operational data of our Company for the three years ended December 31,
2018 (in millions, except copper price and per share amounts):
        Net sales in 2018 of $7.1 billion were the highest in our history and were higher than in 2017 by $442.2 million. This increase
was mainly the result of higher copper (+5.7%) and molybdenum (+45.9%) prices and higher sales volumes of silver (+15.3%) and
molybdenum (+3.3%), partially of fset by lower silver prices (–8.1%) and lower zinc sales volume (–1.0%). Net sales in 2017 were
higher than in 2016 by $1,274.7 million. This increase was mainly the result of higher metal prices and slightly higher sales volumes
of copper (+1.8%) and zinc (+2.0%), partially of fset by lower sales volumes of silver (–2.1%) and molybdenum (–1.7%).
72  2018  2017  2016  
Operating costs and expenses (in millions)  $4,215.5  $4,035.6  $3,815.6  
Percentage increase from prior year   4.5% 5.8% 5.1%
        Variance  
  2018  2017  2016  2018 - 2017  2017 - 2016  
Copper price LME   2.96  2.80  2.21  0.16  0.59 
Pounds of copper sold   1,953.0   1,959.2   1,923.9   (6.2) 35.3 
Net sales  $7,096.7  $6,654.5  $5,379.8  $ 442.2  $1,274.7  
Operating income  $2,881.2  $2,618.9  $1,564.2  $ 262.3  $1,054.7  
Income before income taxes  $2,589.4  $2,302.7  $1,256.0  $ 286.7  $1,046.7  
Net income attributable to SCC  $1,543.0  $ 728.5  $ 776.5  $ 814.5  $ (48.0 )
Earnings per share  $ 2.00 $ 0.94 $ 1.00 $ 1.06 $ (0.06 )
Dividends per share  $ 1.40 $ 0.59 $ 0.18 $ 0.81 $ 0.41 
Table of Contents
        The two lar gest components of operating costs and expenses are cost of sales and depreciation, amortization and depletion, both
of which increased in each of the years in the periods above. In 2018, cost of sales increased by $156.2 million and depreciation,
amortization and depletion increased by $3.2 million. The increase in cost of sales in 2018 was mainly due to higher fuel costs, higher
workers' participation expense and inventory consumption. In 2017, cost of sales increased by $218.7 million and depreciation,
amortization and depletion increased by $24.0 million. The increase in cost of sales in 2017 was mainly due to inventory consumption,
foreign currency ef fect and higher workers' participation expense.
        Net income attributable to SCC in 2018 was 1 11.8% higher than in 2017 mainly due to the one-time, non-cash income tax
adjustment of $785.9 million recorded in 2017 as a result of the U.S. income tax legislation enacted in the fourth quarter of 2017. Net
income attributable to SCC in 2017 was 6.2% lower than in 2016 also due to this adjustment. See Note 7 "Income Taxes", of our
consolidated financial statements.
        Income before income taxes in 2018 was $2,589.4 million or 12.5% higher than in 2017 mainly due to higher sales. Income
before income taxes in 2017 was $2,302.7 million or 83.3% higher than 2016 income before taxes of $1,256.0 million. This
improvement resulted from higher sales and cost reductions achieved in electricity (–8.0%), tires (–9.4%), and other cost elements.
        Production :    The table below highlights, mine production data of our Company for the three years ended December 31, 2018:
        The table below highlights copper production data at each of our mines for the three years ended December 31, 2018:
2018 compar ed to 2017:
        Copper mine production in 2018 increased 0.8% to 1,948.2 million pounds from 1,933.4 million pounds in 2017. This increase
was due to:
• Higher production at the Toquepala and Cuajone mines due to higher ore grades and recoveries, which was partially
offset by
73        Variance  
        2018 - 2017  2017 - 2016  
(million pounds, except silver—million ounces)  2018  2017  2016  Volume  %  Volume  %  
Copper   1,948.2   1,933.4   1,984.1   14.8  0.8% (50.7 ) (2.6)%
Molybdenum   48.5  47.0  47.9  1.5  3.1% (0.9) (1.9)%
Zinc   156.0   151.4   163.1   4.6  3.1% (11.7) (7.2)%
Silver   17.3  15.9  16.2  1.4  8.7% (0.3) (1.5)%
        Variance  
        2018 - 2017  2017 - 2016  
Copper
(in million pounds):  2018  2017  2016  Volume  %  Volume  %  
Toquepala   375.4   326.4   311.8  49.0  15.0% 14.6  4.7%
Cuajone   354.0   348.5   378.0   5.5  1.6% (29.5 ) (7.8)%
La Caridad   292.1   296.9   293.8   (4.8) (1.6)% 3.1  1.1%
Buenavista   913.0   949.5   986.4   (36.5 ) (3.8)% (36.9 ) (3.7)%
IMMSA   13.7  12.1  14.1  1.6  13.4% (2.0) (14.7 )%
                       
Total mined copper   1,948.2   1,933.4   1,984.1   14.8  0.8% (50.7 ) (2.6)%
                       
Table of Contents
• Lower production at the Buenavista mine due to lower SX-EW  copper production (–20.1%). In 2018, the Company
initiated a 12-month corrective program to overcome this temporary reduction in production. The program includes
depositing the minerals in dif ferent leaching pads depending on the characteristics of the ore. Also, the Company has
implemented improvements and controls in the ore fragmentation that occurs in the blasting, to avoid the fine materials
that may cause clogging in the recovery process.
        Molybdenum production increased 3.1% in 2018 compared to 2017, principally due to higher production at the Buenavista mine
due to higher recoveries. This increase was partially of fset by lower production at our Peruvian mines due to lower ore grades and
recoveries.
        Zinc production increased 3.1% in 2018, due to higher production at our Santa Eulalia and Santa Barbara mines due to higher
mineral milled.
        Mined silver production increased 8.7% in 2018 compared to 2017, as we had increased silver production at all of our mines,
except for our Cuajone mine.
2017 compar ed to 2016:
        Copper mine production in 2017 decreased 2.6% to 1,933.4 million pounds from 1,984.1 million pounds in 2016. This decrease
was due to:
• Lower production at the Cuajone mine due to lower ore grades and recoveries.
• Lower production at our Mexican mines, principally lower SX-EW  production at the Buenavista mine due to lower
PLS processed with a lower copper content.
• The decrease in production was partially of fset by higher production at the Toquepala mine due to higher ore grades
and recoveries.
        Molybdenum production slightly decreased 1.9% in 2017 compared to 2016, principally due to lower production at our Peruvian
operations as a result of lower grades and recoveries. This decrease was partially of fset by the additional production from the
Buenavista molybdenum plant at the second concentrator which started production in July 2016.
        Silver mine production decreased 1.5% in 2017 as a result of lower production at our IMMSA  mines partially of fset by higher
production at our open-pit mines in Mexico and Peru.
        Zinc production decreased 7.2% in 2017 principally due to lower production at our Santa Eulalia and Santa Barbara mines due to
lower mineral milled and lower grades.
        Operating Cash Costs:     An overall benchmark used by us and a common industry metric to measure performance is operating
cash costs per pound of copper produced. Operating cash cost is a non-GAAP  measure that does not have a standardized meaning and
may not be comparable to similarly titled measures provided by other companies. This non-GAAP  information should not be
considered in isolation or as substitute for measures of performance determined in accordance with GAAP . A reconciliation of our
operating cash cost per pound of copper produced to the cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion) as
presented in the consolidated statement of earnings is presented under the subheading, "Non-GAAP  Information Reconciliation" on
page 90. We disclose operating cash cost per pound of copper produced, both before and net of by-product revenues.
        We define operating cash cost per pound of copper produced before by-product revenues  as cost of sales (exclusive of
depreciation, amortization and depletion), plus selling, general and administrative char ges, treatment and refining char ges net of sales
premiums; less the cost of purchased concentrates, workers' participation and other miscellaneous char ges, including royalty char ges,
and the change in inventory levels; divided by total pounds of copper produced by our own mines.
74
Table of Contents
        In our calculation of operating cash cost per pound of copper produced, we exclude depreciation, amortization and depletion,
which are considered non-cash expenses. Exploration is considered a discretionary expenditure and is also excluded. Workers'
participation provisions are determined on the basis of pre-tax earnings and are also excluded. Additionally excluded from operating
cash costs are items of a non-recurring nature and the mining royalty char ge as it is based on various calculations of taxable income,
depending on which jurisdiction, Peru or Mexico, is imposing the char ge. We believe these adjustments will allow our management
and stakeholders to see a presentation of our controllable cash cost, which we consider is one of the lowest of copper producing
companies of similar size.
        We define operating cash cost per pound of copper produced net of by-product revenues  as operating cash cost per pound of
copper produced, as defined in the previous paragraph, less by-product revenues and net revenue (loss) on sale of metal purchased
from third parties.
        In our calculation of operating cash cost per pound of copper produced, net of by-product revenues, we credit against our costs
the revenues from the sale of all our by-products, including, molybdenum, zinc, silver , gold, etc. and the net revenue (loss) on sale of
metals purchased from third parties. We disclose this measure including the by-product revenues in this way because we consider our
principal business to be the production and sale of copper . As part of our copper production process, much of our by-products are
recovered. These by-products, as well as the processing of copper purchased from third parties, are a supplemental part of our
production process and their sales value contribute to cover part of our incurred fixed costs. We believe that our Company is viewed by
the investment community as a copper company , and is valued, in lar ge part, by the investment community's view of the copper market
and our ability to produce copper at a reasonable cost.
        We believe that both of these measures are useful tools for our management and our stakeholders. Our cash costs before by-
product revenues allow us to monitor our cost structure and address with operating management areas of concern. The measure
operating cash cost per pound of copper produced net of by-product revenues is a common measure used in the copper industry and is
a useful management tool that allows us to track our performance and better allocate our resources. This measure is also used in our
investment project evaluation process to determine a project's potential contribution to our operations, its competitiveness and its
relative strength in dif ferent price scenarios. The expected contribution of by-products is generally a significant factor used by the
copper industry in determining whether to move forward with the development of a new mining project. As the price of our by-product
commodities can have significant fluctuations from period to period, the value of its contribution to our costs can be volatile.
75
Table of Contents
        Our operating cash cost per pound of copper produced, as defined above, is presented in the table below for the three years ended
December 31, 2018:
Operating cash cost per  pound of copper  produced(1)
(In millions, except cost per  pound and per centages)
2018 compar ed to 2017:
        Our cash cost per pound before by-product revenues in 2018 was $1.54, 3.4% higher than in 2017. This increase in operating cash
cost was mainly due to higher production costs, principally at our Peruvian operations. However , our per pound cash cost for 2018,
when calculated net of by-product revenues was 5.4% lower than in 2017. This improvement was mainly the result of higher prices for
our major by-products.
2017 compar ed to 2016:
        Our cash cost per pound before by-product revenues in 2017 was $1.49, 3.5% higher than in 2016. This increase in operating cash
cost was mainly the result of higher production costs. However , our per pound cash cost for 2017, when calculated net of by-product
revenues was 3.2% lower than in 2016. This was the result of higher prices for our major by-products and higher zinc sales volume.
        Metal Prices:     The profitability of our operations is dependent on, and our financial performance is significantly af fected by , the
international market prices for the products we produce, especially for copper , molybdenum, zinc and silver .
        We are subject to market risks arising from the volatility of copper and other metals prices. Metal prices historically have been
subject to wide fluctuations and are af fected by numerous factors beyond our control. These factors, which af fect each commodity to
varying degrees, include international economic and political conditions, levels of supply and demand, the availability and cost of
substitutes, inventory levels maintained by producers and others and, to a lesser degree, inventory carrying costs and currency
exchange rates. In addition, the market prices of certain metals have on occasion been subject to rapid short-term changes due to
economic concerns and financial investments.
        For 2019, assuming that expected metal production and sales are achieved, that 2018 tax rates are unchanged and giving no ef fect
to potential hedging programs, metal price sensitivity factors would
76        Variance  
        2018 - 2017  2017 - 2016  
  2018  2017  2016  Value  %  Value  %  
Total operating cash
cost before by-
product revenues  $2,904.4  $2,797.5  $2,779.8  $106.9   3.8%$ 17.7  0.6%
Total by-product
revenues  $(1,267.7 )$(1,080.4 )$(955.6 )$(187.3 ) 17.3% (124.8 ) 13.1%
Total operating cash
cost net of by-
product revenues  $1,636.7  $1,717.1  $1,824.2  $(80.4 ) (4.7)%$(107.1 ) (5.9)%
Total pounds of
copper
produced(2)   1,886.8   1,874.5   1,924.7   12.3  0.7% (50.2 ) (2.6)%
Operating cash cost
per pound befor e
by-pr oduct
revenues  $ 1.54 $ 1.49 $ 1.44 $ 0.05  3.4%$ 0.05  3.5%
By-pr oducts per
pound r evenues  $ (0.67 )$ (0.57 )$ (0.49 )$(0.10 ) 17.5%$(0.08 ) 16.3%
Operating cash cost
per pound net of
by-pr oduct
revenues  $ 0.87 $ 0.92 $ 0.95 $(0.05 ) (5.4)%$(0.03 ) (3.2)%
(1) These are non-GAAP  measures, see page 90 for reconciliation to GAAP  measure.
(2) Net of metallur gical losses.
Table of Contents
indicate the following change in estimated annual net income attributable to SCC resulting from metal price changes:
        Business Segments:     We view our Company as having three reportable segments and manage it on the basis of these segments.
These segments are (1) our Peruvian operations, (2) our Mexican open-pit operations and (3) our Mexican under ground operations,
known as our IMMSA  unit. Our Peruvian operations include the Toquepala and Cuajone mine complexes and the smelting and refining
plants, industrial railroad and port facilities that service both mines. Our Mexican open-pit operations include La Caridad and
Buenavista mine complexes, the smelting and refining plants and support facilities, which service both mines. Our IMMSA  unit
includes five under ground mines, a coal mine, and several industrial processing facilities.
        Segment information is included in our review of "Results of Operations" in this item and also in Note 17 "Segment and Related
Information" of our consolidated financial statements.
        Inflation and Exchange Rate Effect of the Peruvian sol and the Mexican peso:     Our functional currency is the U.S. dollar
and our revenues are primarily denominated in U.S. dollars. Significant portions of our operating costs are denominated in Peruvian
sol and Mexican pesos. Accordingly , when inflation and currency devaluation/appreciation of the Peruvian and Mexican currency
occur , our operating results can be af fected. In recent years, we do believe such changes have not had a material ef fect on our results
and financial position. Please see Item 7A  "Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk" for more detailed information.
        Capital Investment Pr ogram:     We made capital investments of $1,121.4 million in 2018, $1,023.5 million in 2017 and
$1,118.5 million in 2016. In general, the capital investments and projects described below are intended to increase production,
decrease costs or address social and environmental commitments.
77  Copper  Molybdenum  Zinc  Silver  
Change in metal prices (per pound except silver—per
ounce)  $0.10 $ 1.00 $0.10 $1.00 
Change in net earnings (in millions)  $129.0  $ 33.6 $14.5 $12.4 
Table of Contents
        The table below sets forth our capital investments for the three years ended December 31, 2018 (in millions):
        In 2019, we plan to invest $1,752.8 million in capital projects. In addition to our ongoing capital maintenance and replacement
spending, our principal capital programs include the following:
Projects in Mexico :
        Buenavista Zinc—Sonora:     This project is located within the Buenavista facility and includes the development of a new
concentrator to produce approximately 80,000 tons of zinc per year which will allow us to double our current zinc production capacity .
Also, the project will produce 20,000 tons of additional copper per year . We have completed the basic engineering and we are working
on the purchasing process for the main project components. Water concessions have been requested. We estimate an investment of
$413 million for this project and expect to initiate operations in 2021.
        Pilares—Sonora:     This project, located six kilometers from La Caridad, will be developed as an open-pit mine operation. The ore
will be transported from the pit to the primary crushers of the La Caridad copper concentrator through a new 25-meter wide of f-road
facility for mining trucks, and will significantly improve the over -all mineral ore grade (combining the 0.78% expected from Pilares
with 0.34% at La Caridad). Environmental permit studies were presented to the government's environmental
78  2018  2017  2016  
Peruvian projects:           
Toquepala expansion project  $ 392.4  $ 362.0  $ 164.2  
Toquepala mine equipment acquisition project   —  39.7  94.2 
Heavy mineral management optimizing project—Cuajone   17.0  81.7  76.6 
Ilo 3 substation   1.0  29.9  3.7 
HPGR system—T oquepala   7.8  18.8  17.0 
Tailings disposal—Quebrada Honda dam   23.7  15.5  18.3 
Ilo sulfuric acid plant N°1 modification   15.3  4.4  — 
Other projects   24.1  10.0  15.4 
           
Sub-total projects   481.3   562.0   389.4  
Maintenance and replacement   201.4   153.1   210.5  
Net change in capital expenditures incurred but not yet paid   91.3  (29.7 ) (58.9 )
           
Total Peruvian expenditures   774.0   685.4   541.0  
           
Mexican projects:           
New Buenavista concentrator   5.8  24.7  70.7 
Buenavista projects infrastructure   2.3  1.9  46.6 
Buenavista SX-EW  plant III   —  1.1  — 
Quebalix IV   2.0  17.6  104.7  
New tailing disposal deposit at Buenavista mine   56.7  79.2  65.7 
Over elevation of tailings deposit N° 7 at La Caridad mine   18.3  —  — 
Sonora River water restitution system in Moritas Basin   6.0  —  — 
Solutions system improvements of Tinajas   1.3  14.5  42.5 
Other projects   77.0  63.0  94.5 
           
Sub-total projects   169.4   202.0   424.7  
Maintenance and replacement   169.3   144.7   142.2  
Net change in capital expenditures incurred but not yet paid   8.7  (8.6) 10.6 
           
Total Mexican expenditures   347.4   338.1   577.5  
           
Total capital investments  $1,121.4  $1,023.5  $1,118.5 
                      
           
Table of Contents
authorities and additional land is being acquired. An investment of $159 million is estimated to produce 35,000 tons of copper in
concentrates per year . We expect this project to start producing in early 2020.
Projects in Peru :
        We currently have a portfolio of Board approved projects in Peru, with a total capital budget of $2,900 million, out of which
$1,755 million have already been invested.
        Toquepala Expansion Project—T acna:     This $1,255 million project includes a new state-of-the-art concentrator which will
increase Toquepala's annual copper production by 100,000 tons to reach 258,000 tons in 2019, a 74% production increase, when
compared to 2017. Through December 31, 2018, we have invested $1,227 million in this expansion. Construction of the project was
completed and production began in the fourth quarter of 2018. Full production is expected to be reached by the second quarter of 2019.
        The project to improve the crushing process at Toquepala with the installation of a High Pr essur e Grinding Roll (HPGR)  system,
has as its main objective, to ensure that our existing concentrator will operate at its maximum annual production capacity of 1 17,000
tons of copper while reducing operating costs through ore crushing ef ficiencies, even with an increase of the ore material hardness
index. The budget for this project is $50 million and as of December 31, 2018, we have invested $44 million. We are in the
administrative close-out process for this project, which was added to operations during the fourth quarter of 2018.
        Cuajone tailing thickeners project—Moquegua:     This project will replace two of the three existing thickeners at the concentrator
with a new hi-rate thickener . The purpose is to streamline the concentrator flotation process and improve water recovery ef ficiency ,
increasing the tailings solids content from 54% to 61%, thereby reducing fresh water consumption and replacing it with recovered
water . Equipment assembly is completed and we are in the commissioning process. As of December 31, 2018, we have invested
$30 million in this project out of the approved capital budget of $30 million. During the commissioning process, a problem in the
design of the thickener was detected and we are currently working on the solution. We expect the project to be completed in the first
quarter of 2019.
        Tailings disposal at Quebrada Honda—Moquegua:     This project increases the height of the existing Quebrada Honda dam to
impound future tailings from the Toquepala and Cuajone mills and will extend the expected life of this tailings facility by 25 years.
The first stage and construction of the drainage system for the lateral dam is finished. We finished the second stage with the installation
of a new cyclone battery station that allows us to place more slurry at the dams. We are working to improve several operational
processes of this facility . The project has a total budgeted cost of $1 16 million. We have invested $107 million through December 31,
2018 and expect the project to be completed in the first quarter of 2019.
Potential pr ojects:
        We have a number of other projects that we may develop in the future. We continuously evaluate new projects on the basis of our
long-term corporate objectives, strategic and operating fit, expected return on investment, required investment, estimated production,
estimated cash-flow profile, social and environmental considerations, among other factors. All capital spending plans will continue to
be reviewed and adjusted to respond to changes in the economy or market conditions. We are currently developing a new or ganic
growth plan to increase our annual copper production to 1.5 million tons by 2025 with the development of new projects, which include
the following:
        El Arco—Baja California:     This is a world class copper deposit located in the central part of the Baja California peninsula, with
ore reserves of over 2.7 billion tons with an ore grade of 0.399% and
79
Table of Contents
0.11 grams of gold per ton. This project, includes an open-pit mine combining concentrator and SX-EW  operations with an estimated
production of 190,000 tons of copper and 105,000 ounces of gold annually . Between July 2015 and February 2016, we conducted a
drilling program of 20,170 meters in order to further define the deposit at lower depths of between 300 and 600 meters.
        El Pilar—Sonora:     This is a fully permitted, low capital intensity copper development project strategically located in Sonora,
Mexico, approximately 45 kilometers from our Buenavista mine. Its copper oxide mineralization contains estimated proven and
probable reserves of 325 million tons of ore with an average copper grade of 0.287%. El Pilar will operate as a conventional open-pit
mine and copper cathodes will be produced using the highly cost ef ficient and environmentally friendly SX-EW  technology . Average
annual production is currently estimated at 35,000 tons of copper cathodes over an initial 13-year mine life. On a preliminary basis, we
estimate a development investment of approximately $310 million. During 2018 we continued with the metallur gical testing program,
as well as with social development work with local communities. We are also concluding a preliminary economic study of the project.
        Tia Maria—Arequipa:     We have completed engineering and after having complied with all environmental requirements, we have
obtained the approval of the environmental impact assessment. We are working jointly with the Peruvian government to obtain the
construction license for this 120,000 tons of SX-EW  copper per year greenfield project with a total capital investment of
$1,400 million. We expect to receive the construction license for this project in the first half of 2019.
        In addition to our on-going social work with the communities of the Tambo valley , the Company is currently deploying its
successful labor program "For ge Your Future" (Forjando Futuro) to train 700 people from the Islay Province in 2019. After training,
the participants will be eligible to apply for one of the estimated 9,000 jobs (3,600 direct and 5,400 indirect) required during the Tia
Maria construction phase. We believe that the initiation of construction activities for Tia Maria will generate significant economic
opportunities for the Islay province and the Arequipa region.
        This greenfield project, located in Arequipa, Peru, will use state of the art SX-EW  technology with the highest international
environmental standards. SX-EW  facilities are the most environmentally friendly in the industry due to their technical process with no
emissions released into the atmosphere. The project will use seawater , transporting it more than 25 kilometers to an altitude of 1,000
meters above sea level. The construction of the desalinization plant requires an investment of approximately $95 million.
        Los Chancas—Apurimac:     This greenfield project, located in Apurimac, Peru, is a copper and molybdenum porphyry deposit.
Current estimates indicate the presence of 545 million tons of mineralized material with a copper content of 0.59%, molybdenum
content of 0.04% and 0.039 grams of gold per ton, as well as 181 million tons of mineralized leachable material with a total copper
content of 0.357%. Los Chancas project envisions an open-pit mine with a combined operation of concentrator and SX-EW  processes
to annually produce 130,000 tons of copper and 7,500 tons of molybdenum. The estimated capital investment is $2,800 million and is
expected to be in operation in 2025. In 2018, we continued with the development of social and environmental improvements for the
local communities. We plan to complete the environmental impact assessment in 2020.
        Michiquillay Project—Cajamarca:     On June 12, 2018, Southern Copper signed a contract and made an initial payment of
$12.5 million for the acquisition of the Michiquillay project in Cajamarca, Peru. The Company has created a multidisciplinary
management team to plan the development of this project. As part of this plan, the Company has established contact with the local
authorities and communities in order to promote programs for the sustainable development of the area. In February 2019, the Company
began preliminary social and technical work in the area of the project.
80
Table of Contents
        Michiquillay is a world class mining project with estimated mineralized material of 1,150 million tons with an estimated copper
grade of 0.63%. When developed, we expect Michiquillay to produce 225,000 tons of copper per year (along with by-products of
molybdenum, gold and silver) for an initial mine life of more than 25 years, at a competitive cash-cost. We estimate an investment of
approximately $2.5 billion will be required and expect production start-up by 2025, with Michiquillay becoming one of Peru´s lar gest
copper mines. The project will create significant business opportunities in the Cajamarca region, generate new jobs for the local
communities and contribute with taxes and royalties to the national, regional and local governments.
        The above information is based on estimates only . We cannot make any assurances that we will undertake any of these projects or
that the information noted is accurate.
CRITICAL  ACCOUNTING POLICIES AND ESTIMA TES
        Our significant accounting policies are discussed in Note 2 "Summary of Significant Accounting Policies" of the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements, included in Item 8 "Financial Statements and Supplementary Data" of this Annual Report.
        Our discussion and analysis of financial condition and results of operations, as well as quantitative and qualitative disclosures
about market risks, are based upon our consolidated financial statements, which have been prepared in accordance with U.S. GAAP .
Preparation of these consolidated financial statements requires our management to make estimates and assumptions that af fect the
reported amounts of assets and liabilities and disclosures of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the financial statements and
the reported amounts of revenues and expenses during the reporting period. We make our best estimate of the ultimate outcome for
these items based on historical trends and other information available when the financial statements are prepared. Changes in estimates
are recognized in accordance with the accounting rules for the estimate, which is typically in the period when new information
becomes available to management. Areas where the nature of the estimate makes it reasonably possible that actual results could
materially dif fer from amounts estimated include: ore reserves, revenue recognition, leachable material and related amortization,
estimated impairment of assets, asset retirement obligations, valuation allowances for deferred tax assets and unrecognized tax
benefits. We base our estimates on historical experience and on various other assumptions that we believe to be reasonable under the
circumstances. Actual results may dif fer from these estimates under dif ferent assumptions or conditions.
        Ore Reserves :    For internal ore reserve estimation, we use metal price assumptions of $2.90 per pound for copper and $7.50 per
pound for molybdenum. These prices are intended to conservatively approximate average prices over the long term.
        However , pursuant to SEC guidance, the reserve information in this report is calculated using average metals prices over the most
recent three years, except as otherwise stated. We refer to these three-year average metals prices as "current average prices." Our
current average prices for copper are calculated using prices quoted by COMEX, and our current average prices for molybdenum are
calculated using prices published in Platt's Metals W eek. Unless otherwise stated, reserve estimates in this report use the following
three years average prices for copper and molybdenum as of December 31, 2018:
        Certain financial information is based on reserve estimates calculated on the basis of current average prices. These include
amortization of intangible assets and mine development. Variations in ore
81  2018  2017  2016  Average
2018 - 2016  
Copper ($ per pound)  $2.93 $2.80 $2.20 $ 2.64 
Molybdenum ($ per pound)  $11.94 $8.21 $6.42 $ 8.88 
Table of Contents
reserve calculations from changes in metal price assumptions generally do not create material changes to our financial results.
However , significant decreases in metal prices could adversely af fect our earnings by causing, among other things, asset impairment
charges, please see "Assets impairment" below . A 20% increase or decrease in three-year average copper prices (current prices), for
mineral reserves estimation, which is a reasonable possibility , would not materially af fect our statement of earnings as the amount of
reserves would not change significantly . Please see Item 2 "Properties—Ore reserves."
        Ore stockpiles on leach pads :    The leaching process is an integral part of the mining operations carried out at our open-pit mines.
We capitalize the production cost of leachable material at our Toquepala, La Caridad and Buenavista mines recognizing it as inventory .
The estimates of recoverable mineral content contained in the leaching dumps are supported by engineering studies. As the production
cycle of the leaching process is significantly longer than the conventional process of concentrating, smelting and electrolytic refining,
we include on our balance sheet, current leach inventory (as part of work-in-process inventories) and long-term leach inventory .
Amortization of leachable material is recorded by the units of production method.
        Asset Retirement Obligation :    Our mining and exploration activities are subject to various laws and regulations governing the
protection of the environment. Accounting for reclamation and remediation obligations requires management to make estimates unique
to each mining operation of the future costs we will incur to complete the reclamation and remediation work required to comply with
existing laws and regulations. These estimates are based in part on our inflation and credit rate assumptions. Actual costs incurred in
future periods could dif fer from amounts estimated. Additionally , future changes to environmental laws and regulations could increase
the extent of reclamation and remediation work required to be performed by us. Any such increases in future costs could materially
impact the amounts char ged to operations for reclamation and remediation.
        Asset retirement obligations are further discussed in Note 9 "Asset Retirement Obligation" to our consolidated financial
statements included herein.
        Revenue Recognition :    For certain of our sales of copper and molybdenum products, customer contracts allow for pricing based
on a month subsequent to shipping, in most cases within the following three months and in few cases perhaps a few further months. In
such cases, revenue is recorded at a provisional price at the time of shipment. The provisionally priced copper sales are adjusted to
reflect forward LME or COMEX copper prices at the end of each month until a final adjustment is made to the price of the shipments
upon settlement with customers pursuant to the terms of the contract. In the case of molybdenum sales, for which there are no
published forward prices, the provisionally priced sales are adjusted to reflect the market prices at the end of each month until a final
adjustment is made to the price of the shipments upon settlement with customers pursuant to the terms of the contract. (See details in
"Provisionally Priced Sales" under this Item 7).
        Income Taxes:    In preparing our consolidated financial statements, we recognize income taxes in each of the jurisdictions in
which we operate. For each jurisdiction, we calculate the actual amount currently payable or receivable, as well as deferred tax assets
and liabilities attributable to temporary dif ferences between the financial statement carrying amounts of existing assets and liabilities
and their respective tax bases. Deferred income tax assets and liabilities are measured using enacted tax rates expected to apply to
taxable income in the years in which these temporary dif ferences are expected to be recovered or settled. The ef fect on deferred tax
assets and liabilities of a change in rate is recognized through the income tax provision in the period that the change is enacted.
        A valuation allowance is provided for those deferred tax assets for which it is more likely than not that the related benefits will not
be realized. In determining the amount of the valuation allowance, we consider estimated future taxable income, as well as feasible tax
planning strategies in each jurisdiction.
82
Table of Contents
If we determine that we will not realize all or a portion of our deferred tax assets, we will increase our valuation allowance with a
charge to income tax expense. Conversely , if we determine that we will ultimately be able to realize all or a portion of the related
benefits for which a valuation allowance has been provided, all or a portion of the related valuation allowance will be reduced with a
credit to income tax expense.
        Our Company's operations involve dealing with uncertainties and judgments in the application of complex tax regulations in
multiple jurisdictions. The final taxes paid are dependent upon many factors, including negotiations with taxing authorities in various
jurisdictions and resolution of disputes arising from federal, state, and international tax audits. We recognize potential liabilities and
record tax liabilities for anticipated tax audit issues in the U.S. and other tax jurisdictions based on our estimate of whether , and the
extent to which, additional taxes will be due. We follow the guidance of ASC 740 "Income Taxes" to record these liabilities. (See
Note 7 "Income Taxes" of the consolidated financial statements for additional information). We adjust these reserves in light of
changing facts and circumstances; however , due to the complexity of some of these uncertainties, the ultimate resolution may result in
a payment that is materially dif ferent from our current estimate of the tax liabilities. If our estimate of tax liabilities proves to be less
than the ultimate assessment, an additional char ge to expense would result. If payment of these amounts ultimately proves to be less
than the recorded amounts, the reversal of the liabilities would result in tax benefits being recognized in the period when we determine
the liabilities are no longer necessary . We recognize interest and penalties, if any , related to unrecognized tax benefits in income tax
expense.
        On December 22, 2017, the President of the United States signed into law the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act ("the TCJA"). The Act
significantly changes U.S. tax law by , among other things, lowering corporate income tax rates, implementing a territorial tax system
and imposing a repatriation tax on deemed repatriated earnings of foreign subsidiaries. The TCJA  permanently reduced the U.S.
corporate income tax rate from a maximum of 35% to a flat 21% ef fective January 1, 2018. The SEC staf f issued Staf f Accounting
Bulletin No. 1 18 ("SAB 1 18") to address the application of U.S. GAAP  in situations when a registrant does not have the necessary
information available, prepared, or analyzed (including computations) in reasonable detail to complete the accounting for certain
income tax ef fects of the TCJA. In 2017, the Company recognized the provisional tax impacts related to deemed repatriated earnings
and the revaluation of deferred tax assets and liabilities and included these amounts in its consolidated financial statements for the year
ended December 31, 2017. In the consolidated financial statements for the year ended December 31, 2018, the Company completed
the accounting for income tax ef fects of the TCJA  in accordance with SAB 1 18. For further information, see Note 7 "Income Taxes",
of our consolidated financial statements.
        Asset Impairments :    We evaluate our long-term assets when events or changes in economic circumstances indicate that the
carrying amount of such assets may not be recoverable. Our evaluations are based on business plans that are prepared using a time
horizon that is reflective of our expectations of metal prices over our business cycle. We are currently using an average copper price of
$2.20 per pound and an average molybdenum price of $5.00 per pound, reflective of what we believe is the lower level of the current
price environment, for our impairment tests. The results of our impairment sensitivity analysis, which included a stress test using a
copper price assumption of $2.00 per pound and a molybdenum price assumption of $4.00 per pound showed projected discounted
cash flows in excess of the carrying amounts of long-lived assets by mar gins ranging from 1.9 to 4.0 times such carrying amount.
        In recent years our assumptions for long-term average prices resulted in stricter evaluations for impairment analysis than using the
three year average prices for copper and molybdenum prices. Should this situation reverse in the future with three year average prices
below the long-term price assumption, we would assess the need to use the three year average prices in our evaluations. We use an
estimate of the future undiscounted net cash flows of the related asset or asset group over the
83
Table of Contents
remaining life to measure whether the assets are recoverable and measure any impairment by reference to fair value.
RESUL TS OF OPERA TIONS
        The following table highlights key financial results for each of the years in the three-year period ended December 31, 2018 (in
millions):
NET  SALES
        2018-2017:     Net sales in 2018 were $7,096.7 million, compared to $6,654.5 million in 2017, an increase of $442.2 million. This
6.6% increase was principally the result of higher copper (+5.7%) and molybdenum (+45.9%) prices and higher sales volumes of
silver (+15.3%) and molybdenum (+3.3%), partially of fset by lower silver price (–8.1%) and lower zinc sales volume (–1.0%).
        2017-2016:     Net sales in 2017 were $6,654.5 million, compared to $5,379.8 million in 2016, an increase of $1,274.7 million.
This 23.7% increase was principally the result of higher metal prices as shown below , and also due to slightly higher sales volumes of
copper (+1.8%) and zinc (+2.0%), partially of fset by lower sales volumes of silver (–2.1%) and molybdenum (–1.7%).
        The table below outlines the average published market metals prices for our metals for each of the three years in the three-year
period ended December 31, 2018:
84        Variance  
Statement of Earnings Data  2018  2017  2016  2018 - 2017  2017 - 2016  
Net sales  $7,096.7  $6,654.5  $5,379.8  $ 442.2  $1,274.7  
Operating costs and expenses   (4,215.5 ) (4,035.6 ) (3,815.6 ) (179.9 ) (220.0 )
                 
Operating income   2,881.2   2,618.9   1,564.2   262.3   1,054.7  
Non-operating income (expense)   (291.8 ) (316.2 ) (308.2 ) 24.4  (8.0)
                 
Income before income taxes   2,589.4   2,302.7   1,256.0   286.7   1,046.7  
Current income taxes and royalty
taxes   (1,105.0 ) (951.7 ) (623.6 ) (153.3 ) (328.1 )
Deferred income taxes   51.5  (641.7 ) 122.5   693.2   (764.2 )
Equity earnings of af filiate   12.3  23.1  23.9  (10.8 ) (0.8)
Net income attributable to non-
controlling interest   (5.2) (3.9) (2.3) (1.3) (1.6)
                 
Net income attributable to SCC  $1,543.0  $ 728.5  $ 776.5  $ 814.5  $ (48.0 )
                                  
                 
        % Variance  
  2018  2017  2016  2018 - 2017  2017 - 2016  
Copper price ($ per pound—LME)  $2.96 $2.80 $2.21  5.7% 26.7%
Copper price ($ per pound—COMEX)  $2.93 $2.80 $2.20  4.6% 27.3%
Molybdenum price ($ per pound)(1)  $11.86 $8.13 $6.42  45.9% 26.6%
Zinc price ($ per pound—LME)  $1.33 $1.31 $0.95  1.5% 37.9%
Silver price ($ per ounce—COMEX)  $15.65  $17.03  $17.10   (8.1)% (0.4)%
(1) Platt's Metals Week Dealer Oxide.
Table of Contents
        The table below provides our metal sales as a percentage of our total net sales:
        The table below provides our copper sales by type of product (in million pounds):
        The table below provides our copper sales volume by type of product as a percentage of our total copper sales volume:
OPERA TING COSTS AND EXPENSES
        The table below summarizes the production cost structure by major components for the three years ended 2018 as a percentage of
total production cost:
85Sales as a per centage of total net sales  2018  2017  2016  
Copper   80.4% 82.3% 78.4%
Molybdenum   7.2% 5.3% 5.0%
Silver   4.2% 4.3% 5.5%
Zinc   4.6% 4.9% 4.4%
Other by-products   3.6% 3.2% 6.7%
           
Total   100.0 % 100.0 % 100.0 %
                      
           
        Variance  
Copper  Sales  2018  2017  2016  2018 - 2017  2017 - 2016  
Refined (including SX-EW)   1,152.2   1,193.3   1,161.7   (41.1 ) 31.6 
Rod   335.7   309.7   319.4   26.0  (9.7)
Concentrates and other   465.0   456.2   442.8   8.8  13.4 
                 
Total   1,952.9   1,959.2   1,923.9   (6.3) 35.3 
                                  
                 
Copper  Sales by pr oduct type  2018  2017  2016  
Refined (including SX-EW)   59.0% 60.9% 60.4%
Rod   17.2% 15.8% 16.6%
Concentrates and other   23.8% 23.3% 23.0%
           
Total   100.0 % 100.0 % 100.0 %
                      
           
  2018  2017  2016  
Power   14.8% 16.8% 18.5%
Labor   13.9% 13.9% 13.2%
Fuel   14.6% 13.7% 11.5%
Maintenance   19.5% 18.9% 19.4%
Operating material   18.7% 19.3% 19.3%
Other   18.5% 17.4% 18.1%
           
Total   100.0 % 100.0 % 100.0 %
                      
           
Table of Contents
        2018-2017:     Operating costs and expenses in 2018 increased $179.9 million, compared to 2017, primarily due to:
        2017-2016:     Operating costs and expenses in 2017 increased $220.0 million, compared to 2016, primarily due to:
 
 
        2018-2017 :    Non-operating income and expense were a net expense of $291.8 million in 2018 compared to a net expense of
$316.2 million in 2017. The $24.4 million decrease in net expense in 2018 was mainly due to:
• $ 32.4 million of higher capitalized interest due to the increased capital investments at our Peruvian operations,
• $ 10.5 million of higher interest income; partially of fset by ,
86Operating cost and expenses for 2017  $4,035.6  
Plus:     
• Higher cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion) mainly due
to higher inventory consumption, foreign currency transaction ef fect, higher workers'
participation expense and higher fuel costs, partially of fset by lower power costs, and
higher capitalized ore stockpiles on leach pads.                         
 156.2  
• Reversal in 2017 of over -accrual of Sonora River remediation costs.   10.2 
• Higher selling, general and administrative expenses.                                    9.5 
• Higher depreciation, amortization and depletion expense.            3.2 
• Higher exploration expense.   0.8 
       
Operating cost and expenses for 2018  $4,215.5  
                     
Operating cost and expenses for 2016  $3,815.6  
Plus:     
• Higher cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion) mainly due
to higher inventory consumption, foreign currency transaction ef fect, higher workers'
participation expense and higher fuel costs, partially of fset by lower power costs, and
higher capitalized ore stockpiles on leach pads.                                                            
 218.7  
• Higher depreciation, amortization and depletion mainly as a result of our expansion and
maintenance capital investments.                                                            
 24.0 
Less:     
• Partial recovery of remediation costs for the 2014 spill at Buenavista due to the
completion of remediation activities.                         
 (10.2 )
• Lower selling, general and administrative expenses.                          (1.2)
• Lower exploration expense.            (11.3)
       
Operating cost and expenses for 2017  $4,035.6  
                     
        Variance  
NON-OPERA TING INCOME (EXPENSE)  2018  2017  2016  2018 - 2017  2017 - 2016  
Interest expense  $(360.9 )$(357.4 )$(360.3 )$ (3.5)$ 2.9 
Capitalized interest   83.8  51.4  69.6  32.4  (18.2 )
Other expense   (30.7 ) (15.7 ) (24.6 ) (15.0 ) 8.9 
Interest income   16.0  5.5  7.1  10.5  (1.6)
                 
Total non-operating income (expense)  $(291.8 )$(316.2 )$(308.2 )$ 24.4 $ (8.0)
                                  
                 
Table of Contents
• $ 15.0 million of higher miscellaneous expense, net, which includes a write-of f of certain non-capital expenses related
to the Tia Maria project; and
• $ 3.5 million of higher interest expense.
        2017-2016 :    Non-operating income and expense were a net expense of $316.2 million in 2017 compared to a net expense of
$308.2 million in 2016. The $8.0 million variance in net expense in 2017 was mainly due to:
• $ 18.2 million of lower capitalized interest mainly due to an adjustment in capitalized interest computation,
• $ 1.6 million of lower interest income; partially of fset by ,
• $ 8.9 million of lower miscellaneous expense, net; and,
• $ 2.9 million of lower interest expense.
Income taxes
        The income tax provision includes Peruvian, Mexican and U.S. federal and state income taxes.
        Components of income tax provision for 2018, 2017 and 2016 include the following ($ in millions):
        The decrease in the ef fective tax rate in 2018 from the prior year was due to the following changes (in percentage points):
        In 2018, the Company completed its evaluation of the ef fects of the 2017 U.S, tax reform and recorded a non-cash tax provision
of $30.9 million in addition to the non-cash amount of $785.9 million recorded in 2017. This brings the total recorded ef fect of the
2017 U.S. tax teform on the Company's financial statements for 2017 and 2018 to a non-cash tax provision of $816.8 million.
87  2018  2017  2016  
Provision for income taxes ($ in millions)  $1,053.5  $1,593.4  $501.1  
Effective income tax rate   40.7% 69.2% 39.9%
  2018  2017  2016  
Statutory income tax provision  $ 903.4  $ 688.5  $441.1  
Tax reform adjustment   30.9  785.9   — 
Peruvian royalty   9.0  2.5  — 
Mexican royalty   79.6  93.2  48.9 
Peruvian special mining tax   30.6  23.3  11.1 
           
Total income tax provision  $1,053.5  $1,593.4  $501.1  
                      
           
Effective income tax rate for 2017   69.2%
Change in valuation of 2017 deferred tax assets for foreign tax credits, U.S. tax ef fect of 2017
Peruvian deferred and U.S. deferred tax assets   (25.9 )
Reduction of corporate tax rate applied to 2017 U.S. deferred tax asset   (4.9)
Change in 2017 transition tax on repatriated foreign earnings   (2.0)
Additional valuation allowance on 2018 U.S. deferred tax assets, foreign tax credits and US tax
effect of Peruvian deferreds   7.5 
Permanent Dif ferences   (4.8)
Other changes   1.6 
     
Effective income tax rate for 2018   40.7%
Table of Contents
        For additional information regarding the impacts of the TCJA  and the adoption of SAB 1 18 see Note 7 "Income taxes" to the
accompanying consolidated financial statements.
Equity earnings of af filiate
        In 2018, 2017 and 2016 we have recognized $12.3 million, $23.1 million and $23.9 million, respectively , of equity earnings of
affiliate, from our 44.2% interest in the Tantahuatay mine.
Net Income attributable to the non-controlling interest
        Net income attributable to the non-controlling interest in 2018 was $5.2 million, compared to $3.9 million in 2017, and
$2.3 million in 2016. It increased in 2018 and 2017 by $1.3 million and $1.6 million, respectively . These changes were the result of
higher earnings at our Peruvian operations in both years.
Income attributable to SCC
        Our net income attributable to SCC in 2018 was $1,543.0 million, compared to $728.5 million in 2017 and $776.5 million in
2016. The increase in 2018 net income was mainly due to higher sales and lower taxes as the 2017 financial results included the one-
time, non-cash income tax adjustment of $785.9 million recorded in 2017 as a result of the U.S. income tax legislation enacted in the
fourth quarter of 2017. Net income attributable to SCC decreased in 2017 due to this adjustment. This was partially of fset by higher
sales and cost reductions achieved in electricity (–8.0%), tires (–9.4%), and other cost elements.
SEGMENT  RESUL TS ANAL YSIS
        We have three segments: the Peruvian operations, the Mexican open-pit operations and the Mexican under ground mining
operations. Please see a detailed definition of these segments in Item 1 "Business—Business Reporting Segments."
        The following table presents the volume of sales by segment of copper and our significant by-products, for each of the years in
the three year period ended December 31, 2018:
88        Variance  
Copper  Sales (million pounds)  2018  2017  2016  2018 - 2017  2017 - 2016  
Peruvian operations   759.4   710.1   697.2   49.3  12.9 
Mexican open-pit   1,193.6   1,249.1   1,226.7   (55.5 ) 22.4 
Mexican IMMSA  unit   19.0  15.5  19.5  3.5  (4.0)
Other and intersegment elimination   (19.0 ) (15.5 ) (19.5 ) (3.5) 4.0 
                 
Total copper sales   1,953.0   1,959.2   1,923.9   (6.2) 35.3 
                                  
                 
Table of Contents
Peruvian Open-pit Operations:
Net sales:
        2018-2017:     Net sales in 2018 increased by $328.1 million, compared to 2017, mainly as a result of higher metal prices and
higher copper (+6.9%) and silver (+8.2%) sales volume, partially of fset by lower molybdenum sales volume (–8.1%).
        2017-2016:     Net sales in 2017 increased by $449.7 million, compared to 2016, mainly as a result of higher metal prices and
higher copper and silver sales volume, partially of fset by lower molybdenum sales volume.
89        Variance  
By-pr oduct Sales (million pounds, except silver—million ounces)  2018  2017  2016  2018 - 2017  2017 - 2016  
Peruvian operations:                 
Molybdenum contained in concentrate   16.0  17.5  22.6  (1.5) (5.1)
Silver   4.5  4.1  3.7  0.4  0.4 
Mexican open-pit operations:                 
Molybdenum contained in concentrate   32.6  29.6  25.3  3.0  4.3 
Silver   11.3  10.1  10.6  1.2  (0.5)
IMMSA  unit                 
Zinc-refined and in concentrate   234.8   237.2   232.4   (2.4) 4.8 
Silver   5.5  4.3  4.8  1.2  (0.5)
Other and intersegment elimination                 
Silver   (1.9) (1.6) (1.9) (0.3) 0.3 
Total by-product sales                 
Molybdenum contained in concentrate   48.6  47.1  47.9  1.5  (0.8)
Zinc-refined and in concentrate   234.8   237.2   232.4   (2.4) 4.8 
Silver   19.4  16.9  17.2  2.5  (0.3)
        Variance  
  2018  2017  2016  2018 - 2017  2017 - 2016  
Net sales  $2.572.2  $2,244.1  $1,794.4  $ 328.1  $ 449.7  
Operating costs and expenses   (1,802.0 ) (1,617.0 ) (1,547.8 ) (185.0 ) (69.2 )
                 
Operating income  $ 770.2  $ 627.1  $ 246.6  $ 143.1  $ 380.5  
                                  
                 
Table of Contents
Operating costs and expenses:
        2018-2017 :    Operating costs and expenses in 2018 increased by $185.0 million, compared to 2017, principally due to:
        2017-2016 :    Operating costs and expenses in 2016 increased by $69.2 million, compared to 2016, principally due to:
Mexican Open-pit Operations:
Net sales:
        2018-2017:     Net sales in 2018 increased by $103.2 million, compared to 2017, mainly due to higher metal prices and higher
silver (+12.1%) and molybdenum (+10.0%) sales volumes, partially reduced by lower copper sales volume (–4.4%).
        2017-2016:     Net sales in 2017 increased by $738.4 million, compared to 2016, mainly due to higher metal prices and higher
copper and molybdenum sales volumes, slightly of fset by lower silver sales volume.
90Operating cost and expenses for 2017  $1,617.0  
Plus:     
• Higher cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion) mainly due
to higher inventory consumption, higher fuel costs and higher workers' participation
expense; partially of fset by lower cost of metals purchased from third parties and lower
power costs.                         
 146.6  
• Higher depreciation, amortization and depletion expense due to our expansion and
maintenance investments.                         
 33.8 
• Higher exploration expenses.            4.1 
• Higher selling, general and administrative expenses.            0.5 
       
Operating cost and expenses for 2018  $1,802.0  
                     
Operating costs and expenses for 2016  $1,547.8  
Plus:     
• Higher cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion) mainly due
to higher cost of metals purchased from third parties, higher fuel costs and higher
workers' participation expense; partially of fset by lower power and operating
contractors costs, and lower inventory consumption.                         
 82.6 
• Higher exploration expenses.            1.4 
Less:     
• Lower depreciation, amortization and depletion expense.            (13.5 )
• Lower selling, general and administrative expenses.            (1.3)
       
Operating costs and expenses for 2017  $1,617.0  
                     
        Variance  
  2018  2017  2016  2018 - 2017  2017 - 2016  
Net sales  $4,075.9  $3,972.7  $3,234.3  $ 103.2  $ 738.4  
Operating costs and expenses   (2,028.7 ) (2,035.7 ) (1,940.2 ) 7.0  (95.5 )
                 
Operating income  $2,047.2  $1,937.0  $1,294.1  $ 110.2 $ 642.9  
                                  
                 
Table of Contents
Operating costs and expenses:
        2018-2017 :    Operating costs and expenses in 2018 decreased by $7.0 million, compared to 2017, mainly due to:
        2017-2016 :    Operating costs and expenses in 2017 increased by $95.5 million, compared to 2016, mainly due to:
IMMSA  unit:
Net sales:
        2018-2017:     Net sales in 2018 increased $19.2 million, compared to 2017, primarily due to higher metal prices and higher
copper (+22.9%) and silver (+27.2%) sales volumes, slightly of fset by lower zinc sales volume (–1.0%).
        2017-2016:     Net sales in 2017 increased $85.6 million, compared to 2016, primarily due to higher metal prices and higher zinc
sales volume, slightly of fset by lower silver sales volume.
91Operating costs and expenses for 2017  $2,035.7  
Less:     
• Lower depreciation, amortization and depletion expense.            (40.6 )
• Lower exploration expenses.            (0.7)
Plus:     
• Higher cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion) mainly due
to higher cost of metals purchased from third parties and higher sales expenses; partially
offset by lower inventory consumption and lower power costs.                                   
 16.7 
• Reversal in 2017 of over -accrual of Sonora River remediation costs.            10.2 
• Higher selling, general and administrative expenses.            7.4 
       
Operating costs and expenses for 2018  $2,028.7  
                     
Operating costs and expenses for 2016  $1,940.2  
Plus:     
• Higher cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion) mainly due
to higher inventory consumption, workers participation expense and higher fuel costs;
partially of fset by lower cost of metals purchased from third parties and lower sales
expenses.                                   
 71.1 
• Higher depreciation, amortization and depletion expense.            36.3 
• Higher selling, general and administrative expenses.            0.8 
Less:     
• Partial recovery of the Sonora River remediation costs due to the completion of the
remediation activities.                         
 (10.2 )
• Lower exploration expenses.            (2.5)
       
Operating costs and expenses for 2017           $2,035.7  
                     
        Variance  
  2018  2017  2016  2018 - 2017  2017 - 2016  
Net sales  $527.9  $508.7  $423.1  $ 19.2 $ 85.6 
Operating costs and expenses   (438.6 ) (434.9 ) (366.3 ) (3.7) (68.6 )
                 
Operating income  $ 89.3 $ 73.8 $ 56.8 $ 15.5 $ 17.0 
                                  
                 
Table of Contents
Operating costs and expenses:
        2018-2017:     Operating costs and expenses in 2018 increased $3.7 million, compared to 2017, mainly due to:
        2017-2016:     Operating costs and expenses in 2017 increased $68.6 million, compared to 2016, mainly due to:
Intersegment Eliminations and Adjustments:
        The net sales, operating costs and expenses and operating income discussed above will not be directly equal to amounts in our
consolidated statement of earnings because the adjustments of intersegment operating revenues and expenses must be taken into
account. Please see Note 17 "Segment and Related Information" of our consolidated financial statements.
LIQUIDITY  AND CAPIT AL RESOURCES
        The following discussion relates to our liquidity and capital resources for each of the years in the three year period ended
December 31, 2018.
Cash Flow:
        The following table shows the cash flow for the three year period ended December 31, 2018 (in millions):
92Operating costs and expenses for 2017  $434.9  
Plus:     
•Higher cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion) mainly due to
higher power costs and higher workers' participation expense; partially of fset by lower cost
of metals purchased from third parties and foreign currency ef fect.  
 11.9 
•Higher selling, general and administrative expenses.   0.6 
Less:     
•Lower depreciation, amortization and depletion expense.   (8.6)
•Lower exploration expenses.   (0.2)
     
Operating costs and expenses for 2018  $438.6  
               
Operating cost and expenses for 2016  $366.3  
Plus:     
•Higher cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion) mainly due to
higher cost of metals purchased from third parties and higher power costs; partially of fset
by lower sales expenses and foreign currency ef fect.  
 61.2 
•Higher depreciation, amortization and depletion due to our maintenance capital
investments.  
 6.4 
•Higher exploration expenses.   0.5 
•Higher selling, general and administrative expenses.   0.5 
     
Operating cost and expenses for 2017  $434.9  
               
        Variance  
  2018  2017  2016  2018 - 2017  2017 - 2016  
Net cash provided by operating
activities  $2,235.1  $1,976.6  $923.1  $ 258.5  $1,053.5  
Net cash used in investing activities  $(1,296.2 )$(1,019.0 )$(452.0 )$ (277.2 )$ (567.0 )
Net cash used in financing activities  $(1,083.4 )$ (456.1 )$(210.7 )$ (627.3 )$ (245.4 )
Table of Contents
Net cash provided by operating activities:
        The 2018, 2017 and 2016 change in net cash from operating activities include (in millions):
        Significant items added to (deducted from) net income to arrive at operating cash flow include depreciation, amortization and
depletion, deferred tax amounts and changes in operating assets and liabilities. In 2017, we recorded a non-cash tax char ge of
$785.9 million related to the U.S. tax law change enacted in December 2017.
        2018:     Net income was $1,548.2 million, approximately 69% of the net cash provided from operating activities. A net increase in
operating assets and liabilities increased operating cash flow by $23.7 million and included:
• $117.8 million increase in accounts payable and accrued liabilities.
• $68.3 million decrease in trade accounts receivable.
• $(190.8) million of net increase in inventory , which included $(207.1) million of higher leaching inventory , $(20.7)
million of higher finished goods and $(14.0) million of higher supplies inventories for our operations, partially of fset by
$51.2 million of lower metals in process inventory .
• $28.4 million decrease in other operating assets and liabilities.
        2017:     Net income was $732.4 million, approximately 37% of the net cash provided from operating activities. A net increase in
operating assets and liabilities decreased operating cash flow by $89.9 million and included:
• $(298.7) million increase in accounts receivable.
• $(201.9) million of net increase in inventory , which included $(180.4) million of higher leaching inventory , $(26.8)
million of higher supplies inventories for our operations and $(76.3) million of higher metals in process, partially of fset
by $81.6 million of lower finished goods inventory .
• $139.5 million increase in accounts payable and accrued liabilities, which included $75.6 million of higher accounts
payable, $51.5 million of higher accrued workers' participation and $12.4 million of higher other liabilities.
• $271.2 million decrease in other operating assets and liabilities, which included principally $163.9 million of lower
prepaid taxes, mainly due to the use of tax credits from previous years.
        2016:     Net income was $778.8 million, approximately 84% of the net operating cash flow . An increase in operating assets and
liabilities reduced operating cash flow by $393.8 million and included:
• $(143.3) million increase in accounts receivable.
93        Variance  
  2018  2017  2016  2018 - 2017  2017 - 2016  
Net income  $1,548.2  $ 732.4  $778.8  $ 815.8  $ (46.4 )
Depreciation, amortization and
depletion   674.3   671.1   647.1   3.2  24.0 
Provision (benefit) for deferred
income taxes   (51.5 ) 641.5   (117.0) (693.0 ) 758.5  
Loss (gain) on foreign currency
transaction ef fect   17.3  24.9  (8.9) (7.6) 33.8 
Other adjustments to net income   23.1  (3.4) 16.9  26.5  (20.3 )
Operating assets and liabilities   23.7  (89.9 ) (393.8 ) 113.6  303.9  
                 
Net cash provided from operating
activities  $2,235.1  $1,976.6  $923.1  $ 258.5  $1,053.5  
                                  
                 
Table of Contents
• $(207.9) million increase in inventory which includes $(122.3) million of higher leachable material inventory and
$(43.1) million of metals in process, $(26.3) million of higher finished goods and $(16.2) million of higher supplies
inventory .
• $(42.6) million of net changes in accounts payable, accrued liabilities and other operating assets.
Net cash used in investing activities:
        2018:     Net cash used for investing activities in 2018 included $1,121.4 million for capital investments. These included
$347.4 million of investments at our Mexican operations and $774.0 million of investments at our Peruvian operations. For further
information, please see "Capital Investment Program" under this Item on page 74.
        The 2018 investing activities also include net purchases of short-term investments of $163.3 million.
        2017:     Net cash used for investing activities in 2017 included $1,023.5 million for capital investments. These included
$338.1 million of investments at our Mexican operations and $685.4 million of investments at our Peruvian operations. For further
information, please see "Capital Investment Program" under this Item on page 74.
        The 2017 investing activities also include net sales of short-term investments of $1.0 million.
        2016:     Net cash used for investing activities in 2016 included $1,1 18.5 million for capital investments. These included
$577.5 million of investments at our Mexican operations and $541.0 million of investments at our Peruvian operations. For further
information, please see "Capital Investment Program" under this Item on page 74.
        The 2016 investing activities also include net sales of short-term investments of $552.1 million, and a repayment of
$111.2 million received from a related party .
Net cash provided by (used in) financing activities:
        2018:     Net cash used in financing activities in 2018 was $1,083.4 million and included a dividend distribution of
$1,082.3 million.
        2017:     Net cash used in financing activities in 2017 was $456.1 million and included a dividend distribution of $456.1 million.
        2016:     Net cash used in financing activities in 2016 was $210.7 million and included:
• A dividend distribution of $139.3 million.
• The repurchase of 2.9 million of our common shares at a cost of $71.7 million.
Other  Liquidity Considerations
        We expect that we will meet our cash requirements for 2018 and beyond from cash on hand and internally generated funds. In
addition, we believe that we will be able to access additional external financing on reasonable terms, if required.
        As of December 31, 2018, $97.6 million of the Company's total cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash and short-term investments
of $1,058.4 million was held by foreign subsidiaries. The cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments maintained in our foreign
operations are generally used to cover local operating and investment expenses. At December 31, 2016, Minera Mexico determined
that it had $470.5 million in earnings available for dividends to the United States. These earnings had not been remitted, but U.S.
federal income tax, net of foreign tax credit was recognized in 2016 resulting in an increase in tax of $45.7 million. At December 31,
2017, Minera Mexico had determined that it had
94
Table of Contents
earnings available for dividends to the United States of $555.5 million. The 2017 U.S. tax reform introduced a one-time transition tax
that is based upon the Company's total accumulated post-1986 prescribed foreign earnings and profits ("E&P") estimated to be
$8.9 billion, the majority of which was previously considered to be indefinitely reinvested and accordingly , no U.S. federal and state
income taxes were provided. Upon enactment of the 2017 U.S. tax reform, the Company calculated and recorded a provisional tax
amount of $181.1 million as a reasonable estimate for the one-time transition tax that was fully of fset by foreign tax credits. During
2018, the Company determined that this amount should be reduced by $28 million and finalized its transition tax at $153.1 million,
which was fully of fset by foreign tax credits. Earnings of the Company's Peruvian branch are not subject to transition taxes since they
are taxed in the United States on a current basis.
        Share repurchase program:     In 2008, our Board of Directors ("BOD") authorized a $500 million share repurchase program that
has since been increased by the BOD and is currently authorized to $3 billion. Since the inception of the program through
December 31, 2018, we have purchased 1 19.5 million shares of our common stock at a cost of $2.9 billion. These shares are available
for general corporate purposes. We may purchase additional shares of our common stock from time to time based on market conditions
and other factors. This repurchase program has no expiration date and may be modified or discontinued at any time. For further details
please see Item 5 "Market for Registrant's Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities—
SCC common stock repurchase plan."
        Dividend:     On January 24, 2019, the BOD authorized a dividend of $0.40 per share paid on February 26, 2019, to shareholders
of record at the close of business on February 12, 2019. In addition, as part of the settlement of claims brought on behalf of the
Company and its shareholders against Grupo Mexico, AMC and certain current and former directors (together with Grupo Mexico and
AMC, the "Defendants") a dividend of $0.44428 per share was payable on February 21,2019 to shareholders of record at the close of
business on February 1 1, 2019, other than the Defendants. The settlement dividend, totaling $36.5 million is an obligation of Grupo
Mexico and AMC and therefore, have been funded by them. In addition Grupo Mexico and AMC paid $13.5 million of legal fees. For
more information, please see "Litigation matters—Corporate operations" in Note 12 "Commitments and Contingencies" of our
consolidated financial statements.
FINANCING
        Our total debt at December 31, 2018 was $5,960.1 million, compared to $5,957.1 million at December 31, 2017, net of the
unamortized discount and issuance costs of notes issued under par of $91.1 million and $94.1 million at December 31, 2018 and 2017,
respectively . This debt is all denominated in dollars at fixed interest rates, weighed at 5.89%.
        The ratio of total debt to total capitalization was 47.4% at December 31, 2018, compared to 49.2% at December 31, 2017. Also
the ratio of net debt to net capitalization was 42.6% at December 31, 2018, compared to 44.4% at December 31, 2017.
        We define net debt as total debt, including current maturities, minus cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments balance.
We believe that net debt is useful to investors as a measure of our financial position. We define net capitalization as the sum of net debt
and equity . We use the net debt to net capitalization ratio as measure of our indebtedness position and to determine how much debt we
can take in addition to the use of the equity and the balance sheet in general. We define total capitalization as the sum of the carrying
values of our total debt, including current maturities, and equity . A reconciliation of our net debt to net capitalization and total debt to
total capitalization as included in the consolidated balance sheet is presented under the sub heading "Non-GAAP  Information
Reconciliation" below .
95
Table of Contents
        Please see Note 10 "Financing" for a discussion about the covenants requirements related to our long-term debt.
Capital investment programs
        A discussion of our capital investment programs is an important part of understanding our liquidity and capital resources. We
expect to meet the cash requirements for these capital investments from cash on hand, internally generated funds and from additional
external financing if required. For information regarding our capital expenditure programs, please see the discussion under the caption
"Capital Investment Program" under this Item 7.
CONTRACTUAL  OBLIGA TIONS
        The following table summarizes our significant contractual obligations as of December 31, 2018:
        Long-term debt payments do not include the debt discount valuation account and issuance costs of $91.0 million.
        Interest on debt is calculated at rates in ef fect at December 31, 2018. As all our debt is at fixed rates, future expenditures will not
change due to rate changes. Please refer to Note 10 "Financing" of our consolidated financial statements for a description of our long-
term debt arrangements and credit facilities.
        Workers' participation is currently calculated based on Peruvian Branch and Mexican pre-tax earnings. In Peru, the provision for
workers' participation is calculated at 8% of pre-tax earnings. The current portion of this participation, which is accrued during the
year, is based on the Peruvian Branch's taxable income and is lar gely distributed to workers following determination of final results for
the year . Amounts in excess of 18 times a worker's salary is distributed to governmental bodies. In Mexico, workers' participation is
determined using the guidelines established in the Mexican income tax law at a rate of 10% of pre-tax earnings as adjusted by the tax
law.
96    Payments due by Period  
  Total  2019  2020  2021  2022  2023  2024 and
Ther eafter  
    (dollars in millions)  
Long-term debt  $6,051.1  $ — $400.0  $ — $300.0  $ — $5,351.1  
Interest on debt   6,900.8   356.5   341.3   334.9   333.3   324.5   5,210.3  
Uncertain tax
position(a)   214.5   —  —  —  —  —  — 
Workers'
participation   206.6   206.6   —  —  —  —  — 
Pension and post-
retirement
obligations   30.8  3.5  2.6  2.7  2.8  2.9  16.3 
Asset retirement
obligation   217.7   —  —  —  —  —  217.7  
Purchase
obligations:                       
Commitments to
purchase ener gy  3,127.8   218.2   220.5   220.5   227.5   227.5   2,013.6  
Capital investment
projects   343.1   328.1   15.0  —  —  —  — 
                       
Total  $17,092.4  $1,112.9 $979.4  $558.1  $863.6  $554.9  $12,809.0  
                                              
                       
(a) The above table does not include any scheduled payments related to uncertain tax position liabilities because
there is often a high degree of uncertainty regarding the timing of future cash outflows. As of December 31, 2018,
the tax liability recognized by the Company is $214.5 million and is included as non-current liability in the
consolidated Balance Sheet. Please refer to Note 7 "Income Taxes" of our consolidated financial statements.
Table of Contents
        Pension and post retirement obligations include the benefits expected to be paid under our pension and post-retirement benefit
plans. Please refer to Note 1 1 "Benefit Plans" of our consolidated financial statements.
        Asset retirement obligations include the aggregate amount of the closure and remediation costs of our Peruvian mines and
facilities to be paid under the mine closure plans approved by MINEM and the closure and remediation costs of our Mexican
operations. See Note 9 "Asset Retirement Obligation."
        In June 2014, we entered into a power purchase agreement for 120 megawatt ("MW") with the state company Electroperu S.A.,
which began supplying ener gy for our Peruvian operations for twenty years starting on April 17, 2017. In July 2014, we entered into a
power purchase agreement for 120MW  with a private power generator Kallpa Generacion S.A. ("Kallpa"), which began supplying
energy for our Peruvian operations for ten years starting on April 17, 2017. In May 2016, we signed an additional power purchase
agreement for a maximum of 80MW  with Kallpa, under which Kallpa will supply ener gy for the operations related to the Toquepala
Expansion and other minor projects for ten years starting on May 1, 2017 and ending after ten years of commercial operation of the
Toquepala Expansion or on April 30, 2029; whichever occurs first.
        Also we have a commitment to purchase power for our Mexican operations from MGE, a subsidiary of Grupo Mexico through
2032. See Note 12 "Commitment and Contingencies—Other commitments".
        Amounts indicated on the above table are based on our long-term estimated power costs, which are subject to change as ener gy
generation costs change and our forecasted power requirements through the life of the agreements change. Capital investment projects
include committed purchase orders and executed contracts for our Mexican projects, and for our Peruvian expansion projects at Tia
Maria and the Toquepala mine.
CYBERSECURITY :
        Our operations depend upon information technology systems which may be subject to disruption, damage or failure from dif ferent
sources, including, without limitation, installation of malicious software, computer viruses, security breaches, cyber -attacks and
defects in design. In recent years, cybersecurity incidents have increased in frequency and include, but are not limited to, malicious
software, attempts to gain unauthorized access to data and other electronic security breaches that could lead to disruptions in systems,
unauthorized release of confidential or otherwise protected information and the corruption of data. We believe that we have
implemented appropriate preventative measures to mitigate potential risks by implementing a certified IT  service management system
with the necessary controls that are frequently reviewed and tested, including a risk matrix that considers all the possible threats with
an impact and probability analysis, actions to avoid or mitigate them and the corresponding testing plan.
97
Table of Contents
NON-GAAP  INFORMA TION RECONCILIA TION
        Operating cash cost:     Following is a reconciliation of "Operating Cash Cost" (see page 72) to cost of sales (exclusive of
depreciation, amortization and depletion) as reported in our consolidated statement of earnings, in millions of dollars and dollars per
pound in the table below:
        The by-product revenue presented does not match with the sales value reported by segment on page 141 because the above table
excludes purchases from third parties, which are reclassified to net revenue on sale of metal purchased from third parties.
98  2018  2017  2016  
  $ millions  $ per
pound  $ millions  $ per
pound  $ millions  $ per
pound  
Cost of sales (exclusive of
depreciation, amortization and
depletion)  $3,409.0  $1.81 $3,252.8  $1.74 $3,034.1  $1.58 
Add:                    
Selling, general and
administrative   102.6   0.05  93.1  0.05  94.3  0.05 
Sales premiums, net of treatment
and refining char ges   13.9  0.01  22.4  0.01  24.4  0.01 
Less:                    
Workers' participation   (226.1 ) (0.12 ) (196.2 ) (0.11) (130.2 ) (0.07 )
Cost of metals purchased from
third parties   (384.5 ) (0.20 ) (363.2 ) (0.19 ) (329.9 ) (0.17 )
Royalty char ge and other , net   (125.0 ) (0.07 ) (150.5 ) (0.08 ) (74.9 ) (0.04 )
Inventory change   114.5  0.06  139.1   0.07  162.0   0.08 
                    
Operating Cash Cost befor e
by-pr oduct r evenues  $2,904.4  $1.54 $2,797.5  $1.49 $2,779.8  $1.44 
                    
Add:                    
By-product revenues(1)   (1,21 1.4) (0.64 ) (1,030.2 ) (0.55 ) (904.9 ) (0.47 )
Net revenue on sale of metal
purchased from third parties   (56.3 ) (0.03 ) (50.2 ) (0.02 ) (50.7 ) (0.03 )
                    
Add:                    
Total by-product revenues   (1,267.7 ) (0.67 ) (1,080.4 ) (0.57 ) (955.6 ) (0.50 )
                    
Operating Cash Cost net of by-
product r evenues   1,636.7   0.87  1,717.1   0.92  1,824.2   0.95 
                    
Total pounds of copper produced
(in millions)   1,886.8      1,874.5      1,924.7     
(1) By-product revenues included in our presentation of operating cash cost contain the following:
  2018  2017  2016  
  $ millions  $ per
pound  $ millions  $ per
pound  $ millions  $ per
pound  
Molybdenum  $ (509.9 )$(0.27 )$ (353.4 )$(0.19 )$(268.1 )$(0.14 )
Silver   (244.5 ) (0.13 ) (254.9 ) (0.14 ) (246.3 ) (0.13 )
Zinc   (229.5 ) (0.12 ) (221.6 ) (0.12 ) (189.3 ) (0.10 )
Sulfuric Acid   (111.3) (0.06 ) (71.9 ) (0.04 ) (87.6 ) (0.04 )
Gold   (53.1 ) (0.03 ) (61.7 ) (0.03 ) (50.6 ) (0.02 )
Other   (63.1 ) (0.03 ) (66.7 ) (0.03 ) (63.0 ) (0.04 )
                    
Total  $(1,21 1.4)$(0.64 )$(1,030.2 )$(0.55 )$(904.9 )$(0.47 )
                                        
                    
Table of Contents
        Net debt to net capitalization:     Net debt to net capitalization as of December 31, 2018 and 2017 is as follows:
        Total debt to total capitalization:     Total debt to total capitalization as of December 31, 2018 and 2017 is as follows:
ITEM 7A.    QUANTIT ATIVE AND QUALIT ATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT  MARKET  RISK
Commodity price risk:
        For additional information on metal price sensitivity , refer to "Metal Prices" in Part II, Item 7 of this annual report.
Open sales risk:
        Our provisional copper and molybdenum sales contain an embedded derivative that is required to be separate from the host
contract for accounting purposes. The host contract is the receivable from the sale of copper or molybdenum concentrates at prevailing
market prices at the time of the sale. The embedded derivative, which does not qualify for hedge accounting, is marked to market
through earnings each period prior to settlement. See Note 17 to our consolidated financial statements for further information about
these provisional sales.
Foreign currency exchange rate risk:
        Our functional currency is the U.S. dollar . Portions of our operating costs are denominated in Peruvian soles and Mexican pesos.
Since our revenues are primarily denominated in U.S. dollars, when inflation or deflation in our Mexican or Peruvian operations is not
offset by a change in the exchange rate of the sol or the peso to the dollar , our financial position, results of operations and cash flows
could be af fected by local cost conversion when expressed in U.S. dollars. In addition, the dollar value
99  2018  2017  
Total debt  $5,960.1  $5,957.1  
Cash and cash equivalents   (844.6 ) (1,004.8 )
Short-term investments   (213.8 ) (50.5 )
        
Net debt   4,901.7   4,901.8  
Net capitalization:        
Net debt   4,901.7   4,901.8  
Equity   6,612.9   6,149.4  
        
Net capitalization  $11,514.5  $11,051.2  
Net debt/net capitalization(*)   42.6% 44.4%
(*) Represents net debt divided by net capitalization.
  2018  2017  
Total debt  $5,960.1  $5,957.1  
Capitalization        
Debt   5,960.1   5,957.1  
Equity   6,612.9   6,149.4  
        
Total capitalization  $12,572.9  $12,106.5  
Total debt/total capitalization(*)   47.4% 49.2%
(*) Represents debt divided by total capitalization.
Table of Contents
of our net monetary assets denominated in soles or pesos can be af fected by an exchange rate variance of the sol or the peso, resulting
in a re-measurement gain or loss in our financial statements. Recent inflation and exchange rate variances for the three years ended
December 31, 2018, are provided in the table below:
Change in monetary position:
        Assuming an exchange rate variance of 10% at December 31, 2018, we estimate our net monetary position in Peruvian sol and
Mexican peso would increase (decrease) our net earnings as follows:
        The net monetary position is net of those assets and liabilities that are sol or peso denominated at December 31, 2018.
Short-term investments:
        For additional information on our trading securities and available-for -sale investments, refer to Note 3 Short-term Investments in
Part II, Item 8 of this annual report.
100  2018  2017  2016  
Peru:           
Peruvian inflation rate   2.5% 1.5% 3.2%
Initial exchange rate   3.245   3.360   3.413  
Closing exchange rate   3.379   3.245   3.360  
Appreciation/(devaluation)   (4.1)% 3.4% 1.6%
Mexico:           
Mexican inflation rate   4.8% 6.8% 3.4%
Initial exchange rate   19.735   20.664   17.207  
Closing exchange rate   19.683   19.735   20.664  
Appreciation/(devaluation)   0.3% 4.5% (20.1 )%
  Effect in net
earnings
($ in millions)  
Appreciation of 10% in U.S. dollar vs. Peruvian sol  $ 16.0 
Devaluation of 10% in U.S. dollar vs. Peruvian sol  $ (19.5 )
Appreciation of 10% in U.S. dollar vs. Mexican peso  $ 15.5 
Devaluation of 10% in U.S. dollar vs. Mexican peso  $ (19.0 )
Table of Contents
ITEM 8.    FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENT AL DATA
REPOR T OF INDEPENDENT  REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the Board of Directors and Stockholders of Southern Copper Corporation:
Opinion on the Consolidated Financial Statements
        We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Southern Copper Corporation and subsidiaries (the
"Company") as of December 31, 2018 and 2017, the related consolidated statements of earnings, comprehensive income, changes in
stockholders´equity , and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2018 and the related notes and
schedule listed in the Index at Item 15 (collectively referred to as the "consolidated financial statements"). In our opinion, the
consolidated financial statements present fairly , in all material respects, the financial position of the Company as of December 31,
2018 and 2017, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2018,
in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
        We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
("PCAOB"), the Company's internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2018, based on criteria established in Internal
Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Or ganizations of the Treadway Commission and our
report dated March 1, 2019 expressed an unqualified opinion on the Company's internal control over financial reporting.
Basis for  Opinion
        These consolidated financial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an
opinion on the Company's consolidated financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the
PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the
applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
        We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial statements are free of material misstatement whether due
to error or fraud. Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the consolidated financial
statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining,
on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the consolidated financial statements. Our audits also included
evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation
of the consolidated financial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Galaz, Yamazaki, Ruiz Urquiza, S.C.
Member of Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu Limited
101/s/ DANIEL  TOLEDO ANT ONIO
C.P.C. Daniel Toledo Antonio
We have served as the Company's auditor since 2009
Mexico City , Mexico
March 1, 2019  
Table of Contents
Southern Copper  Corporation
and Subsidiaries
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF  EARNINGS
   
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
102For the years ended December  31,
(in millions, except for  per shar e amounts)  2018  2017  2016  
Net sales (including sales to related parties, see note 16)  $7,096.7  $6,654.5  $5,379.8  
Operating cost and expenses:           
Cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and
depletion shown separately below)   3,409.0   3,252.8   3,034.1  
Selling, general and administrative   102.6   93.1  94.3 
Depreciation, amortization and depletion   674.3   671.1   647.1  
Exploration   29.6  28.8  40.1 
Environmental remediation   —  (10.2 ) — 
           
Total operating costs and expenses   4,215.5   4,035.6   3,815.6  
           
Operating income   2,881.2   2,618.9   1,564.2  
Interest expense   (360.9 ) (357.4 ) (360.3 )
Capitalized interest   83.8  51.4  69.6 
Other expense   (30.7 ) (15.7 ) (24.6 )
Interest income   16.0  5.5  7.1 
           
Income before income taxes   2,589.4   2,302.7   1,256.0  
Current income taxes and royalty taxes   1,105.0   951.7   623.6  
Deferred income taxes   (51.5 ) 641.7   (122.5 )
           
Net income before equity earnings of af filiate   1,535.9   709.3   754.9  
Equity earnings of af filiate, net of income tax   12.3  23.1  23.9 
           
Net income   1,548.2   732.4   778.8  
Less: Net income attributable to the non-controlling interest   5.2  3.9  2.3 
           
Net income attributable to SCC  $1,543.0  $ 728.5  $ 776.5  
                      
           
Per common share amounts attributable to SCC:           
Net earnings—basic and diluted  $ 2.00 $ 0.94 $ 1.00 
Dividends declared and paid  $ 1.40 $ 0.59 $ 0.18 
Weighted average shares outstanding—basic and diluted   773.0   773.0   773.6  
                      
           
Table of Contents
Southern Copper  Corporation
and Subsidiaries
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF  COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
   
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
103  2018  2017  2016  
  (in millions)  
COMPREHENSIVE INCOME:           
Net income  $1,548.2  $732.4  $778.8  
           
Other comprehensive income (loss) net of tax:           
—Decrease (increase) in pension and other post-retirement benefits
(net of income tax of $2.1, $(1.6) and $2.6, respectively)   (2.9) 2.6  (3.5)
—Foreign currency translation adjustments   —  0.3  — 
           
Total other comprehensive income (loss)   (2.9) 2.9  (3.5)
           
Total comprehensive income   1,545.3   735.3   775.3  
Comprehensive income attributable to the non-controlling interest   5.2  3.9  2.3 
           
Comprehensive income attributable to SCC  $1,540.1  $731.4  $773.0  
                      
           
Table of Contents
Southern Copper  Corporation
and Subsidiaries
CONSOLIDA TED BALANCE SHEETS
   
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
104At December  31, (in millions)  2018  2017  
ASSETS        
Current assets:        
Cash and cash equivalents  $ 844.6  $1,004.8  
Short-term investments   213.8   50.5 
Accounts receivable trade   822.4   890.6  
Accounts receivable other (including related parties 2018—$101.5 and 2017
—$26.1)   150.2   85.8 
Inventories   1,032.7   1,041.9  
Prepaid taxes   87.0  85.5 
Other current assets   29.3  11.0 
        
Total current assets   3,180.0   3,170.1  
Property and mine development, net   9,403.8   9,099.6  
Ore stockpiles on leach pads   1,177.4   977.4  
Intangible assets, net   147.7   152.5  
Deferred income tax   400.9   164.9  
Equity method investment   103.6   99.7 
Other non-current assets   71.4  115.9 
        
Total assets  $14,484.8  $13,780.1  
                
        
LIABILITIES        
Current liabilities:        
Accounts payable (including related parties 2018—$75.3 and 2017—$90.1)  $ 673.4  $ 659.8  
Accrued income taxes   232.8   226.4  
Accrued workers' participation   206.7   176.9  
Accrued interest   83.9  83.9 
Other accrued liabilities   19.5  21.3 
        
Total current liabilities   1,216.3   1,168.3  
        
Long-term debt   5,960.1   5,957.1  
Deferred income taxes   202.6   38.5 
Non-current taxes payable   207.1   207.1  
Other liabilities and reserves   68.2  37.2 
Asset retirement obligation   217.7   222.5  
        
Total non-current liabilities   6,655.7   6,462.4  
        
Commitments and contingencies (Note 12)        
STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY  (NOTE 13)        
Common stock par value $0.01; shares authorized, 2018 and 2017—2,000;
shares issued, 2018 and 2017—884.6   8.8  8.8 
Additional paid-in capital   3,393.7   3,373.3  
Retained earnings   6,186.9   5,726.2  
Accumulated other comprehensive income   (2.4) 0.5 
Treasury stock, at cost, common shares   (3,019.6 ) (3,001.1 )
        
Total Southern Copper Corporation stockholders' equity   6,567.4   6,107.7  
Non-controlling interest   45.4  41.7 
        
Total equity   6,612.8   6,149.4  
        
Total liabilities and equity  $14,484.8  $13,780.1  
                
        
Table of Contents
Southern Copper  Corporation
and Subsidiaries
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF  CASH FLOWS
 
   
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
105For the years ended December  31,
(in millions)  2018  2017  2016  
OPERA TING ACTIVITIES           
Net income  $1,548.2  $ 732.4  $ 778.8  
Adjustments to reconcile net earnings to net cash provided
from operating activities:           
Depreciation, amortization and depletion   674.3   671.1   647.1  
Equity earnings of af filiate, net of dividends received   (3.9) (12.3 ) (11.3)
Loss (gain) on foreign currency transaction ef fect   17.3  24.9  (8.9)
Provision (benefit) for deferred income taxes   (51.5 ) 641.5   (117.0)
Other , net   27.0  8.9  28.2 
Change in operating assets and liabilities:           
(Increase) decrease in accounts receivable   68.3  (298.7 ) (143.3 )
(Increase) decrease in inventories   (190.8 ) (201.9 ) (207.9 )
Increase (decrease) in accounts payable and accrued
liabilities   117.8  139.5   30.5 
(Increase) decrease in other operating assets and liabilities   28.4  271.2   (73.1 )
           
Net cash provided by operating activities   2,235.1   1,976.6   923.1  
           
INVESTING ACTIVITIES           
Capital expenditures   (1,121.4 ) (1,023.5 ) (1,118.5)
Purchase of short-term investments   (310.6 ) (61.3 ) (129.8 )
Proceeds on sale of short-term investment   147.3   62.3  681.9  
Loan repaid by related parties   —  —  111.2 
Other , net   (11.5) 3.5  3.2 
           
Net cash used in investing activities   (1,296.2 ) (1,019.0 ) (452.0 )
           
FINANCING ACTIVITIES           
Repurchase of common shares   —  —  (71.7 )
Cash dividends paid to common stockholders   (1,082.3 ) (456.1 ) (139.3 )
Distributions to non-controlling interest   (1.5) (0.3) — 
Other , net   0.4  0.3  0.3 
           
Net cash used in financing activities   (1,083.4 ) (456.1 ) (210.7 )
           
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash and cash equivalents   (15.7 ) (42.7 ) 11.1 
           
Increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents   (160.2 ) 458.8   271.5  
Cash and cash equivalents, at beginning of year   1,004.8   546.0   274.5  
           
Cash and cash equivalents, at end of year  $ 844.6  $1,004.8  $ 546.0  
                      
           
  2018  2017  2016  
  (in millions)  
Supplemental disclosur e of cash flow information:           
Cash paid during the year for:           
Interest  $356.7  $356.7  $356.7  
Income taxes  $1,155.3  $889.8  $571.8  
Workers' participation  $194.0  $136.0  $121.6  
Supplemental schedule of non-cash operating, investing and
financing activities:           
Decrease (increase) in pension and other post-retirement benefits  $ (2.9)$ 2.9 $(3.5)
Capital expenditures incurred but not yet paid  $ 37.7 $137.7  $99.4 
Table of Contents
Southern Copper  Corporation
and Subsidiaries
CONSOLIDA TED ST ATEMENTS OF  CHANGES IN EQUITY
   
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
106For years ended December  31,
(in millions)  2018  2017  2016  
TOTAL EQUITY , beginning of year  $6,149.4  $5,870.9  $5,299.2  
           
STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY , beginning of year   6,107.7   5,832.3   5,262.9  
CAPIT AL STOCK: 
         
Balance at beginning and end of year:   8.8  8.8  8.8 
ADDITIONAL  PAID-IN CAPIT AL: 
         
Balance at beginning of year   3,373.3   3,358.2   3,349.8  
Other activity of the period   20.4  15.1  8.4 
           
Balance at end of year   3,393.7   3,373.3   3,358.2  
           
TREASUR Y STOCK:           
Southern Copper common shares           
Balance at beginning of the year   (2,768.7 ) (2,769.0 ) (2,697.6 )
Share repurchase program   —  —  (71.7 )
Used for corporate purposes   0.4  0.3  0.3 
           
Balance at end of period   (2,768.3 ) (2,768.7 ) (2,769.0 )
           
Parent Company common shares           
Balance at beginning of year   (232.4 ) (218.6 ) (211.3)
Other activity , including dividend, interest and foreign currency
transaction ef fect 
 (18.9 ) (13.8 ) (7.3)
           
Balance at end of year   (251.3 ) (232.4 ) (218.6 )
           
Treasury stock balance at end of year   (3,019.6 ) (3,001.1 ) (2,987.6 )
           
RETAINED EARNINGS:           
Balance at beginning of year   5,726.2   5,455.3   4,812.1  
Net earnings   1,543.0   728.5   776.5  
Dividends declared and paid, common stock, per share, 2018—
$1.40, 2017—$0.59, 2016—$0.18 
 (1,082.3 ) (456.1 ) (139.3 )
Other activity of the period   —  (1.5) 6.0 
           
Balance at end of year   6,186.9   5,726.2   5,455.3  
           
ACCUMULA TED OTHER COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
(LOSS): 
         
Balance at beginning of year   0.5  (2.4) 1.1 
Other comprehensive income (loss)   (2.9) 2.9  (3.5)
           
Balance at end of year   (2.4) 0.5  (2.4)
           
STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY , end of year   6,567.4   6,107.7   5,832.3  
           
NON-CONTROLLING INTEREST , beginning of year   41.7  38.6  36.3 
Net earnings   5.2  3.9  2.3 
Distributions paid   (1.5) (0.8) — 
Other activity   —  —  — 
           
NON-CONTROLLING INTEREST , end of year   45.4  41.7  38.6 
           
TOTAL EQUITY , end of year  $6,612.8  $6,149.4  $5,870.9  
                                 
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS
NOTE 1—DESCRIPTION OF  THE BUSINESS:
        The Company is a majority-owned, indirect subsidiary of Grupo Mexico S.A.B. de C.V . ("Grupo Mexico"). At December 31,
2018, Grupo Mexico through its wholly-owned subsidiary Americas Mining Corporation ("AMC") owned 88.9% of the Company's
capital stock. The consolidated financial statements presented herein consist of the accounts of Southern Copper Corporation ("SCC",
"Southern Copper" or the "Company"), a Delaware corporation, and its subsidiaries. The Company is an integrated producer of copper
and other minerals, and operates mining, smelting and refining facilities in Peru and Mexico. The Company conducts its primary
operations in Peru through a registered branch (the "Peruvian Branch" or "Branch" or "SPCC Peru Branch"). The Peruvian Branch is
not a corporation separate from the Company . The Company's Mexican operations are conducted through subsidiaries. The Company
also conducts exploration activities in Argentina, Chile, Ecuador , Mexico and Peru.
NOTE 2—SUMMAR Y OF SIGNIFICANT  ACCOUNTING POLICIES:
Principles of consolidation—
        The consolidated financial statements include the accounts of subsidiaries of which the Company has voting control, in
accordance with Accounting Standards Codification ("ASC") 810 Consolidation . Such financial statements are prepared in accordance
with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States ("U.S. GAAP").
Use of estimates—
        The preparation of financial statements in conformity with U.S. GAAP  requires management to make estimates and assumptions
that af fect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities, and disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the financial
statements, and the reported amounts of revenues and expenses during the reporting period. Significant items subject to such estimates
and assumptions include the carrying value of ore reserves that are the basis for future cash flow estimates and amortization
calculations; environmental reclamation, closure and retirement obligations; estimates of recoverable copper in mill and leach
stockpiles; asset impairments (including estimates of future cash flows); unrecognized tax benefits; valuation allowances for deferred
tax assets; and fair value of financial instruments. Management bases its estimates on the Company's historical experience and on
various other assumptions that are believed to be reasonable under the circumstances. Actual results could dif fer from those estimates.
Revenue r ecognition—
        The Company adopted ASC 606, Revenue from Contracts with Customers, ef fective January 1, 2018, on a modified retrospective
basis, applying the standard to all contracts that are not completed as such date. The Company's revenue consists of product revenue
resulting from the sale of copper and non-copper products, such as molybdenum, silver , zinc, lead and gold. Other than increased
disclosures, the adoption of the new guidance did not have an impact on the Company's revenue recognition.
        The Company accounts for a contract with a customer when there is a legally enforceable contract between the Company and the
customer , the rights of the parties are identified, the contract has commercial substance, and collectability of the contract consideration
is probable. The Company's revenues are measured based on consideration specified in the contract with each customer . Disclosures
107
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 2—SUMMAR Y OF SIGNIFICANT  ACCOUNTING POLICIES: (Continued)
regarding disaggregation of revenues and contract balances are disclosed within Note 17 "Segment and related information".
        The Company's marketing strategy and annual sales planning emphasize developing and maintaining long-term customer
relationships. Generally , 80% to 90% of the Company's metal production is sold under annual or longer -term contracts, which specify
a volume of mineral to be sold over a stated period and delivery schedule; the price at which mineral will be sold at each delivery date
is generally determined by the weekly or monthly average rate of the commodity published by major metal exchanges at specific dates
stipulated within each contract. The Company considers each contract to be a single performance obligation, represented by the
delivery of a series of distinct goods that are substantially the same, with the same pattern of transfer to the Company's customers. The
Company concluded this as, based on the nature of its contracts, customers receive the benefit of mineral sold as it is shipped per the
terms of the contracts at each contractual delivery date. Likewise, each shipment of product represents the same measure of progress as
other shipments within the contract. Accordingly , the Company recognizes revenues for each contract over the period of time in which
the specified quantity of mineral is delivered. In doing so, the Company considers that it has a right to consideration from its customers
in an amount that corresponds directly to the value transferred to those customers that being the quantity of mineral delivered at the
price per unit delivered. Accordingly , the Company recognizes revenue at the amount to which it has the right to invoice (the invoice
practical expedient), as it believes that this method is a faithful depiction of the transfer of goods to its customers.
        For contracts with a term greater than one year , the Company is unable to disclose an allocation of the transaction price to the
remaining unsatisfied performance obligation, given that unit prices of mineral sold are determined by published commodity prices at
specified dates within the contract. The volume of mineral to be delivered after the first year of the contract is subject to annual volume
negotiations in accordance with the terms of the contract. As of December 31, 2018, the Company has long-term contracts with
promises to deliver a total of 1,724,840 metric tons of mineral in 2019. This is an estimate that will vary in 2020 and 2021 based on the
negotiations with the customers as mentioned above.
        The remainder of the Company's revenues, including its by-product revenues, are generated by spot sales that are recognized at a
point in time.
        Under both sales models, revenue is recognized when or as the performance obligations are satisfied, when the Company transfers
control of the goods and title passes to the customer . Considering the International Commercial Terms (Incoterms) utilized by the
Company , control is transferred generally upon the completion of loading the material at the point of origin. This is the point at which
the customer obtains legal title to the product as well as the ability to direct the use of and obtain substantially all of the remaining
benefits of ownership of the asset. Additionally , payment is generally due upon the delivery of the shipping and title documents at the
point of origin, customers typically have 30 days to remit payment. Copper and non-copper revenues are measured based on the
monthly average of prevailing commodity prices according to the terms of the contracts. The Company provides allowances for
doubtful accounts based upon historical bad debt and claims experience and periodic evaluation of specific customer accounts.
        Substantially all of the Company's sales are made under carriage and insurance paid to, or cost, insurance and freight Incoterms,
whereby the Company is responsible for providing shipping and
108
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 2—SUMMAR Y OF SIGNIFICANT  ACCOUNTING POLICIES: (Continued)
insurance after control of the inventory has been transferred to the customer . According to the terms of the Company's contracts, these
services are not distinct within the context of the contract, and they are not separately identifiable from the other promises within the
contract.Additionally , it is the Company policy and it has a long-standing history of providing shipping and insurance services to its
customers. Accordingly , shipping and insurance are not considered separate performance obligations. The related costs of shipping and
insurance are presented within the cost of sales line in the accompanying consolidated statements of income.
        Furthermore, the Company considered the impact of the shipping and insurance services on the determination of when control is
transferred to its customers. It has concluded that the terms of these services do not impact its customers' ability to sell, pledge, or
otherwise use the products in shipment. Also, there is a small likelihood and minimal history of lost or damaged goods during
shipment. Considering these factors, combined with the other indicators of control previously mentioned, the Company has concluded
that these services do not impact the determination that control is transferred at the point of origin.
        For certain of the Company's sales of copper and molybdenum products, customer contracts allow for pricing based on a month
subsequent to shipping, in most cases within the following three months and occasionally in some cases a few additional months. In
such cases, revenue is recorded at a provisional price at the time of shipment. The provisionally priced copper sales are adjusted to
reflect forward LME or COMEX copper prices at the end of each month until a final adjustment is made to the price of the shipments
upon settlement with customers pursuant to the terms of the contract. In the case of molybdenum sales, for which there are no
published forward prices, the provisionally priced sales are adjusted to reflect the market prices at the end of each month until a final
adjustment is made to the price of the shipments upon settlement with customers pursuant to the terms of the contract.
        These provisional pricing arrangements are accounted for separately from the contract as an embedded derivative instrument
under ASC 815-30 "Derivatives and Hedging—Cash Flow Hedges." The Company sells copper in concentrate, anode, blister and
refined form at industry standard commercial terms. Net sales include the invoiced value of copper , zinc, silver , molybdenum, sulfuric
acid and other metals and the corresponding fair value adjustment of the related forward contract of copper and molybdenum.
Disclosure regarding adjustments to sales for provisionally priced contracts is disclosed within Note 17 "Segment and related
information".
Cash and cash equivalents—
        Cash and cash equivalents include bank deposits, certificates of deposit and short-term investment funds with original maturities
of three months or less at the date of purchase. The carrying value of cash and cash equivalents approximates fair value.
Short-term investments—
        The Company accounts for short-term investments in accordance with ASC 320-10 "Investments Debt and Equity Securities—
Recognition." The Company determines the appropriate classification of all short-term investments as held-to-maturity , available-for -
sale or trading at the time of purchase and re-evaluates such classifications as of each balance sheet date. Unrealized gains and losses
on available-for -sale investments, net of taxes, are reported as a component of accumulated other
109
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 2—SUMMAR Y OF SIGNIFICANT  ACCOUNTING POLICIES: (Continued)
comprehensive income (loss) in stockholders' equity , unless such loss is deemed to be other than temporary .
Inventories—
        The Company principally produces copper and, in the production process, obtains several by-products, including molybdenum,
silver , zinc, sulfuric acid and other metals.
        Metal inventories, consisting of work-in-process and finished goods, are carried at the lower of average cost or market. Costs of
work-in-process inventories and finished goods mainly include power , labor , fuel, operating and repair materials, depreciation,
amortization, depletion, and other necessary costs related to the extraction and processing of ore, including mining, milling,
concentrating, smelting, refining, leaching and chemical processing. Costs incurred in the production of metal inventories exclude
general and administrative costs. Once molybdenum, silver , zinc and other by-products are identified, they are transferred to their
respective production facilities and the incremental cost required to complete production is assigned to their inventory value.
        Work-in-process inventories represent materials that are in the process of being converted into a saleable product. Conversion
processes vary depending on the nature of the copper ore and the specific mining operation. For sulfide ores, processing includes
milling and concentrating and results in the production of copper and molybdenum concentrates.
        Finished goods include saleable products (e.g., copper concentrates, copper anodes, copper cathodes, copper rod, molybdenum
concentrate and other metallur gical products).
        Supplies inventories are carried at the lower of average cost or market.
Long-term inventory—Or e stockpiles on leach pads.
        The leaching process is an integral part of the mining operations carried out at the Company's open-pit mines. The Company
capitalizes the production cost of leachable material at its Toquepala, La Caridad and Buenavista mines recognizing it as inventory .
This cost includes mining and haulage costs incurred to deliver ore to leach pads, depreciation, amortization, depletion and site
overhead costs. The estimates of recoverable mineral content contained in the leaching dumps are supported by engineering studies. As
the production cycle of the leaching process is significantly longer than the conventional process of concentrating, smelting and
electrolytic refining, the Company includes on its balance sheet current leach inventory (included in work-in-process inventories) and
long-term leach inventory . Amortization of leachable material is recorded by the units of production method.
Property—
        Property is recorded at acquisition cost, net of accumulated depreciation and amortization. Cost includes major expenditures for
improvements and replacements, which extend useful lives or increase capacity and interest costs associated with significant capital
additions. Maintenance, repairs, normal development costs at existing mines and gains or losses on assets retired or sold are reflected
in earnings as incurred.
        Buildings and equipment are depreciated on the straight-line method over estimated lives from five to 40 years or the estimated
life of the mine if shorter .
110
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 2—SUMMAR Y OF SIGNIFICANT  ACCOUNTING POLICIES: (Continued)
Mine development—
        Mine development includes primarily the cost of acquiring land rights to an exploitable ore body , pre-production stripping costs at
new mines that are commercially exploitable, costs associated with bringing new mineral properties into production, and removal of
overburden to prepare unique and identifiable areas outside the current mining area for such future production. Mine development
costs are amortized on a unit of production basis over the remaining life of the mines.
        There is a diversity of practices in the mining industry in the treatment of drilling and other related costs to delineate new ore
reserves. The Company follows the practices outlined in the next two paragraphs in its treatment of drilling and related costs.
        Drilling and other associated costs incurred in the Company's ef forts to delineate new resources, whether near -mine or Greenfield
are expensed as incurred. These costs are classified as mineral exploration costs. Once the Company determines through feasibility
studies that proven and probable reserves exist and that the drilling and other associated costs embody a probable future benefit that
involves a capacity , singly or in combination with other assets, to contribute directly or indirectly to future net cash inflow , then the
costs are classified as mine development costs. These mine development costs incurred prospectively to develop the property are
capitalized as incurred, until the commencement of production, and are amortized using the units of production method over estimated
life of the ore body . During the production stage, drilling and other related costs incurred to maintain production are included in
production cost in the period in which they are incurred.
        Drilling and other related costs incurred in the Company's ef forts to delineate a major expansion of reserves at an existing
production property are expensed as incurred. Once the Company determines through feasibility studies that proven and probable
incremental reserves exist and that the drilling and other associated costs embody a probable future benefit that involves a capacity ,
singly or in combination with other assets, to contribute directly or indirectly to future net cash inflow , then the costs are classified as
mine development costs. These incremental mine development costs are capitalized as incurred, until the commencement of
production and amortized using the units of production method over the estimated life of the ore body . A major expansion of reserves
is one that increases total reserves at a property by approximately 10% or more.
        For the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, the Company did not capitalize any drilling and related costs.
Asset r etirement obligations (r eclamation and r emediation costs)—
        The fair value of a liability for asset retirement obligations is recognized in the period in which the liability is incurred. The
liability is measured at fair value and is adjusted to its present value in subsequent periods as accretion expense is recorded. The
corresponding asset retirement costs are capitalized as part of the carrying value of the related long-lived assets and depreciated over
the asset's useful life.
Intangible assets—
        Intangible assets include primarily the excess amount paid over the book value for investment shares which are presented as
mining concessions, and mining and engineering development studies. Intangible assets are carried at acquisition costs, net of
accumulated amortization and are amortized
111
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 2—SUMMAR Y OF SIGNIFICANT  ACCOUNTING POLICIES: (Continued)
principally on a unit of production basis over the estimated remaining life of the mines. Intangible assets are reviewed for impairment
whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of the asset may not be recoverable.
Debt issuance costs—
        Debt issuance costs related to a recognized debt liability are presented in the balance sheet as a direct deduction from the carrying
amount of that debt liability , consistent with the treatment of a debt discount.
Ore reserves—
        The Company periodically reevaluates estimates of its ore reserves, which represent the Company's estimate as to the amount of
unmined copper remaining in its existing mine locations that can be produced and sold at a profit. Such estimates are based on
engineering evaluations derived from samples of drill holes and other openings, combined with assumptions about copper market
prices and production costs at each of the respective mines.
        The Company updates its estimate of ore reserves at the beginning of each year . In this calculation, the Company uses current
metal prices which are defined as the average metal price over the preceding three years. The current price per pound of copper , as
defined, was $2.64, $2.50 and $2.61 at the end of 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively . The ore reserve estimates are used to determine
the amortization of mine development and intangible assets.
        Once the Company determines through feasibility studies that proven and probable reserves exist and that the drilling and other
associated costs embody a probable future benefit that involves a capacity , singly or in combination with other assets, to contribute
directly or indirectly to future net cash inflow , then the costs are classified as mine development costs and the Company discloses the
related ore reserves.
Exploration—
        Tangible and intangible costs incurred in the search for mineral properties are char ged against earnings when incurred.
Income taxes—
        Provisions for income taxes are based on taxes payable or refundable for the current year and deferred taxes on temporary
differences between the amount of taxable income and pretax financial income and between the tax bases of assets and liabilities and
their reported amounts in the financial statements. Deferred tax assets and liabilities are included in the financial statements at
currently enacted income tax rates applicable to the period in which the deferred tax assets and liabilities are expected to be realized
and settled as prescribed in ASC 740 "Income taxes." As changes in tax laws or rates are enacted, deferred tax assets and liabilities are
adjusted through the provision for income taxes. Deferred income tax assets are reduced by any benefits that, in the opinion of
management, are more likely not to be realized.
        The Company's operations involve dealing with uncertainties and judgments in the application of complex tax regulations in
multiple jurisdictions. The final taxes paid are dependent upon many factors,
112
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 2—SUMMAR Y OF SIGNIFICANT  ACCOUNTING POLICIES: (Continued)
including negotiations with taxing authorities in various jurisdictions and resolution of disputes arising from federal, state, and
international tax audits. The Company recognizes potential liabilities and records tax liabilities for anticipated tax audit issues in the
U.S. and other tax jurisdictions based on its estimate of whether , and the extent to which, additional taxes will be due. The Company
follows the guidance of ASC 740 "Income taxes" to record these liabilities. (See Note 7 "Income taxes" of the consolidated financial
statements for additional information). The Company adjusts these reserves in light of changing facts and circumstances; however , due
to the complexity of some of these uncertainties, the ultimate resolution may result in a payment that is materially dif ferent from the
Company's current estimate of the tax liabilities. If its estimate of tax liabilities proves to be less than the ultimate assessment, an
additional char ge to expense would result. If payment of these amounts ultimately proves to be less than the recorded amounts, the
reversal of the liabilities would result in tax benefits being recognized in the period when the Company determines the liabilities are no
longer necessary .
        The Company classifies income tax-related interest and penalties as income taxes in the financial statements, as well as interest
and penalties, if any , related to unrecognized tax benefits.
        On December 22, 2017, the U.S. government enacted the "T ax Cuts and Jobs Act" (the "TCJA"). The TCJA  contains numerous
provisions, the following of which most significantly impact the Company: (i) a decrease in the corporate tax rate from 35% to 21%;
(ii) a transition of the U.S. taxation of international operation from a worldwide system to a quasi-territorial system and a one-time
transition tax on the mandatory deemed repatriation of cumulative foreign earnings as of December 31, 2017, (iii) generally eliminates
U.S. federal income taxes on dividends from foreign subsidiaries, requiring a current inclusion in U.S. federal taxable income of
certain earnings of controlled foreign corporations and (iv) limitations on the use of foreign tax credits to reduce the U.S. income tax
liability .
        The U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC") issued Staf f Accounting Bulletin No. 1 18 ("SAB 1 18"), which provides
guidance on accounting for the tax ef fects of the TCJA. The Company has adopted SAB 1 18. Accordingly , the provisions of the TCJA
deemed most relevant to the Company were considered in preparation of its financial statements as of December 31, 2017 based on the
Company's best estimate, and the provisions of the TCJA  were finalized in its financial statements as of December 31, 2018. See
further disclosure regarding the impacts of the TCJA  and the adoption of SAB 1 18 in Note 7 to the accompanying consolidated
financial statements.
Foreign exchange—
        The Company's functional currency is the U.S. dollar . As required by local law , both the Peruvian Branch and Minera Mexico
maintain their books of accounts in Peruvian soles and Mexican pesos, respectively .
        Foreign currency assets and liabilities are remeasured into U.S. dollars at current exchange rates, except for non-monetary items
such as inventory , property , intangible assets and other assets which are remeasured at historical exchange rates. Revenues and
expenses are generally translated at actual exchange rates in ef fect during the period, except for those items related to balance sheet
amounts that are remeasured at historical exchange rates. Gains and losses from foreign currency remeasurement are included in
earnings of the period.
113
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 2—SUMMAR Y OF SIGNIFICANT  ACCOUNTING POLICIES: (Continued)
        Gains and (losses) resulting from foreign currency transactions are included in "Cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation,
amortization and depletion)."
Asset impairments—
        The Company evaluates long-term assets when events or changes in economic circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of
such assets may not be recoverable. These evaluations are based on business plans that are prepared using a time horizon that is
reflective of the Company's expectations of metal prices over its business cycle. The Company is currently using a long-term average
copper price and an average molybdenum price for impairment tests, reflective of what the Company believes is the lower level of the
current price environment. The results of its impairment tests using these long-term copper and molybdenum prices show no
impairment in the carrying value of their assets.
        In recent years testing using assumptions for long-term average prices have resulted in stricter evaluation for impairment analysis
than would the higher three year average prices for copper and molybdenum prices. Should this situation reverse in the future with
three year average prices below the long-term price assumption, the Company would assess the need to use the three year average
prices in its evaluations. The Company uses an estimate of the future undiscounted net cash flows of the related asset or asset group
over the remaining life to measure whether the assets are recoverable and measures any impairment by reference to fair value.
Other compr ehensive income—
        Comprehensive income represents changes in equity during a period, except those resulting from investments by owners and
distributions to owners. During the fiscal years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, the components of "other comprehensive
income (loss)" were, the unrecognized gain (loss) on employee benefit obligations and foreign currency translation adjustments.
Business segments—
        Company management views Southern Copper as having three reportable segments and manages it on the basis of these
segments. The segments identified by the Company are: 1) the Peruvian operations, which include the two open-pit copper mines in
Peru and the plants and services supporting such mines, 2) the Mexican open-pit copper mines, which include La Caridad and
Buenavista mine complexes and their supporting facilities and 3) the Mexican under ground mining operations, which include five
under ground mines that produce zinc, lead, copper , silver and gold, a coal mine and a zinc refinery . Please see Note 17 "Segments and
Related Information."
        Senior management of the Company focus on operating income as measure of performance to evaluate dif ferent segments, and to
make decisions to allocate resources to the reported segments. This is a common measure in the mining industry .
ADOPTION OF LEASES ST ANDARD
        On February 25, 2016, the F ASB issued ASU 2016-02 "Leases" (T opic 842). This update significantly modifies the accounting
model of leases for lessees requiring them to recognize assets and liabilities in the balance sheet for virtually all leases. However , the
classification of leases as finance
114
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 2—SUMMAR Y OF SIGNIFICANT  ACCOUNTING POLICIES: (Continued)
leases or operating leases is maintained for lessees. In addition, for leases with a term of 12 months or less, a lessee can elect by class
of underlying asset not to record assets and liabilities on the balance sheet, and recognize lease expense on a straight-line basis over the
lease term.
        The lessor accounting model for leases remains mostly unchanged from previous guidance, except for specific profit recognition
requirements which were modified in order to align them to the new revenue recognition standard issued by the F ASB, and the lease
classification criteria, to ensure consistency with those for a lessee.
        The amendments in this update were ef fective for the Company on January 1, 2019. During 2018, the Company developed an
implementation plan with a cross-functional team, which performed a completeness assessment over the lease contracts of the
Company , established new policies, procedures and internal controls related to the new standard. As result of it analysis, the Company
has preliminarily concluded that substantially all of its existing lease contracts at December 31, 2018, will be classified as operating
lease contracts.
        The Company elected the transition approach whereby it will apply the new leases standard at the adoption date and recognize a
cumulative-ef fect adjustment to the opening balance of retained earnings in the period of adoption. Consequently , the financial
statements for prior periods will not be modified. At the date of adoption, the Company preliminarily assessed that the adoption of the
new leases standard will result in the recognition of right of use assets and lease obligations of approximately $1,1 15.9 million, which
will be recorded in the Company's balance sheet as of January 1, 2019.
        Additionally , the Company may elect the short-term lease recognition exemption (short-term lease practical expedient) by class of
underlying asset (which results in of f-balance-sheet accounting for the lease). It is expected that the Company will disclose if that it
has done so and its ef fects in 2019.
NOTE 3—SHOR T-TERM INVESTMENTS:
        Short-term investments were as follows ($ in millions):
        Trading securities consist of bonds issued by public companies and are publicly traded. Each financial instrument is independent
of the others. The Company has the intention to sell these bonds in the short-term.
        Available-for -sale investments consist of securities issued by public companies. Each security is independent of the others and, as
of December 31, 2018 and 2017, included corporate bonds and asset and mortgage backed obligations. As of December 31, 2018 and
2017, gross unrealized gains and losses on available-for -sale securities were not material.
115  At December  31,  
  2018  2017  
Trading securities  $213.1  $49.5 
Weighted average interest rate   2.2% 1.8%
Available-for -sale  $ 0.7 $1.0 
Weighted average interest rate   0.7% 0.70%
        
Total  $213.8  $50.5 
                
        
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 3—SHOR T-TERM INVESTMENTS: (Continued)
        Related to these investments the Company earned interest, which was recorded as interest income in the consolidated statement of
earnings. Also the Company redeemed some of these securities and recognized gains (losses) due to changes in fair value, which were
recorded as other income (expense) in the consolidated statement of earnings.
        The following table summarizes the activity of these investments by category (in millions):
        At December 31, 2018 and 2017, contractual maturities of the available-for -sale debt securities are as follows (in millions):
NOTE 4—INVENT ORIES:
        Total leaching costs added as long-term inventory of ore stockpiles in leach pads amounted to $506.6 million, $513.9 million and
$439.0 million in 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively . Long-term leaching inventories recognized as cost of sales amounted to
$299.4 million, $333.5 million and $316.6 million in 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively .
116  Years ended
December  31,  
  2018  2017  
Trading:        
Interest earned  $0.5 $0.7 
Unrealized gain (loss) at December 31,  $(0.2)$0.1 
Available-for -sale:        
Interest earned   (*) (*)
Investment redeemed  $0.3 $1.1 
(*) Less than $0.1 million
  2018  2017  
One year or less  $— $— 
Maturing after one year through five years   —  — 
Maturing after five years through ten years   —  — 
Due after 10 years   0.7  1.0 
        
Total debt securities  $0.7 $1.0 
                
        
  At December  31,  
(in millions)  2018  2017  
Inventory , current:        
Metals at average cost:        
Finished goods  $ 69.6 $ 48.8 
Work-in-process   256.8   308.0  
Ore stockpiles on leach pads   328.0   320.9  
Supplies at average cost   378.3   364.2  
        
Total current inventory  $1,032.7  $1,041.9  
                
        
Inventory , long-term:        
Ore stockpiles on leach pads  $1,177.4  $ 977.4  
                
        
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 5—PROPER TY:
        Construction in progress decreased in 2018 as a result of the completion of some of the Company expansion projects. For more
detailed information, please see Item 7 "Management Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations—
Capital Investment Program."
        Depreciation and depletion expense for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, amounted to $668.9 million,
$665.2 million and $639.1 million, respectively .
NOTE 6—INT ANGIBLE ASSETS:
117  At December  31,  
(in millions)  2018  2017  
Buildings and equipment  $14,294.0  $12,552.8  
Construction in progress   1,516.9   2,301.9  
Mine development   267.9   267.9  
Mineral assets   83.2  83.2 
Land, other than mineral   164.1   218.4  
        
Total property   16,326.1   15,424.2  
Accumulated depreciation, amortization and depletion   (6,922.3 ) (6,324.6 )
        
Total property and mine development, net  $9,403.8  $9,099.6  
                
        
  At December  31,  
(in millions)  2018  2017  
Mining concessions  $121.2  $121.2  
Mine engineering and development studies   19.8  19.8 
Software   49.6  49.0 
        
  190.6   190.0  
Accumulated amortization:        
Mining concessions   (37.4 ) (36.6 )
Mine engineering and development studies   (15.3 ) (15.3 )
Software   (32.1 ) (27.5 )
        
  (84.8 ) (79.4 )
Goodwill   41.9  41.9 
        
Intangible assets, net  $147.7  $152.5  
                
        
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 6—INT ANGIBLE ASSETS: (Continued)
        Amortization of intangibles for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, amounted to $5.4 million, $5.9 million and
$8.0 million, respectively . Estimated amortization is as follows:
        Goodwill includes $17.0 million generated in 1997 as a result of purchasing a third party interest in the Buenavista mine. It also
includes $24.9 million representing the amount of the purchase price in excess of the fair value of the net assets acquired from El Pilar
mine. This goodwill is attributable to future benefits that the Company expects to realize from the mine and will not be deductible for
income tax purposes.
NOTE 7—INCOME TAXES:
        Since March 2009, Grupo Mexico, through its wholly-owned subsidiary AMC, owns an interest in excess of 80% of SCC.
Accordingly , SCC's results are included in the consolidated results of the Grupo Mexico subsidiary for U.S. federal income tax
reporting. SCC provides current and deferred income taxes, as if it were filing a separate U.S. federal income tax return.
        On December 22, 2017, the TCJA  was signed into law , making substantial changes to the 1986 Internal Revenue Code. Changes
under the TCJA  include, among others, a decrease in the corporate tax rate from 35% to 21%, the transition of the U.S. taxation of
international operation from a worldwide system to a quasi-territorial system, a one-time transition tax on the mandatory deemed
repatriation of cumulative foreign earnings as of December 31, 2017, a general elimination of U.S. federal income taxes on dividends
from foreign subsidiaries, and a current inclusion in U.S. federal taxable income of certain earnings of controlled foreign corporations.
        Although most provisions of the TCJA  began on January 1, 2018, ASC 740 "Income Taxes" requires that the ef fects of tax law
changes be recognized in the year and period of the law change and be reflected in the company's financial results for 2017. On
December 22, 2017, the SEC staf f issued SAB 1 18 to address the application of U.S. GAAP  in situations when a registrant did not
have the necessary information available, prepared, or analyzed in reasonable detail to complete the accounting for certain income tax
effects of the TCJA. SAB 1 18 required a company to reflect the income tax ef fects of the TCJA  for which the accounting under ASC
740 "Income Taxes" is complete; if it is incomplete but the Company is able to determine a reasonable estimate, a provisional estimate
must be provided in the financial statements. If a provisional estimate cannot be reasonably prepared, the Company should continue to
apply ASC 740 on the basis of the provision of the tax law that were in ef fect immediately before the enactment of the TCJA.
Companies have one year from the enactment of the TCJA  to finalize accounting for the impacts of the TCJA.
118Estimated amortization expense (in millions):    
2019  $4.7 
2020   5.0 
2021   5.1 
2022   5.0 
2023   5.0 
     
Total 2019 - 2023  $24.8 
     
Average annual  $5.0 
     
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 7—INCOME TAXES: (Continued)
        The Company adopted SAB 1 18 and accordingly recorded a provisional $785.9 million non-cash tax expense for the estimated
effects of the TCJA  in its 2017 financial statements as a result of adjustments related to the valuation allowances for foreign tax credits
and other deferred tax assets, valuation of net deferred tax assets due to the rate change from 35% to 21% and the transition tax on the
repatriation of cumulative foreign earnings. In 2018, the Company determined the final impact of the TCJA  to be $816.8 million, a
$30.9 million change from the provisional amount estimated at December 31, 2017.
        For 2018, the TCJA  created a new category of foreign income, the Global Intangible Low Tax Income or GIL TI.
        The new GIL TI provisions impose a tax on foreign income in excess of a deemed return on tangible assets of foreign
corporations. For 2018, there was no U.S. tax liability from the GIL TI inclusion. The Company does not anticipate a tax on GIL TI in
the future because of increased fixed asset amounts and with a Mexican tax rate of 30% no U.S. deferred taxes would be recorded.
Accordingly , the Company has elected that if GIL TI were to apply in the future, a current period expense would be recorded when
incurred.
        The BEA T is a 5% minimum tax for tax year 2018, 10% for the years 2019 through 2025 and 12.5% in years thereafter . It is
calculated on a base equal to the Company's income determined without the tax benefit arising from base erosion payments. The
Company did not incur a BEA T liability in 2018 since it has met the safe harbor rule that provides a Company not to be subject to the
BEA T if related party payments from the U.S. to foreign entities does not exceed 3% of expenses excluding cost of goods sold. The
Company must continue to analyze applicability of the BEA T provisions on a quarterly basis.
        The components of the provision for income taxes for the three years ended December 31, 2018, are as follows:
119(in millions)  2018  2017  2016  
U.S. federal and state:           
Current  $ 2.6 $ — $ — 
Deferred   (13.0 ) 686.2   (109.4 )
Uncertain tax positions   —  16.2  20.3 
           
  (10.4 ) 702.4   (89.1 )
           
Foreign (Peru and Mexico):           
Current   1,102.4   951.7   625.0  
Deferred   (38.5 ) (60.7 ) (34.8 )
           
  1,063.9   891.0   590.2  
           
Total provision for income taxes  $1,053.5  $1,593.4  $501.1  
                      
           
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 7—INCOME TAXES: (Continued)
        The source of income is as follows:
        The reconciliation of the statutory income tax rate to the ef fective tax rate for the three years ended December 31, 2018, is as
follows (in percentage points):
        The Company files income tax returns in three jurisdictions, Peru, Mexico and the United States. For the three years presented
above, the statutory income tax rate for Mexico was 30%. The United States tax rate was 21% in 2018, and 35% for 2017 and 2016.
The Peruvian tax rate was 29.5% for 2018 and 2017 and 28% for 2016. While the lar gest components of income taxes are the Peruvian
and Mexican taxes, the Company is a domestic U.S. entity . Therefore, the rate used in the above reconciliation is the U.S. statutory
rate.
        For all of the years presented, both the Peruvian branch and Minera Mexico filed separate tax returns in their respective tax
jurisdictions. Although the tax rules and regulations imposed in the separate tax jurisdictions may vary significantly , similar permanent
items exist, such as items which are
120(in millions)  2018  2017  2016  
Earnings by location:           
U.S.  $ (2.3)$ (1.5)$ (1.9)
Foreign           
Peru   441.8   284.6   (85.7 )
Mexico   2,149.9   2,019.6   1,343.6  
           
  2,591.7   2,304.2   1,257.9  
           
Earnings before taxes on income  $2,589.4  $2,302.7  $1,256.0  
                      
           
  2018  2017  2016  
Expected tax at U.S. statutory rate   21.0% 35.0% 35.0%
Foreign tax at other than statutory rate, net of foreign tax credit benefit(1)   13.9  0.6  2.0 
Percentage depletion   (2.1) (2.9) (2.7)
Other permanent dif ferences   0.4  5.2  — 
Change in 2017 valuation allowance on U.S. deferred tax assets, foreign tax
credits and U.S. tax ef fect on Peruvian deferred   7.5  26.9  — 
Additional valuation allowance on 2018 U.S. deferred tax assets, foreign tax
credits and U.S. tax ef fect on Peruvian deferred   1.0  —  — 
Decrease in 2017 U.S. deferred tax asset due to tax rate changes   (0.2) 4.8  — 
U.S. one time transition tax on accumulated foreign earnings   0.4  2.4  — 
Increase (decrease) in unrecognized tax benefits for uncertain tax positions   —  0.7  0.2 
Repatriated foreign earnings   —  (2.0) 3.6 
Amounts (over) / under provided in prior years   (1.3) (0.1) (0.5)
Other   0.1  (1.4) 2.3 
           
Effective income tax rate   40.7% 69.2% 39.9%
                      
           
(1) Foreign tax at other than statutory rates, net of foreign tax credit benefit, also includes the ef fects of permanent
differences in Peru and Mexico, that are determined at the local statutory rate.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 7—INCOME TAXES: (Continued)
nondeductible or nontaxable. Some permanent dif ferences relate specifically to SCC such as the allowance in the United States for
percentage depletion.
        Deferred taxes include the U.S., Peruvian and Mexican tax ef fects of the following types of temporary dif ferences and
carryforwards:
 
        In 2018, several items that were previously included in the "other" category are separately stated; 2017 was adjusted to open those
items for comparative purposes. The valuation allowance increased by $199.5 million in 2018, mostly due to the valuation of
unutilized Foreign Tax Credits generated in 2018. The Peru branch operations are taxed in the U.S. as a flow through entity to SCC.
Prior to 2017 U.S. Tax Reform, the U.S. corporate income tax rate was 35% on the Peru earnings, which enabled the company to use
more currently generated foreign tax credits. Since tax reform reduced the U.S. tax rate to 21%, there is less U.S. income tax to absorb
currently generated FTC's or carryforwards. Additionally , allowable expenses in the U.S. for percentage depletion and U.S. sourced
interest expense
121  At December  31,  
(in millions)  2018  2017  
Assets:        
Inventories  $ 61.5 $ 47.0 
Capitalized exploration expenses   11.1  9.5 
U.S. foreign tax credit carryforward, net of FIN 48 liability   483.4   280.2  
U.S. tax ef fect of Peruvian deferred tax liability   165.1   174.1  
Provisions   155.0   152.6  
Mexican tax on consolidated dividends   14.8  14.5 
Deferred workers participation   27.0  3.0 
Accrued salaries, wages and vacations   9.1  7.2 
Sales price adjustment (PUI)   2.7  — 
Social responsibility expenses   2.1  2.1 
Deferred char ges   6.1  — 
Valuation allowance on U.S. deferred tax assets, foreign tax credits
and U.S. tax ef fect on Peruvian deferred   (819.1 ) (619.6 )
Other   10.1  1.6 
        
Total deferred tax assets   128.9   72.2 
        
  At December  31,  
(in millions)  2018  2017  
Liabilities:        
Property , plant and equipment   (137.3 ) (130.3 )
Deferred char ges   —  (16.9 )
Unremitted foreign earnings   —  — 
Sales price adjustment (PUI)   —  (0.4)
Other   (0.4) (5.3)
        
Total deferred tax liabilities   (137.7 ) (152.9 )
        
Total net deferred tax (liabilities) / assets  $ (8.8)$(80.7 )
                
        
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 7—INCOME TAXES: (Continued)
on debt reduced the branch income subject to U.S. tax, further limiting utilization of foreign tax credits.
U.S. T ax Matters—
        As of December 31, 2018, the Company considers its ownership of the stock of Minera Mexico to be essentially permanent in
duration.
        As of December 31, 2018, $97.6 million of the Company´s total cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash and short-term investments
of $1,058.4 million was held by foreign subsidiaries. The cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments maintained in our foreign
operations are generally used to cover local operating and investment expenses. At December 31, 2016, Minera Mexico determined
that it had $470.5 million in earnings available for dividends to the United States. These earnings had not been remitted, but U.S.
federal income tax, net of foreign tax credit was recognized in 2016 resulting in an increase in tax of $45.7 million. At December 31,
2017, Minera Mexico had determined that it had earnings available for dividends to the United States of $555.5 million. The 2017 U.S.
tax reform introduced a one-time transition tax that is based upon the Company's total accumulated post-1986 prescribed foreign
earnings and profits ("E&P") estimated to be $8.9 billion, the majority of which was previously considered to be indefinitely
reinvested and accordingly , no U.S. federal and state income taxes were provided. Upon enactment of the 2017 U.S. tax reform, the
Company calculated and recorded a provisional tax amount of $181.1 million as a reasonable estimate for its one-time transition tax
liability , which was completely of fset by foreign tax credit carryforwards. During 2018, the Company determined that this amount
should be reduced by $28 million and finalized its transition tax at $153.1 million, which was fully of fset by foreign tax credits. The
Company also finalized its calculation of the total accumulated post-1986 prescribed E&P  for the applicable entities and amounts held
in liquid and non-liquid E&P . Since the calculation of E&P  is complete and the transition tax has been finalized, the Company has
determined that as of December 31,2018, a deferred tax asset of $1.9 billion exists with respect to its investment in foreign
subsidiaries. Tax accounting guidance provided in ASC 740 requires this asset to be recognized only if the basis dif ference will reverse
in the foreseeable future. Management has no plans that would result in the reversal of this temporary dif ference and consequently no
deferred tax asset has been recorded. Future dividends from these subsidiaries are no longer subject to federal income tax in the U.S.,
and the Company incurs no state income tax liability . Additionally there are no withholding taxes due to the tax treaty between the
United States and Mexico. Earnings from the Company's Peruvian branch are not subject to transition taxes since they are taxed in the
United States on a current basis.
        At December 31, 2018, there were $689.1 million of foreign tax credits available for carryback or carryforward. These credits
have a one year carryback and a ten year carryforward period and can only
122
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 7—INCOME TAXES: (Continued)
be used to reduce U.S. income tax on foreign earnings. There were no other unused U.S. tax credits at December 31, 2018. These
credits will expire as follows:
        These foreign tax credits are presented above on a gross basis and have not been reduced here for any unrecognized tax benefits.
These foreign tax credits have been adjusted to include the 2016 Net Operating Loss carryback in the U.S. jurisdiction, increasing
foreign tax credits by approximately $15.9 million. In accordance with ASU 2013-1 1 the Company has recorded $205.7 million of an
unrecognized tax benefit as an of fset to the Company's deferred tax asset for foreign tax credits. The remaining foreign tax credits of
$483.4 million are being re-valued to zero at December 31, 2018. It is the opinion of management that with the reduction in the U.S.
corporate tax rate to 21% and the corporate tax rates in Mexico of 30% and in Peru at 29.5%, it is unlikely the excess foreign tax
credits can be utilized. Additionally , foreign dividends will no longer be taxed in the U.S. thereby reducing the U.S. tax on the foreign
source income that the credits can be used to of fset.
Peruvian T ax Matters—
        Royalty mining char ge:    The royalty char ge is based on operating income mar gins with graduated rates ranging from 1% to 12%
of operating profits, with a minimum royalty char ge assessed at 1% of net sales. The minimum royalty char ge is recorded as cost of
sales and those amounts assessed at higher rates are included in the income tax provision. The Company has accrued $32.9 million,
$23.4 million and $16.8 million of royalty char ges in 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively , of which $9.0 million and $2.5 million were
included in income taxes in 2018 and 2017, respectively; no amounts were included in income tax in 2016.
        Peruvian special mining tax:     This tax is based on operating income with graduated rates increasing from 2% to 8.4%. The
Company recognized $30.6 million, $23.3 million and $10.8 million in 2018, 2017 and 2016, respectively , with respect to this tax.
These amounts are included as "income taxes" in the consolidated statement of earnings.
Mexican T ax Matters—
        On October 2017, the Federation's Revenue Law for 2018 was approved by the House of Representatives and the Senate. There
are certain modifications that are worth highlighting:
i) The incentive of crediting of the special use and service tax to income tax. In the case of fuel, it includes purchased
diesel for final consumption in certain mining equipment. The crediting of the special use and service tax was extended
to the purchase of imported diesel.
123Year  Amount  
2022   51.5 
2023   69.2 
2024   102.0  
2025   189.5  
2026   104.8  
2028   172.1  
     
Total  $689.1  
     
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 7—INCOME TAXES: (Continued)
ii) The Federal Revenue Law allows the deduction of statutory profit sharing paid, on advance monthly payments of
income tax.
iii) The withholding rate applied by banks and other members of the financial system on interest will decrease from an
annual rate of 0.58% to 0.46%.
iv) The obligation to provide certain information regarding relevant transactions will be incorporated to the Federation's
Revenue Law for 2018 given the recent rulings issued by the Mexican Supreme Court. Taxpayers will be obligated to
provide on a quarterly basis to the Mexican tax authorities information regarding financial derivative transactions,
transactions with related parties, transactions related to the participation in the equity of other companies and changes
of tax residence, corporate restructures and other similar transactions.
        It is worth noting that there are no further amendments in connection with the Base Erosion and Profit Shifting action plan.
Accounting for Uncertainty in Income T axes—
        The total amount of unrecognized tax benefits in 2018, 2017 and 2016, was as follows (in millions):
        The amount of unrecognized tax benefits that, if recognized, would af fect the ef fective tax rate was $214.5 million at
December 31, 2018 and 2017. These amounts relate entirely to U.S. income tax matters. The Company has no unrecognized Peruvian
or Mexican tax benefits.
        The Company anticipates ef fective settlement and closing of the 201 1-2013 IRS field audit by December 31, 2019. With the
closing of the audit, unrecognized tax benefits are expected to reverse in the next twelve months and are not expected to have a
material impact on the Company's financial statements. The Company also anticipates that the IRS audit of 2014-2016 will commence
in 2019.
        As of December 31, 2018 and December 31, 2017 the Company's liability for uncertain tax positions included accrued interest
and penalties of $1.9 million.
        The following tax years remain open to examination and adjustment in the Company's three major tax jurisdictions:
124  2018  2017  2016  
Unrecognized tax benefits, opening balance  $214.5  $304.0  $400.0  
Gross increases—tax positions in prior period   —  (89.5 ) 3.9 
Gross increases—current-period tax positions   —  —  23.3 
Decreases related to settlements with taxing authorities   —  —  (123.2 )
           
  —  (89.5 ) (96.0 )
           
Unrecognized tax benefits, ending balance  $214.5  $214.5  $304.0  
                      
           
 Peru:  2013 and all subsequent years
 U.S.:  2011 and all subsequent years
 Mexico:  2013 and all subsequent years
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 7—INCOME TAXES: (Continued)
        Management does not expect that any of the open years will result in a cash payment within the upcoming twelve months ending
December 31, 2019. The Company's reasonable expectations about future resolutions of uncertain items did not materially change
during the year ended December 31, 2018.
NOTE 8—WORKERS' P ARTICIP ATION:
        The Company's operations in Peru and Mexico are subject to statutory workers' participation.
        In Peru, the provision for workers' participation is calculated at 8% of pre-tax earnings. The current portion of this participation,
which is accrued during the year , is based on the Peruvian Branch's taxable income and is distributed to workers following
determination of final results for the year . The annual amount payable to an individual worker is capped at the worker's salary for an
18 month period. Amounts determined in excess of the 18 months of worker's salary is no longer made as a payment to the worker and
is levied first for the benefit of the "Fondo Nacional de Capacitacion Laboral y de Promocion del Empleo" (National Workers' Training
and Employment Promotion Fund) until this entity receives from all employers in its region an amount equivalent to 2,200 Peruvian
taxable units (approximately $2.7 million in 2018). Any remaining excess is levied as payment for the benefit of the regional
governments. These levies fund worker training, employment promotion, entrepreneurship and various other programs.
        In Mexico, workers' participation is determined using the guidelines established in the Mexican income tax law at a rate of 10%
of pre-tax earnings as adjusted by the tax law .
        The provision for workers' participation is allocated to "Cost of sales (exclusive of depreciation, amortization and depletion)" and
to "selling, general and administrative" in the consolidated statement of earnings, proportional to the number of workers in the
production and administrative areas, respectively . Workers' participation expense for the three years ended December 31, 2018 was as
follows (in millions):
NOTE 9—ASSET  RETIREMENT  OBLIGA TION:
        The Company maintains an asset retirement obligation for its mining properties in Peru, as required by the Peruvian Mine Closure
Law. In accordance with the requirements of this law the Company's closure plans were approved by the Peruvian Ministry of Ener gy
and Mines ("MINEM"). As part of the closure plans, the Company is required to provide annual guarantees over the estimated life of
the mines, based on a present value approach, and to furnish the funds for the asset retirement obligation. This law requires a review of
closing plans every five years. Currently and for the near -term future, the Company has pledged the value of its Lima of fice complex
and a warehouse in Lima as support for this obligation. The accepted values of these facilities, for this purpose, are of $45.3 million.
Through January 2019, the Company has provided guarantees of $37.8 million. The closure cost recognized for this liability includes
the cost, as outlined in its closure plans, of dismantling the
125  2018  2017  2016  
Current  $219.9  $192.7  $131.8  
Deferred   9.8  6.6  (13.4 )
           
 $229.7  $199.3  $118.4 
                      
           
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 9—ASSET  RETIREMENT  OBLIGA TION: (Continued)
Toquepala and Cuajone concentrators, the Ilo smelter and refinery , and the shops and auxiliary facilities at the three units. In March
2016, MINEM approved the Mining Closure Plan for the Toquepala expansion project. The closure plan for the Tia Maria project was
approved in February 2017. The Company , however , has not recorded a retirement obligation for the project as the construction permit
has not been received, and work on the project is on hold. The Company believes that under these circumstances the recording of a
retirement obligation is not appropriate. In accordance with requirements of Peruvian law , the Company in December 2017 and
February 2018, submitted to MINEM revised closure plans for the Cuajone mine and the Ilo facilities respectively , which at
September 30, 2018 are pending approval. As a result of these new estimates, the Company has reduced the asset retirement obligation
by $1 1.6 million in December 2017 and $5.2 million in the first quarter of 2018.
        In 2010, the Company announced to the Mexican federal environmental authorities its closure plans for the copper smelter plant
at San Luis Potosi. The Company developed a program for plant demolition and soil remediation with a cost of $66.2 million. In 2016,
the environmental authorities approved the conclusion of the remediation ef fort. The Company continues studying the possibilities for
this property in order to decide whether to sell or develop the property . The Company has recognized an estimated asset retirement
obligation for its mining properties in Mexico as part of its environmental commitment. Even though there is currently no enacted law ,
statute, ordinance, written or oral contract requiring the Company to carry out mine closure and environmental remediation activities,
the Company believes that a constructive obligation presently exists based on the remediation requirements caused by the closure of
any facility . The overall cost recognized for mining closure in Mexico includes the estimated costs of dismantling concentrators,
smelter and refinery plants, shops and other facilities. During 2018, the Company made a change in the estimate for the asset
retirement obligation in its Mexican operations, mainly due to a change in the discount rate used to determine such obligation. The
effect of this change was a reduction in the asset retirement obligation of $10.4 million, which was recorded in the second quarter of
2018.
        The following table summarizes the asset retirement obligation activity for years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017 (in
millions):
126  2018  2017  
Balance as of January 1  $222.5  $216.5  
Changes in estimates   (15.6 ) (11.6)
Additions   —  — 
Closure payments   (0.6) (0.3)
Accretion expense   11.4  17.9 
        
Balance as of December 31,  $217.7  $222.5  
                
        
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 10—FINANCING:
Long-term debt (in millions):
 
        The bonds, referred above as "Y ankee bonds", contain a covenant requiring Minera Mexico to maintain a ratio of EBITDA  to
interest expense of not less than 2.5 to 1.0 as such terms are defined in the debt instrument. At December 31, 2018, Minera Mexico
was in compliance with this covenant.
        Between July 2005 and November 2012 the Company issued senior unsecured notes six times totaling $4.2 billion, as listed
above. Interest on the notes is paid semi-annually in arrears. The notes rank pari passu  with each other and rank pari passu  in right of
payment with all of the Company's other existing and future unsecured and unsubordinated indebtedness.
        On April 20, 2015, the Company issued $2.0 billion of fixed-rate senior unsecured notes. This debt was issued in two tranches,
$500 million due 2025 at an annual interest rate of 3.875% and $1.5 billion
127  Face
amount  Issuance
discount  Issuance
costs  Carrying
value as of
December  31,
2018  
5.375% Senior unsecured notes due 2020  $ 400 $ (0.3)$ (0.4)$ 399.3  
3.500% Senior unsecured notes due 2022   300  (0.5) (0.6) 298.9  
3.875% Senior unsecured notes due 2025   500  (1.8) (1.8) 496.4  
9.250% Yankee bonds due 2028   125  —  —  51.2 
7.500% Senior unsecured notes due 2035   1,000   (12.9 ) (8.4) 978.7  
6.750% Senior unsecured notes due 2040   1,100   (7.3) (5.8) 1,086.9  
5.250% Senior unsecured notes due 2042   1,200   (19.4 ) (6.5) 1,174.1  
5.875% Senior unsecured notes due 2045   1,500   (16.6 ) (8.8) 1,474.6  
              
Total  $6,125  $(58.8 )$(32.3 ) 5,960.1  
                            
              
Less, current portion            — 
              
Total long-term debt           $ 5,960.1  
                            
              
  Face
amount  Issuance
discount  Issuance
costs  Carrying
value as of
December  31,
2017  
5.375% Senior unsecured notes due 2020  $ 400 $ (0.6)$ (0.6)$ 398.8  
3.500% Senior unsecured notes due 2022   300  (0.5) (0.8) 298.7  
3.875% Senior unsecured notes due 2025   500  (2.1) (2.0) 495.9  
9.250% Yankee bonds due 2028   125  —  —  51.2 
7.500% Senior unsecured notes due 2035   1,000   (13.2 ) (8.8) 978.0  
6.750% Senior unsecured notes due 2040   1,100   (7.4) (5.9) 1,086.7  
5.250% Senior unsecured notes due 2042   1,200   (19.8 ) (6.6) 1,173.6  
5.875% Senior unsecured notes due 2045   1,500   (16.9 ) (8.9) 1,474.2  
              
Total  $6,125  $(60.5 )$(33.6 ) 5,957.1  
              
Less, current portion            — 
              
Total long-term debt           $ 5,957.1  
                            
              
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 10—FINANCING: (Continued)
due 2045 at an annual interest rate of 5.875%. These notes are general unsecured obligations of the Company and rank equally with all
of its existing and future unsecured and unsubordinated debt. Net proceeds are being used for general corporate purposes, including the
financing of the Company´s capital investment program. The notes were issued with an underwriters' discount of $20.2 million.
Additionally , issuance costs of $1 1.8 million associated with these notes were paid and deferred. The unamortized balance of the
discount and the costs are presented net of the carrying value of the debt issued and are amortized as interest expense over the life of
the loan.
        The indentures relating to the notes contain certain restrictive covenants, including limitations on liens, limitations on sale and
leaseback transactions, rights of the holders of the notes upon the occurrence of a change of control triggering event, limitations on
subsidiary indebtedness and limitations on consolidations, mer gers, sales or conveyances. Certain of these covenants cease to be
applicable before the notes mature if the Company obtains an investment grade rating. The Company obtained investment grade rating
in 2005. The Company has registered these notes under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended. The Company may issue additional
debt from time to time pursuant to certain of the indentures.
        If the Company experiences a "Change of Control Triggering Event", the Company must of fer to repurchase the notes at a
purchase price equal to 101% of the principal amount thereof, plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any . A Change of Control Trigger
Event means a Change of Control (as defined) and a rating decline (as defined), that is, if the rating of the notes, by at least one of the
rating agencies shall be decreased by one or more gradations.
        At December 31, 2018, the Company was in compliance with the covenants of the notes.
        Aggregate maturities of the outstanding borrowings at December 31, 2018, are as follows:
128Years  Principal Due(*)  
  (in millions)  
2019  $ — 
2020   400.0  
2021   — 
2022   300.0  
2023   — 
Thereafter   5,351.2  
     
Total  $ 6,051.2  
          
     
(*) Total debt maturities do not include the debt discount valuation account of $91.1 million.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 1 1—BENEFIT  PLANS:
Post r etirement defined benefit plans and defined contribution plan
        The Company has two noncontributory defined benefit pension plans covering former salaried employees in the United States and
certain former expatriate employees in Peru (the "Expatriate Plan"). Ef fective October 31, 2000, the Board of Directors amended the
qualified pension plan to suspend the accrual of benefits. In addition, the Company's Mexican subsidiaries have a defined contribution
pension plan for salaried employees and a non-contributory defined benefit pension plan for union employees (the "Mexican Plan").
        The components of net periodic benefit costs calculated in accordance with ASC 715 "Compensation retirement benefits," using
December 31 as a measurement date, consist of the following:
129  Years ended
December  31,  
(in millions)  2018  2017  2016  
Service cost  $1.0 $0.8 $0.7 
Interest cost   1.6  1.4  1.0 
Expected return on plan assets   (3.4) (2.9) (2.2)
Amortization of prior service cost / (credit)   0.2  0.1  0.1 
Settlement / Curtailment   (0.2) 0.1  (0.2)
Amortization of net loss/(gain)   0.2  0.2  0.2 
           
Net periodic benefit cost  $(0.6)$(0.3)$(0.4)
                      
           
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 1 1—BENEFIT  PLANS: (Continued)
        The change in benefit obligation and plan assets and a reconciliation of funded status are as follows:
130  As of
December  31,  
(in millions)  2018  2017  
Change in benefit obligation:        
Projected benefit obligation at beginning of year  $27.5 $25.6 
Service cost   1.0  0.8 
Interest cost   1.6  1.4 
Settlement   —  0.9 
Benefits paid   (1.6) (1.9)
Actuarial (gain)/loss   (0.2) (0.3)
Actuarial gain assumption changes   (0.8) 0.3 
Inflation adjustment   (0.1) 0.7 
        
Projected benefit obligation at end of year  $27.4 $27.5 
                
        
Change in plan assets:        
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of year  $51.6 $44.6 
Actual return on plan assets   (3.5) 6.9 
Employer contributions   (0.4) (0.4)
Benefits paid   (1.0) (0.9)
Currency exchange rate adjustment   —  1.4 
        
Fair value of plan assets at end of year  $46.7 $51.6 
                
        
Funded status at end of year:  $19.3 $24.1 
                
        
ASC-715 amounts r ecognized in statement of financial position consists
of:        
Non-current assets  $19.4 $24.2 
                
        
Total  $19.4 $24.2 
                
        
ASC-715 amounts r ecognized in accumulated other compr ehensive
income (net of income taxes of $(4.3) million and $(2.0) million in
2018 and 2017, r espectively) consists of:        
Net loss (gain)  $5.8 $2.3 
Prior service cost   1.4  1.5 
        
Total  $7.2 $3.8 
                
        
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 1 1—BENEFIT  PLANS: (Continued)
        The following table summarizes the changes in accumulated other comprehensive income for the years ended December 31,
related to the defined benefit pension plan, net of income tax:
        The following table summarizes the amounts in accumulated other comprehensive income amortized and recognized as a
component of net periodic benefit cost in 2018 and 2017, net of income tax:
        The assumptions used to determine the pension obligations are:
 
131(in millions)  2018  2017  
Reconciliation of accumulated other compr ehensive income:        
Accumulated other comprehensive income at beginning of plan year  $3.8 $5.8 
Net loss/(gain) amortized during the year   3.6  (0.1)
Net loss/(gain) occurring during the year   (0.1) (2.4)
Prior service cost (credit)   —  0.4 
Currency exchange rate adjustment   (0.1) 0.1 
        
Net adjustment to accumulated other comprehensive income (net of
income taxes of $(2.2) million and $1.3 million in 2018 and 2017,
respectively)   3.4  (2.0)
        
Accumulated other comprehensive income at end of plan year  $7.2 $3.8 
                
        
(in millions)  2018  2017  
Net loss / (gain)  $3.6 $(2.4)
Amortization of net (loss) gain   (0.1) (0.1)
Amortization of prior services cost (credit)   —  0.4 
        
Total amortization expenses  $3.5 $(2.1)
                
        
Expatriate Plan  2018  2017  2016  
Discount rate   3.90% 3.25% 3.65%
Expected long-term rate of return on plan asset   4.00% 4.00% 4.00%
Rate of increase in future compensation level   N/A  N/A  N/A 
Mexican Plan(*)  2018  2017  2016  
Discount rate   8.45% 7.80% 7.55%
Expected long-term rate of return on plan asset   8.45% 7.55% 7.55%
Rate of increase in future compensation level   4.50% 4.50% 4.50%
(*) These rates are based on Mexican pesos as pension obligations are denominated in pesos.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 1 1—BENEFIT  PLANS: (Continued)
        The scheduled maturities of the benefits expected to be paid in each of the next five years, and thereafter , are as follows:
Expatriate Plan
        The Company's funding policy is to contribute amounts to the qualified plan suf ficient to meet the minimum funding
requirements set forth in the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 plus such additional amounts as the Company may
determine to be appropriate.
        Plan assets are invested in a group annuity contract with Metropolitan Life Insurance Company ("MetLife"). The Contract invests
in the MetLife General Account Payment Fund (the "Money Fund") and the MetLife Broad Market Core Bond Fund (the "Bond
Fund") managed by BlackRock, Inc.
        The Money Fund seeks to earn interest and maintain a $1.00 per share net asset value, by investing in U.S. Dollar -denominated
money market securities.
        The Bond Fund seeks to outperform the Bloomber g Barclays ® U.S. Aggregate Bond Index, net of fees, over a full market cycle.
The Bond Fund invests in publicly traded, investment grade securities. These may include corporate securities, mortgage securities,
treasuries and cash, agency securities, commercial mortgage backed securities and other investment vehicles adhering to the fund's
investment objectives. These investments are classified as Level 1 because they are valued using quoted prices of the same securities
as they consist of instruments which are publicly traded.
        Plan assets are invested with the objective of maximizing returns with an acceptable level of risk and maintaining adequate
liquidity to fund expected benefit payments. The Company's policy for determining asset mix-tar gets to meet investment objectives
includes periodic consultation with recognized third party investment consultants.
        The expected long-term rate of return on plan assets is reviewed annually , taking into consideration asset allocations, historical
returns and the current economic environment. Based on these factors the Company expects its assets will earn an average of 4.00%
per annum assuming its long-term mix will be consistent with its current mix.
Mexican Plan
        Minera Mexico's policy for determining asset mix tar gets includes periodic consultation with recognized third party investment
consultants. The expected long-term rate of return on plan assets is updated periodically , taking into consideration assets allocations,
historical returns and the current
132Years  Expected
Benefit Payments  
  (in millions)  
2019  $ 2.6 
2020   1.7 
2021   1.8 
2022   1.9 
2023   2.0 
2024 to 2026   13.4 
     
Total  $ 23.4 
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 1 1—BENEFIT  PLANS: (Continued)
economic environment. The fair value of plan assets is impacted by general market conditions. If actual returns on plan assets vary
from the expected returns, actual results could dif fer.
        The plan assets are managed by three financial institutions, Scotiabank Inverlat S.A., Banco Santander and GBM Grupo Bursatil
Mexicano, S.A. 78% of the funds are invested in Mexican government securities, including treasury certificates and development
bonds of the Mexican government. The remaining 22% is invested in common shares of Grupo Mexico. The plan assets are invested
without restriction in active markets that are accessible when required and are therefore considered as level 1, in accordance with ASC
820 "Fair Value Measurement."
        These plans accounted for approximately 30% of benefit obligations. The following table represents the asset mix of the
investment portfolio as of December 31:
        The amount of contributions that the Company expects to pay to the plan during 2019 is $1.7 million, which excludes
$2.7 million of pending payments to former Buenavista workers.
Post-r etirement Health Car e Plan:
        United States:    The Company adopted a post-retirement health care plan for retired salaried employees eligible for Medicare in
1996. The Company manages the plan and is currently providing health benefits to retirees. The plan is accounted for in accordance
with ASC 715 "Compensation retirement benefits."
        In Mexico, health services are provided by the Mexican Social Security Institute.
        The components of net period benefit costs for the three years ended December 31, 2017 are as follows:
133  2018  2017  
Asset category:        
Treasury bills   78% 70%
Equity securities   22% 30%
        
  100% 100%
        
  Years ended
December  31,  
(in millions)  2018  2017  2016  
Interest cost  $0.9 $0.9 $0.6 
Amortization of prior service cost/ (credit)   (0.2) (0.2) (0.5)
           
Net periodic benefit cost  $0.7 $0.7 $0.1 
                      
           
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 1 1—BENEFIT  PLANS: (Continued)
        The change in benefit obligation and a reconciliation of funded status are as follows:
134  As of
December  31,  
(in millions)  2018  2017  
Change in benefit obligation:        
Projected benefit obligation at beginning of year  $12.5 $12.9 
Interest cost   0.9  0.9 
Actuarial loss/ (gain)—claims cost   0.2  (0.4)
Benefits paid   (0.9) (0.9)
Actuarial (gain)/loss   (0.9) (0.6)
Inflation adjustment   0.1  0.6 
        
Projected benefit obligation at end of year  $11.9 $12.5 
                
        
Change in plan assets:        
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of year  $ — $ — 
Employer contributions   0.1  0.1 
Benefits paid   (0.1) (0.1)
        
Fair value of plan assets at end of year  $ — $ — 
                
        
Funded status at end of year:  $11.9 $12.5 
                
        
ASC-715 amounts r ecognized in statement of financial position
consists of:        
Current liabilities  $(0.1)$(0.1)
Non-current liabilities   (11.8) (12.5 )
        
Total  $(11.9)$(12.6 )
                
        
ASC-715 amounts r ecognized in accumulated other compr ehensive
income consists of:        
Net loss (gain)  $(4.4)$(3.9)
Total (net of income taxes of $1.9 million and $1.7 million in 2018
and 2017, r espectively)            $(4.4)$(3.9)
                
        
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 1 1—BENEFIT  PLANS: (Continued)
        The following table summarizes the changes in accumulated other comprehensive income for the years ended December 31,
related to the post-retirement health care plan, net of income tax:
        The following table summarizes the amounts in accumulated other comprehensive income amortized and recognized as a
component of net periodic benefit cost in 2018 and 2017, net of income tax:
        The discount rates used in the calculation of other post-retirement benefits and cost as of December 31 were:
135  As of
December  31,  
(in millions)  2018  2017  
Reconciliation of accumulated other compr ehensive income:        
Accumulated other comprehensive income at beginning of plan year  $(3.9)$(2.8)
Net loss/(gain) occurring during the year   (0.6) (0.6)
Net loss/(gain) amortized during the year   0.1  0.1 
Currency exchange rate adjustment   —  (0.6)
        
Net adjustment to accumulated other comprehensive income (net of
income taxes of $0.2 million and $0.3 million in 2018 and 2017,
respectively)   (0.5) (1.1)
        
Accumulated other comprehensive income at end of plan year  $(4.4)$(3.9)
                
        
  At
December  31,  
(in millions)  2018  2017  
Net loss / (gain)  $(0.6)$(0.6)
Amortization of net (loss) gain   0.2  0.1 
        
Total amortization expenses  $(0.4)$(0.5)
                
        
  2018  2017  2016  
Expatriate health plan           
Discount rate   3.90% 3.25% 3.65%
Mexican health plan           
Weighted average discount rate   8.45% 7.80% 7.55%
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 1 1—BENEFIT  PLANS: (Continued)
        The benefits expected to be paid in each of the next five years, and thereafter , are as follows:
Expatriate Health Plan
        For measurement purposes for pre 65 year old participants, a 5.8% annual rate of increase in the per capita cost of covered health
care benefits was assumed for 2018 which gradually decrease to 4.2%. For post 65 year old the annual rate of increase in the per capita
cost for 2018 is 5.2% which is assumed to decrease gradually to 4.0%.
        Assumed health care cost trend rates can have a significant ef fect on amounts reported for health care plans. However , because of
the size of the Company's plan, a one percentage-point change in assumed health care trend rate would not have a significant ef fect.
Mexican Health Plan
        For measurement purposes, a 4.5% annual rate of increase in the per capita cost of covered health care benefits was assumed for
2018 and remains at that level thereafter .
        An increase in other benefit cost trend rates have a significant ef fect on the amount of the reported obligations, as well as
component cost of the other benefit plan. One percentage-point change in assumed other benefits cost trend rates would have the
following ef fects:
136Year  Expected
Benefit Payments  
  (in millions)  
2019  $ 0.9 
2020   0.9 
2021   0.9 
2022   0.9 
2023   0.9 
2024 to 2028   2.9 
     
Total  $ 7.4 
          
     
  One Per centage
Point  
(in millions)  Increase  Decr ease  
Effect on total service and interest cost components  $ 1.0 $ 0.8 
Effect on the post-retirement benefit obligation  $ 11.7 $ 10.5 
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 12—COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES:
Envir onmental matters:
        The Company has instituted extensive environmental conservation programs at its mining facilities in Peru and Mexico. The
Company's environmental programs include, among others, water recovery systems to conserve water and minimize the impact on
nearby streams, reforestation programs to stabilize the surface of the tailings dams and the implementation of scrubbing technology in
the mines to reduce dust emissions.
        Environmental capital investments in years 2018, 2017 and 2016, were as follows (in millions):
        Peruvian operations:     The Company's operations are subject to applicable Peruvian environmental laws and regulations. The
Peruvian government, through the Ministry of Environment ("MINAM") conducts annual audits of the Company's Peruvian mining
and metallur gical operations. Through these environmental audits, matters related to environmental obligation, compliance with legal
requirements, atmospheric emissions, ef fluent monitoring and waste management are reviewed. The Company believes that it is in
material compliance with applicable Peruvian environmental laws and regulations. Peruvian law requires that companies in the mining
industry provide assurances for future mine closure and remediation. In accordance with the requirements of this law , the Company's
closure plans were approved by MINEM. See Note 6 "Asset retirement obligation," for further discussion of this matter .
        Air Quality Standards ("AQS"): In June 2017, MINAM enacted a supreme decree which defines new AQS for daily sulfur dioxide
in the air . The Company believes that these new AQS will allow Peruvian industry to be more competitive with other countries. As of
December 31, 2018, the Company maintains a lower daily average level of µg/m3 of SO2, than those required by the new AQS.
        Soil Environmental Quality Standards ("SQS"): In 2013, the Peruvian government enacted SQS applicable to any existing facility
or project that generates or could generate the risk of soil contamination in its area of operation or influence. In March 2014, MINAM
issued a supreme decree, which established additional provisions for the gradual implementation of SQS. Pursuant to this regulation,
the Company had twelve months to identify contaminated sites in and around its facilities and present a report of identified
contaminated sites. These documents were submitted to MINEM for approval in April 2015, and were fully approved in July 2017.
The next step is for the Company to prepare a characterization study to determine the depth, extent and physio-chemical composition
of the contaminated areas and define an appropriate remediation plan with a time-frame for completion. In addition, the Company
must submit a Soil Decontamination Plan ("SDP") for approval within 30 months after being notified by the authority . This SDP  must
include remediation actions, a schedule and compliance deadlines. Pursuant to this regulation, the Company may request a one year
extension for the decontamination plan if deemed necessary with reasonable justification.
        Soil confirmation tests must be carried out after completion of the decontamination actions (within the approved schedule) and
results must be presented to authorities within 30 days after receiving such results. Although no specific sanctions have been
established yet, non-compliance with this obligation or
137  2018  2017  2016  
Peruvian operations  $59.3 $93.7 $110.3 
Mexican operations   43.5  128.9   140.1  
           
Total  $102.8  $222.6  $250.4  
                      
           
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 12—COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES: (Continued)
with decontamination goals will carry penalties for companies. However , companies cannot be penalized for non-compliance with the
SQS during the schedule set forth for compliance.
        In accordance with the regulatory requirements, the Company has been working on the characterization phase and SDPs for
environmentally impacted sites in each of its operating units (T oquepala, Cuajone, and Ilo) with the assistance of consulting
companies. It is estimated that the Toquepala and Cuajone SDPs will be presented to the authorities for review and approval at the end
of the second quarter of 2019, and the Ilo SDP  will be submitted during the third quarter of 2019.
        While the Company believes that there is a reasonable possibility that a potential loss contingency may exist, it cannot currently
reasonably estimate the amount of the contingency . The Company believes that a reasonable determination of the loss will be possible
once the characterization study and the SDP  are substantially completed, which is expected for the third quarter of 2019. At that time
the Company will be in a position to estimate the remediation cost. Furthermore, the Company does not believe that it can estimate a
reasonable range of possible costs until the noted studies have substantially progressed and therefore is not able to disclose a range of
costs that is meaningful.
        Water Quality Standards ("WQS"): In June 2017, MINAM enacted a supreme decree which establishes water quality standards in
the Peruvian territory . The adoption of these standards have not a material impact on its financial position.
        Mexican operations:     The Company's operations are subject to applicable Mexican federal, state and municipal environmental
laws, to Mexican of ficial standards, and to regulations for the protection of the environment, including regulations relating to water
supply , water quality , air quality , noise levels and hazardous and solid waste.
        The principal legislation applicable to the Company's Mexican operations is the Federal General Law of Ecological Balance and
Environmental Protection (the "General Law"), which is enforced by the Federal Bureau of Environmental Protection ("PROFEP A").
PROFEP A monitors compliance with environmental legislation and enforces Mexican environmental laws, regulations and of ficial
standards. It may also initiate administrative proceedings against companies that violate environmental laws, which in the most
extreme cases may result in the temporary or permanent shutdown of non-complying facilities, the revocation of operating licenses
and/or other sanctions or fines.
        In 201 1, the General Law was amended, giving an individual or entity the ability to contest administrative acts, including
environmental authorizations, permits or concessions granted, without the need to demonstrate the actual existence of harm to the
environment as long as it can be ar gued that the harm may be caused. In addition, in 201 1, amendments to the Civil Federal Procedures
Code ("CFPC") were enacted. These amendments establish three categories of collective actions by means of which 30 or more people
claiming injury derived from environmental, consumer protection, financial services and economic competition issues will be
considered to be suf ficient in order to have a legitimate interest to seek through a civil procedure restitution or economic compensation
or suspension of the activities from which the alleged injury derived. The amendments to the CFPC may result in more litigation, with
plaintif fs seeking remedies, including suspension of the activities alleged to cause harm.
        In 2013, the Environmental Liability Federal Law was enacted. The law establishes general guidelines for actions to be
considered to likely cause environmental harm. If a possible determination
138
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 12—COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES: (Continued)
regarding harm occurs, environmental clean-up and remedial actions suf ficient to restore environment to a pre-existing condition
should be taken. Under this law , if restoration is not possible, compensation measures should be provided. Criminal penalties and
monetary fines can be imposed under this law .
        On February 2019, the Mexican Supreme Court confirmed the constitutionality of an ecological tax to extractive activities
developed in the state of Zacatecas, which taxes the environmental remediation actions, emissions of certain gases to the atmosphere,
emissions of pollutant substances to the soil or water , and waste storage within the state territory . The Company is evaluating the
potential impact of this new environmental regulation in its financial position.
        The Company believes that all of its facilities in Peru and Mexico are in material compliance with applicable environmental,
mining and other laws and regulations. The Company also believes that continued compliance with environmental laws of Mexico and
Peru will not have a material adverse ef fect on the Company's business, properties, result of operations, financial condition or
prospects and will not result in material capital investments.
Litigation matters :
Peruvian operations
The Tia Maria Mining Project
        There are three lawsuits filed against the Peruvian Branch of the Company related to the Tia Maria project. The lawsuits seek
(i) to declare null and void the resolution which approved the Environmental Impact Assessment of the project; (ii) the cancellation of
the project and the withdrawal of mining activities in the area and (iii) to declare null and void the mining concession application of
the Tia Maria project. The lawsuits were filed by Messrs. Jor ge Isaac del Carpio Lazo (filed May 22, 2015), Ernesto Mendoza Padilla
(filed May 26, 2015) and Juan Alberto Guillen Lopez (filed June 18, 2015).
        The del Carpio Lazio case was rejected by the court of first instance on November 14, 2016. The plaintif f filed an appeal before
the Superior Court on January 3, 2017. On January 9, 2018, the lawyers of both parties presented their respective positions before the
Appellate Court. On March 8, 2018, the Appellate Court issued its final decision, which upholds the first instance ruling. On April 27,
2018, the plaintif f filed an extraordinary appeal before the Supreme Court. As of December 31, 2018, the case remains pending
resolution.
        The Mendoza Padilla case was initially rejected by the lower court on July 8, 2015. This ruling was confirmed by the Superior
Court on June 14, 2016. On July 12, 2016, the case was appealed before the Constitutional Court. As of December 31, 2018, the case
remains pending resolution without further developments.
        The Guillen Lopez case is currently before the lower court. As of December 31, 2018, the case remains pending resolution
without further developments.
        The Company asserts that these lawsuits are without merit and is vigorously defending against them. The potential contingency
amount for these cases cannot be reasonably estimated by management at this time.
139
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 12—COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES: (Continued)
Special Regional Pasto Grande Project ("Pasto Grande Project")
        In 2012, the Pasto Grande Project, an entity of the Regional Government of Moquegua, filed a lawsuit against SCC's Peruvian
Branch alleging property rights over a certain area used by the Peruvian Branch and seeking the demolition of the tailings dam where
SCC's Peruvian Branch has deposited its tailings from the Toquepala and Cuajone operations since 1995. The Peruvian Branch has had
title to use the area in question since 1960 and has constructed and operated the tailings dams with proper governmental authorization,
since 1995. Upon a motion filed by the Peruvian Branch, the lower court has included MINEM as a defendant in this lawsuit. MINEM
has answered the complaint and denied the validity of the claim. As of December 31, 2018, the case remains pending resolution
without further developments. SCC's Peruvian Branch asserts that the lawsuit is without merit and is vigorously defending against it.
The amount of this contingency cannot be reasonably estimated by management at this time.
Mexican operations
The 2014 Accidental Spill at Buenavista Mine
        In relation to the 2014 accidental spill of copper sulfate solution that occurred at a leaching pond of the Buenavista mine, the
following legal procedures are pending against the Company:
        On August 19, 2014, PROFEP A, as part of the administrative proceeding initiated after the spill, announced the filing of a
criminal complaint against Buenavista del Cobre S.A. de C.V . ("BVC"), a subsidiary of the Company , in order to determine those
responsible for the environmental damages. During the second quarter of 2018, the criminal complaint was dismissed. This decision
was appealed and remains pending resolution.
        Through the first half of 2015, six collective action lawsuits were filed in federal courts in Mexico City and Sonora against two
subsidiaries of the Company seeking economic compensation, clean up and remedial activities in order to restore the environment to
its pre-existing conditions. Two of the collective action lawsuits have been dismissed by the court. The plaintif fs in the four remaining
lawsuits are: Acciones Colectivas de Sinaloa, A.C. which established two collective actions, Defensa Colectiva A.C.; and Ana Luisa
Salazar Medina et al. which has been granted a collective action certification. The remaining plaintif fs have requested cautionary
measures on the construction of facilities for the monitoring of public health services and the prohibition of the closure of the Río
Sonora Trust. As of December 31, 2018, these cases remain pending resolution.
        Similarly , during 2015, eight civil action lawsuits were filed against BVC in the state courts of Sonora seeking damages for
alleged injuries and for moral damages as a consequence of the spill. The plaintif fs in the state court lawsuits are: Jose Vicente Arriola
Nunez et al; Santana Ruiz Molina et al; Andres Nogales Romero et al; Teodoro Javier Robles et al; Gildardo Vasquez Carvajal et al;
Rafael Noriega Souf fle et al; Grupo Banamichi Unido de Sonora El Dorado, S.C. de R.L. de C.V ; and Marcelino Mercado Cruz. In
2016, three additional civil action lawsuits, claiming similar damages, were filed by Juan Melquicedec Lebaron; Blanca Lidia
Valenzuela Rivera et al and Ramona Franco Quijada et al. In 2017, BVC was served with thirty-three additional civil action lawsuits,
claiming similar damages. The lawsuits were filed by Francisco Javier Molina Peralta et al; Anacleto Cohen Machini et al; Francisco
Rafael Alvarez Ruiz et al; Jose Alberto Martinez Bracamonte et al; Gloria del Carmen Ramirez Duarte et al; Flor Mar garita Sabori et
al; Blanca Esthela Ruiz Toledo et al; Julio Alfonso
140
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 12—COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES: (Continued)
Corral Dominguez et al; Maria Eduwiges Bracamonte Villa et al; Francisca Marquez Dominguez et al; Jose Juan Romo Bravo et al;
Jose Alfredo Garcia Leyva et al; Gloria Irma Dominguez Perez et al; Maria del Refugio Romero et al; Miguel Rivas Medina et al;
Yolanda Valenzuela Garrobo et al; Maria Elena Garcia Leyva et al; Manuel Alfonso Ortiz Valenzuela et al; Francisco Alberto Arvayo
Romero et al; Maria del Carmen Villanueva Lopez et al; Manuel Martin Garcia Salazar; Miguel Garcia Arguelles et al; Dora Elena
Rodriguez Ochoa et al; Honora Eduwiges Ortiz Rodriguez et al; Francisco Jose Martinez Lopez et al; Maria Eduwiges Lopez
Bustamante; Rodolfo Barron Villa et al, Jose Carlos Martinez Fernandez et al, Maria de los Angeles Fabela et al; Rafaela Edith Haro et
al; Luz Mercedes Cruz et al; Juan Pedro Montaño et al; and Juana Irma Alday Villa. During the first quarter of 2018, BVC was served
with another civil action lawsuit, claiming similar damages. The lawsuit was filed by Alma Angelina Del Cid Rivera et al. During the
last quarter of 2018, BVC was served with other three civil action lawsuits, claiming similar damages, such lawsuits were filed by Los
Corrales de la Estancia, S.C. de R.L.; Jose Antonio Navarro; Jesus Maria Peña Molina, et al. As of December 31, 2018, these cases
remain pending resolution.
        During 2015, four constitutional lawsuits (juicios de amparo) were filed before Federal Courts against various authorities and
against a subsidiary of the Company , arguing; (i) the alleged lack of a waste management program approved by SEMARNA T; (ii) the
alleged lack of a remediation plan approved by SEMARNA T with regard to the August 2014 spill; (iii) the alleged lack of community
approval regarding the environmental impact authorizations granted by SEMARNA T to one subsidiary of the Company; and (iv) the
alleged inactivity of the authorities with regard of the spill in August 2014. The plaintif fs of these lawsuits are: Francisca Garcia
Enriquez, et al which established two lawsuits, Francisco Ramon Miranda, et al and Jesus David Lopez Peralta et al. During the third
quarter of 2016, four additional constitutional lawsuits, claiming similar damages were filed by Mario Alberto Salcido et al; Maria
Elena Heredia Bustamante et al; Martin Eligio Ortiz Gamez et al; and Maria de los Angeles Enriquez Bacame et al. During the third
quarter of 2017, BVC was served with another constitutional lawsuit filed by Francisca García Enriquez et al. In 2018, BVC was
served with two additional constitutional lawsuits that were filed against SEMARNA T by Norberto Bustamante et al. Regarding the
constitutional lawsuit filed by Maria Elena Heredia Bustamante et al; in which it was claimed the lack of community approval
regarding the authorization granted by SEMARNA T to build the new BVC tailings dam, on September 5, 2018, the Supreme Court of
Justice issued a resolution which established that such authorization was granted to BVC in compliance with the applicable legislation.
However , SEMARNA T must carry out a public meeting to inform the community of the technical aspects required to build the dam,
potential impacts and prevention measures, with no material ef fects to BVC's operations. As of December 31, 2018, the remaining
cases are still pending resolution.
        It is not currently possible to determine the extent of the damages sought in these state and federal lawsuits but the Company
considers that these lawsuits are without merit. Accordingly , the Company is vigorously defending against them. Nevertheless, the
Company considers that none of the legal proceedings resulting from the spill, individually or in the aggregate, would have a material
effect on its financial position or results of operations.
141
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 12—COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES: (Continued)
Corporate operations
Carla Lacey , on behalf of herself and all other similarly situated stockholders of Southern Copper Corporation, and derivatively on
behalf of Southern Copper Corporation
        As previously reported, a purported class action derivative lawsuit filed in the Delaware Court of Chancery was served on the
Company and its Directors in February 2016 relating to the 2012 capitalization of 99.999% of MGE by Controladora de Infraestructura
Energetica Mexico, S.A. de C.V ., an indirect subsidiary of Grupo Mexico (the "CIEM Capitalization"), the Company's entry into a
power purchase agreement with MGE in 2012 (the "MGE Power Purchase Agreement"), and the 2012 restructuring of a loan from the
Company's Mexican Operations to MGE for the construction of two power plants to supply power to the Company's Mexican
operations (the "MGE Loan Restructuring"). The action purports to be brought on behalf of the Company and its common
stockholders. The complaint alleges, among other things, that the CIEM Capitalization, the MGE Power Purchase Agreement and the
MGE Loan Restructuring were the result of breaches of fiduciary duties and the Company's charter .
        On March 20, 2018, the parties reached an agreement-in-principle to settle the action. On March 23, 2018, the parties informed
the Court of the settlement-in-principle to resolve all claims asserted by Plaintif f against Defendants in the action and requested that
the Court stay the action in its entirety pending filing by the parties of a stipulation of settlement. The Parties filed the executed
stipulation on August 22, 2018. Under the proposed settlement, Grupo Mexico or Americas Mining would pay to the Company
$50 million in cash less any attorneys' fees (including costs) awarded by the Court to Plaintif f's counsel (the "Net Settlement Amount")
in return for a release of all derivative and direct claims. A settlement hearing was held on November 27, 2018. On December 27,
2018, the Court issued its ruling approving the $50 million settlement. Pursuant to the Court's ruling, Plaintif f's counsel was awarded
$13.5 million (for attorneys' fees, expenses, and a $5,000 incentive fee award to plaintif f Carla Lacey). The remaining $36.5 million
was distributed via a special dividend on February 21, 2019 to the Company's public stockholders (other than the director defendants,
Grupo Mexico, Americas Mining, or any entity in which Grupo Mexico or Americas Mining has or had a direct or indirect controlling
interest) who held shares of common stock of the Company as of February 1 1, 2019. As result of the payment of the settlement, the
claims against the Defendants have been dismissed with prejudice.
Labor  matters :
        Peruvian operations:     75% of the Company's 4,850 Peruvian employees were unionized at December 31, 2018. Currently , there
are six separate unions, one lar ge union and five smaller unions. In the first quarter of 2016, the Company signed three-year
agreements with all the existing unions at that time. These agreements included, among other things, annual salary increases of 5% for
each of the three years. In June 2018, the Company signed a three-year collective bar gaining agreement with one of the smaller unions.
This agreement includes, among other things, annual salary increases of 5% for each year starting September 2018, and a signing
bonus of S/ 45,000 (approximately $13,600) which was recorded as labor expense.
        In August 2018, the Company signed a three-year collective bar gaining agreement with three additional unions. This agreement
includes, among other things, annual salary increases of 5% for each
142
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 12—COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES: (Continued)
year starting December 2018, and a signing bonus of S/ 45,000 (approximately $13,600) which was recorded as labor expense.
        As of December 31, 2018, the Company continues negotiations on collective bar gaining agreements with the two unsigned
unions.
        Mexican operations:     In recent years, the Mexican operations have experienced a positive improvement of their labor
environment, as its workers opted to change their af filiation from the Sindicato Nacional de Trabajadores Mineros, Metalur gicos y
Similares de la Republica Mexicana (the "National Mining Union") to other less politicized unions.
        The workers of the San Martin mine were on strike since July 2007. On February 28, 2018, the striking workers of the San Martín
mine of IMMSA  held an election to vote on the union that will hold the collective bar gaining agreement at the San Martín mine. The
Federacion Nacional de Sindicatos Independientes (the National Federation of Independent Unions), won the vote by a majority .
Nevertheless, the vote was challenged by the National Mining Union. On June 26, 2018, the Federal Mediation and Arbitration Board
issued a ruling recognizing the election results. Due to the agreement between workers and the Company to end the protracted strike,
on August 22, 2018, the Federal Mediation and Arbitration Board authorized the restart of operations of the San Martín mine. Such
authorization was challenged by the National Mining Union. The Company is working on a rehabilitation plan to restart operations at
the San Martin mine with a budget of $77 million. At December 31, 2018 the plan is in progress with a total expense of $17.7 million.
The Company is restoring mining operations in the first quarter of 2019 and expects to restore copper production in the second quarter
of 2019.
        In the case of the Taxco mine, its workers have been on strike since July 2007. After several legal procedures, in August 2015, the
Supreme Court decided to assert jurisdiction over the case and to rule on it directly . As of December 31, 2018, the case remains
pending resolution without further developments.
        It is expected that operations at the Taxco mine will remain suspended until the labor issues are resolved. In view of the lengthy
strike, the Company has reviewed the carrying value of the Taxco mine to ascertain whether impairment exists. The Company
concluded that there is a non-material impairment of the assets located at this mine.
Other  legal matters :
        The Company is involved in various other legal proceedings incidental to its operations, but does not believe that decisions
adverse to it in any such proceedings, individually or in the aggregate, would have a material ef fect on its financial position or results
of operations.
Other  commitments :
Peruvian Operations
Tia Maria:
        On August 1, 2014, the Company received the final approval of Tia Maria's Environmental Impact Assessment ("EIA"). However ,
the issuance of the project's construction permit has been delayed due
143
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 12—COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES: (Continued)
to pressures from anti-mining groups. The Company continues working with community groups in order to resolve open issues
concerning the project. The Company is also working jointly with the Peruvian government to obtain the construction license for this
120,000 ton (annual) SX-EW  copper greenfield project. The Company expects the license to be issued in the first half of 2019.
        Tia Maria's project budget is approximately $1.4 billion, of which $333.9 million has been invested through December 31, 2018.
When completed, it is expected to produce 120,000 tons of copper cathodes per year . This project will use state-of-the-art SX-EW
technology with the highest international environmental standards. SX-EW  facilities are the most environmentally friendly in the
industry as they do not require a smelting process and consequently , no emissions are released into the atmosphere. The project will
only use seawater , transporting it more than 25 kilometers to 1,000 meters above sea level, and includes a desalinization plant which
will be constructed at a cost of $95 million. Consequently , the Tambo river water resources will be used solely for farming and human
consumption.
        The Company expects the project to generate 9,000 jobs (3,600 direct and 5,400 indirect) during the construction phase. When in
operation, Tia Maria will directly employ 600 workers and indirectly provide jobs to another 4,200. Through its expected twenty-year
life, the project related services will create significant business opportunities in the Arequipa region.
        In view of the delay in this project, the Company continues to review the carrying value of this asset to ascertain whether
impairment exists. Should the Tia Maria project not move forward, the Company is confident that most of the project equipment will
continue to be used productively , through reassignment to other mine locations operated by the Company . The Company believes that
an impairment loss, if any , will not be material.
Michiquillay:
        In June 2018, the Company signed a contract for the acquisition of the Michiquillay copper project in Cajamarca, Peru, at a
purchase price of $400 million. Michiquillay is a world class mining project with estimated mineralized material of 1,150 million tons
and a copper grade of 0.63%. It is expected to produce 225,000 tons of copper per year (along with by-products of molybdenum, gold
and silver) for an initial mine life of more than 25 years.
        The Company paid $12.5 million at the signing of the contract. An additional $12.5 million has been accrued by the Company as
it evaluates the project for development, over a three to five year period. This amount is classified in other non-current liabilities in the
Company's consolidated financial statements. The balance of $375 million will be paid if the Company decides to develop the project.
Toquepala Concentrator Expansion:
        In April 2015, the construction permit for the Toquepala expansion project was approved by the MINEM. The project budget is
$1.3 billion, of which $1,227 million has been invested through December 31, 2018. When completed, this project is expected to
increase annual production capacity by 100,000 tons of copper and 3,100 tons of molybdenum. The construction of the project was
completed and the project began production in the fourth quarter of 2018. Full production is expected to be reached by the second
quarter of 2019.
144
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 12—COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES: (Continued)
Corporate Social Responsibility:
        The Company has a corporate social responsibility policy to maintain and promote continuity of its mining operations and obtain
the best results. The main objective of this policy is to integrate its operations with the local communities in the areas of influence of
its operations by creating a permanent positive relationship with them, in order to develop the optimum social conditions and to
promote sustainable development in the area. Accordingly , the Company has made the following commitments:
        Tacna Region:     In connection with the Toquepala concentrator expansion, the Company has committed to fund various social
and infrastructure improvement projects in Toquepala's neighboring communities. The total amount committed for these purposes is S/
445.0 million (approximately $131.7 million).
        Moquegua Region:     In the Moquegua region, the Company is part of a "development roundtable" in which the local municipal
authorities, the community representatives and the Company discuss the social needs and the way the Company could contribute to
sustainable development in the region. As part of this, the roundtable is discussing the creation of a Moquegua Region Development
Fund for which the Company has of fered a contribution of S/ 700 million (approximately $207.2 million). While final funding is not
yet settled, the Company has committed to contribute S/ 108.5 million (approximately $32.1 million) in advance, which is being
utilized in an educational project and S/ 48.4 million (approximately $14.3 million) for a residual water treatment plant in Ilo, a sea-
wall embankment and a fresh water facility at El Algarrobal.
        In addition, the Company has committed S/ 202.0 million (approximately $59.8 million) for the construction of six infrastructure
projects in the Moquegua region under the "social investment for taxes" (obras por impuestos) program which allows the Company to
use these amounts as an advance payment of taxes.
        These commitments are subject to the continuity of the respective mine operations and, as such, are not considered to be present
obligations of the Company . Therefore, the Company has not recorded a liability in its condensed consolidated financial statements.
Peruvian operations
Power pur chase agr eements:
• Electr operu S.A.:   In June 2014, the Company entered into a power purchase agreement for 120 megawatt ("MW")
with the state power company Electroperu S.A., under which Electroperu S.A. began supplying ener gy for the Peruvian
operations for twenty years starting on April 17, 2017.
• Kallpa Generacion S.A. ("Kallpa"):   In July 2014, the Company entered into a power purchase agreement for 120MW
with Kallpa, an independent Israeli owned power company , under which Kallpa will supply ener gy for the Peruvian
operations for ten years starting on April 17, 2017 and ending on April 30, 2027. In May 2016, the Company signed an
additional power purchase agreement for a maximum of 80MW  with Kallpa, under which Kallpa began supplying
energy for the Peruvian operations related to the Toquepala Expansion and other minor projects for ten years starting on
May 1, 2017 and ending after ten years of commercial operation of the Toquepala Expansion or on April 30, 2029;
whichever occurs first.
145
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 12—COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES: (Continued)
Mexican operations
Power pur chase agr eements:
• MGE:   In 2012, the Company signed a power purchase agreement with MGE, an indirect subsidiary of Grupo Mexico,
to supply power to some of the Company's Mexican operations through 2032. For further information, please see
Note 16 "Related party transactions".
• Eolica el Retiro, S.A.P .I. de C.V .: In 2013, the Company signed a power purchase agreement with Eolica el
Retiro, S.A.P .I de C.V . a windfarm ener gy producer that is an indirect subsidiary of Grupo Mexico, to supply power to
some of the Company's Mexican operations. For further information, please see Note 16 "Related party transactions".
        For an estimate of the Company's contractual obligations for power purchases, please see, "Contractual Obligations" under Item 7
"Management Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations."
Corporate operations
Commitment for Capital pr ojects:
        As of December 31, 2018, the Company has committed approximately $343.1 million for the development of its capital
investment projects.
Tax contingency matters:
        Tax contingencies are provided for under ASC 740-10-50-15 Uncertain tax position (see Note 7 "Income taxes").
NOTE 13—ST OCKHOLDERS' EQUITY
Treasury Stock:
        Activity in treasury stock in the years 2018 and 2017 was as follows (in millions):
146  2018  2017  
Southern Copper common shares        
Balance as of January 1,  $2,768.7  $2,769.0  
Purchase of shares   —  — 
Used for corporate purposes   (0.4) (0.3)
        
Balance as of December 31,   2,768.3   2,768.7  
        
Parent Company (Grupo Mexico) common shares        
Balance as of January 1,   232.4   218.6  
Other activity , including dividend, interest and foreign
currency transaction ef fect   18.9  13.8 
        
Balance as of December 31,   251.3   232.4  
        
Treasury stock balance as of December 31,  $3,019.6  $3,001.1  
                
        
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 13—ST OCKHOLDERS' EQUITY  (Continued)
SCC shar es of common stock in tr easury:
        At December 31, 2018 and 2017, treasury stock holds 1 11,551,617 shares and 1 11,567,617 shares of SCC's common stock with a
cost of $2,768.7 million and $2,769.0 million, respectively . The shares of SCC's common stock held in treasury are used for Director's
stock award plans and available for general corporate purposes.
SCC shar e repurchase pr ogram:
        In 2008, the Company's Board of Directors ("BOD") authorized a $500 million share repurchase program that has since been
increased by the BOD and is currently authorized to $3 billion. Pursuant to this program, the Company has purchased 1 19.5 million
shares of common stock at a cost of $2.9 billion. These shares are available for general corporate purposes. The Company may
purchase additional shares of its common stock from time to time, based on market conditions and other factors. This repurchase
program has no expiration date and may be modified or discontinued at any time.
        There has not been activity in the SCC share repurchase program since the third quarter of 2016. The NYSE closing price of SCC
common shares at December 31, 2018 was $30.77 and the maximum number of shares that the Company could purchase at that price
is 2.7 million shares.
        Grupo Mexico's direct and indirect ownership remains at 88.9% as of December 31, 2018.
Directors' Stock Award Plan:
        The Company established a stock award compensation plan for certain directors who are not compensated as employees of the
Company . Under this plan, participants received 1,200 shares of common stock upon election and 1,200 additional shares following
each annual meeting of stockholders thereafter . 600,000 shares of Southern Copper common stock have been reserved for this plan. On
April 26, 2018, the Company's stockholders approved a five-year extension of the Plan until January 28, 2023 and an increase of the
shares award from 1,200 to 1,600. The fair value of the award is measured each year at the date of the grant. In 2018 and 2017 the
stock based compensation expense under this plan equaled $0.4 million for each of these years.
        The activity of this plan for the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017 was as follows:
Parent Company common shar es:
        At December 31, 2018 and 2017, there were in treasury 100,188,809 and 108,450,672 of Grupo Mexico's common shares,
respectively .
147  2018  2017  
Total SCC shares reserved for the plan   600,000   600,000  
        
Total shares granted at January 1,   (346,800 ) (334,800 )
Granted in the period   (16,000 ) (12,000 )
        
Total shares granted at December 31,   (362,800 ) (346,800 )
        
Remaining shares reserved   237.200   253,200  
                
        
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 13—ST OCKHOLDERS' EQUITY  (Continued)
Employee Stock Pur chase Plan:
        2010 Plan:     During 2010, the Company of fered to eligible employees a stock purchase plan through a trust that acquires series B
shares of Grupo Mexico stock for sale to its employees, employees of subsidiaries, and certain af filiated companies. The purchase
price was established at 26.51 Mexican pesos (approximately $1.28) for the initial subscription. Every two years employees were able
to acquire title to 50% of the shares paid in the previous two years. The employees paid for shares purchased through monthly payroll
deductions over the eight year period of the plan. At the end of the eight year period, the Company granted the participant a bonus of
one share for every ten shares purchased by the employee.
        The participants were entitled to receive dividends in cash for dividends paid by Grupo Mexico for all shares that were fully
purchased and paid by the employee as of the date that the dividend is paid. If the participant had only partially paid for shares, the
entitled dividends were used to reduce the remaining liability owed for purchased shares.
        In the case of voluntary or involuntary resignation/termination of the employee, the Company paid to the employee the fair
market sales price at the date of resignation/termination of the fully paid shares, net of costs and taxes. When the fair market sales
value of the shares was higher than the purchase price, the Company applied a deduction over the amount to be paid to the employee
based on a decreasing schedule specified in the plan.
        In case of retirement or death of the employee, the Company rendered the buyer or his legal beneficiary , the fair market sales
value as of the date of retirement or death of the shares ef fectively paid, net of costs and taxes.
        The stock based compensation expense for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 and the remaining balance of the
unrecognized compensation expense under this plan were as follows (in millions):
        The plan ended in January 29, 2018.
148  2018  2017  2016  
Stock based compensation expense  $0.2 $0.6 $0.6 
Unrecognized compensation expense  $— $0.2 $0.8 
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 13—ST OCKHOLDERS' EQUITY  (Continued)
        The following table presents the stock award activity of the 2010 Employee Stock Purchase Plan for the years ended
December 31, 2017 and 2016:
        2015 Plan:     In January 2015, the Company of fered to eligible employees a new stock purchase plan through a trust that acquires
series B shares of Grupo Mexico stock for sale to its employees, and employees of subsidiaries, and certain af filiated companies. The
purchase price was established at 38.44 Mexican pesos (approximately $1.86) for the initial subscription, which expires in January
2023. Every two years employees will be able to acquire title to 50% of the shares paid in the previous two years. The employees will
pay for shares purchased through monthly payroll deductions over the eight year period of the plan. At the end of the eight year period,
the Company will grant the participant a bonus of 1 share for every 10 shares purchased by the employee. Any future subscription will
be at the average market price at the date of acquisition or the grant date.
        If Grupo Mexico pays dividends on shares during the eight year period, the participants will be entitled to receive the dividend in
cash for all shares that have been fully purchased and paid as of the date that the dividend is paid. If the participant has only partially
paid for shares, the entitled dividends will be used to reduce the remaining liability owed for purchased shares.
        In the case of voluntary or involuntary resignation/termination of the employee, the Company will pay to the employee the fair
market sales price at the date of resignation of the fully paid shares, net of costs and taxes. When the fair market sales value of the
shares is higher than the purchase price, the Company will apply a deduction over the amount to be paid to the employee based on a
decreasing schedule specified in the plan.
        In case of retirement or death of the employee, the Company will render the buyer or his legal beneficiary , the fair market sales
value as of the date of retirement or death of the shares ef fectively paid, net of costs and taxes.
149  Shar es  Unit Weighted Average
Grant Date Fair  Value  
Outstanding shares at January 1, 2018   1,393,663  $ 2.05 
Granted   —  — 
Exercised   (1,275,729 ) 2.05 
Forfeited   —  — 
        
Outstanding shares at December 31, 2018   117,934  $ 2.05 
                
        
Outstanding shares at January 1, 2017   1,401,096  $ 2.05 
Granted   —  — 
Exercised   (7,433 ) 2.05 
Forfeited   —  — 
        
Outstanding shares at December 31, 2017   1,393,663  $ 2.05 
                
        
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 13—ST OCKHOLDERS' EQUITY  (Continued)
        The stock based compensation expense for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016 and the unrecognized
compensation expense under this plan were as follows (in millions):
        The following table presents the stock award activity of this plan for the years ended December 31, 2017 and 2016:
        2018 Plan:     In November 2018, the Company of fered to eligible employees a new stock purchase plan (the "New Employee
Stock Purchase Plan") through a trust that acquires series B shares of Grupo Mexico stock for sale to its employees, and employees of
subsidiaries, and certain af filiated companies .
        The purchase price was established at 37.89 Mexican pesos (approximately $1.86) for the initial subscription, which expires in
October 2026. Every two years employees will be able to acquire title to 50% of the shares paid in the previous two years. The
employees will pay for shares purchased through monthly payroll deductions over the eight year period of the plan. At the end of the
eight year period, the Company will grant the participant a bonus of 1 share for every 10 shares purchased by the employee. Any future
subscription will be at the average market price at the date of acquisition or the grant date.
        If Grupo Mexico pays dividends on shares during the eight year period, the participants will be entitled to receive the dividend in
cash for all shares that have been fully purchased and paid as of the date that the dividend is paid. If the participant has only partially
paid for shares, the entitled dividends will be used to reduce the remaining liability owed for purchased shares.
        In the case of voluntary resignation of the employee, the Company will pay to the employee the fair market sales price at the date
of resignation of the fully paid shares, net of costs and taxes. When
150  2018  2017  2016  
Stock based compensation expense  $0.6 $0.6 $0.6 
Unrecognized compensation expense  $2.6 $3.2 $3.8 
  Shar es  Unit Weighted Average
Grant Date Fair  Value  
Outstanding shares at January 1, 2018   2,293,120  $ 2.63 
Granted   —    
Exercised   (452,784 )$ 2.63 
Forfeited   —    
        
Outstanding shares at December 31, 2018   1,840,336  $ 2.63 
                
        
Outstanding shares at January 1, 2017   2,540,223  $ 2.63 
Granted   —  — 
Exercised   (247,103 )$ 2.63 
Forfeited   —  — 
        
Outstanding shares at December 31, 2018   2,293,120  $ 2.63 
                
        
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 13—ST OCKHOLDERS' EQUITY  (Continued)
the fair market sales value of the shares is higher than the purchase price, the Company will apply a deduction over the amount to be
paid to the employee based on the following schedule:
        In the case of involuntary termination of the employee, the Company will pay to the employee the fair market sales price at the
date of termination of employment of the fully paid shares, net of costs and taxes. When the fair market sales value of the shares is
higher than the purchase price, the Company will apply a deduction over the amount to be paid to the employee based on the following
schedule:
        In case of retirement or death of the employee, the Company will render the buyer or his legal beneficiary , the fair market sales
value as of the date of retirement or death of the shares ef fectively paid, net of costs and taxes.
        The stock based compensation expense for the year ended December 31, 2018 and the unrecognized compensation expense under
this plan were as follows (in millions):
151  % Deducted  
If the resignation occurs during:     
1st year after the grant date   90%
2nd year after the grant date   80%
3rd year after the grant date   70%
4th year after the grant date   60%
5th year after the grant date   50%
6th year after the grant date   40%
7th year after the grant date   20%
  % Deducted  
If the resignation occurs during:     
1st year after the grant date   100%
2nd year after the grant date   95%
3rd year after the grant date   90%
4th year after the grant date   80%
5th year after the grant date   70%
6th year after the grant date   60%
7th year after the grant date   50%
  2018  
Stock based compensation expense  $— 
Unrecognized compensation expense  $3.6 
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 13—ST OCKHOLDERS' EQUITY  (Continued)
        The following table presents the stock award activity of this plan for the year ended December 31, 2018:
Executive Stock Pur chase Plan:
        Grupo Mexico also of fers a stock purchase plan for certain members of its executive management and the executive management
of its subsidiaries and certain af filiated companies. Under this plan, participants will receive incentive cash bonuses which are used to
purchase shares of Grupo Mexico which are deposited in a trust.
Non-contr olling inter est:
        For all the years presented, in the consolidated statement of earnings the income attributable to non-controlling interest is based
on the earnings of the Company's Peruvian Branch.
        The non-controlling interest of the Company's Peruvian Branch is for investment shares. These shares were generated by
legislation in place in Peru from the 1970s through 1991; such legislation provided for the participation of mining workers in the
profits of the enterprises for which they worked. This participation was divided between equity and cash. The investment shares
included in the non-controlling interest on the consolidated balance sheets are the still outstanding equity distributions made to the
Peruvian Branch's employees.
        In prior years, the Company acquired some Peruvian investment shares in exchange for newly issued common shares of the
Company and through purchases at market value. These acquisitions were accounted for as purchases of non-controlling interests. The
excess paid over the carrying value was assigned to intangible assets and is being amortized based on production. As a result of these
acquisitions, the remaining investment shareholders hold a 0.71% interest in the Peruvian Branch and are entitled to a pro rata
participation in the cash distributions made by the Peruvian Branch. The shares are recorded as a non-controlling interest in the
Company's financial statements.
NOTE 14—F AIR VALUE MEASUREMENT :
        Subtopic 820-10 of ASC "Fair value measurement and disclosures—Overall" establishes a fair value hierarchy that prioritizes the
inputs to valuation techniques used to measure fair value. The hierarchy gives the highest priority to unadjusted quoted prices in active
markets for identical assets or
152  Shar es  Unit Weighted Average
Grant Date Fair  Value  
Outstanding shares at January 1, 2018   —  — 
Granted   2,782,424   1.86 
Exercised   —  — 
Forfeited   —  — 
        
Outstanding shares at December 31, 2018   2,782,424   1.86 
                
        
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 14—F AIR VALUE MEASUREMENT : (Continued)
liabilities (Level 1 measurements) and the lowest priority to unobservable inputs (Level 3 measurements). The three levels of the fair
value hierarchy under Subtopic 820-10 are described below:
Level 1—Unadjusted quoted prices in active markets that are accessible at the measurement date for identical, unrestricted
assets or liabilities.
Level 2—Inputs that are observable, either directly or indirectly , but do not qualify as Level 1 inputs. (i.e., quoted prices for
similar assets or liabilities).
Level 3—Prices or valuation techniques that require inputs that are both significant to the fair value measurement and
unobservable (i.e., supported by little or no market activity).
        The carrying amounts of certain financial instruments, including cash and cash equivalents, accounts receivable (other than
accounts receivable associated with provisionally priced sales) and accounts payable approximate fair value due to their short
maturities. Consequently , such financial instruments are not included in the following table that provides information about the
carrying amounts and estimated fair values of other financial instruments that are not measured at fair value in the consolidated
balance sheet as of December 31, 2018 and December 31, 2017 (in millions):
        Long-term debt is carried at amortized cost and its estimated fair value is based on quoted market prices classified as Level 1 in
the fair value hierarchy except for the cases of the Yankee bonds, the notes due 2020 and the notes due 2022, which qualify as Level 2
in the fair value hierarchy as they are based on quoted priced in market that are not active.
153  At December  31,
2018  At December  31,
2017  
  Carrying
Value  Fair
Value  Carrying
Value  Fair
Value  
Liabilities:              
Long-term debt level 1   5,210.7   5,540.0   5,208.4   6,488.9  
Long-term debt level 2   749.4   761.7   748.7   806.1  
              
Total long-term debt  $5,960.1  $6,301.7  $5,957.1  $7,295.0  
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 14—F AIR VALUE MEASUREMENT : (Continued)
        Fair values of assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis were calculated as of December 31, 2018 and 2017,
as follows (in millions):
 
154  Fair Value at Measur ement Date Using:  
Description  Fair Value
as of
December  31,
2018  Quoted prices in
active markets for
identical assets
(Level 1)  Significant
other
observable
inputs
(Level 2)  Significant
unobservable
inputs
(Level 3)  
Assets:              
Short term investment:              
—Trading securities  $ 213.1  $ 213.1  $ — $ — 
—Available-for -sale debt securities:              
Corporate bonds   —  —  —  — 
Asset backed securities   0.4  —  0.4  — 
Mortgage backed securities   0.3  —  0.3  — 
Accounts r eceivable:              
—Embedded derivatives—Not classified
as hedges:              
Provisionally priced sales:              
Copper   274.3   274.3   —  — 
Molybdenum   107.4   107.4   —  — 
              
Total  $ 595.5  $ 594.8  $ 0.7 $ — 
                            
              
  Fair Value at Measur ement Date Using:  
Description  Fair Value
as of
December  31,
2017  Quoted prices in
active markets for
identical assets
(Level 1)  Significant
other
observable
inputs
(Level 2)  Significant
unobservable
inputs
(Level 3)  
Assets:              
Short term investment:              
—Trading securities  $ 49.5 $ 49.5 $ — $ — 
—Available-for -sale debt securities:              
Corporate bonds   0.1  —  0.1  — 
Asset backed securities   0.5  —  0.5  — 
Mortgage backed securities   0.4  —  0.4  — 
Accounts r eceivable:              
—Embedded derivatives—Not classified
as hedges:              
Provisionally priced sales:              
Copper   184.6   184.6   —  — 
Molybdenum   102.8   102.8   —  — 
              
Total  $ 337.9  $ 336.9  $ 1.0 $ — 
                            
              
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 14—F AIR VALUE MEASUREMENT : (Continued)
        The Company's short-term trading securities investments are classified as Level 1 because they are valued using quoted prices of
the same securities as they consist of bonds issued by public companies and publicly traded. The Company's short-term available-for -
sale investments are classified as Level 2 because they are valued using quoted prices for similar investments.
        The Company's accounts receivables associated with provisionally priced copper sales are valued using quoted market prices
based on the forward price on the LME or on the COMEX. Such value is classified within Level 1 of the fair value hierarchy .
Molybdenum prices are established by reference to the publication Platt's Metals Week and are considered Level 1 in the fair value
hierarchy .
NOTE 15—CONCENTRA TION OF  RISK:
        The Company operates four open-pit copper mines, five under ground poly-metallic mines, two smelters and ten refineries in Peru
and Mexico and substantially all of its assets are located in these countries. There can be no assurances that the Company's operations
and assets that are subject to the jurisdiction of the governments of Peru and Mexico will not be adversely af fected by future actions of
such governments. Much of the Company's products are exported from Peru and Mexico to customers principally in the United States,
Europe, Asia and South America.
        Financial instruments, which potentially subject the Company to a concentration of credit risk, consist primarily of cash and cash
equivalents, short-term investments and trade accounts receivable.The Company invests or maintains available cash with various
banks, principally in the United States, Mexico, Europe and Peru, or in commercial papers of highly-rated companies. As part of its
cash management process, the Company regularly monitors the relative credit standing of these institutions. At December 31, 2018,
SCC had invested its cash and cash equivalents and short-term investments as follows:
        During the normal course of business, the Company provides credit to its customers. Although the receivables resulting from
these transactions are not collateralized, the Company has not experienced significant problems with the collection of receivables.
        The Company is exposed to credit loss in cases where the financial institutions with which it has entered into derivative
transactions (commodity , foreign exchange and currency/interest rate swaps) are unable to pay when they owe funds as a result of
protection agreements with them. To minimize the risk of such losses, the Company only uses highly-rated financial institutions that
meet certain requirements. The Company also periodically reviews the creditworthiness of these institutions to
155     
 % in one institution 
   
 % of total
cash(1) 
Country  $ in million  of country  of total cash  
United States  $ 697.1   65.9% 27.7% 18.3%
Switzerland   315.7   29.8% 61.2% 18.3%
Peru   7.6  0.7% 75.6% 0.5%
Mexico   38.0  3.6% 89.3% 3.2%
              
Total cash and short-term
investment  $1,058.4   100.0 %      
                            
              
(1) 95.8% of the Company's cash is in U.S. dollars.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 15—CONCENTRA TION OF  RISK: (Continued)
ensure that they are maintaining their ratings. The Company does not anticipate that any of the financial institutions will default on
their obligations.
        The Company's lar gest customers as percentage of accounts receivable and total sales were as follows:
NOTE 16—RELA TED P ARTY TRANSACTIONS:
        The Company has entered into certain transactions in the ordinary course of business with parties that are controlling shareholders
or their af filiates. These transactions include the lease of of fice space, air transportation, construction services and products and
services related to mining and refining. The Company lends and borrows funds among af filiates for acquisitions and other corporate
purposes. These financial transactions bear interest and are subject to review and approval by senior management, as are all related
party transactions. It is the Company's policy that the Audit Committee of the Board of Directors shall review all related party
transactions. The Company is prohibited from entering or continuing a material related party transaction that has not been reviewed
and approved or ratified by the Audit Committee.
156  2018  2017  2016  
Accounts receivable trade as of December 31,           
Five lar gest customers   34.2% 28.4% 31.1%
Largest customer   10.9% 8.2% 11.9%
Total sales in year           
Five lar gest customers   28.4% 25.1% 30.4%
Largest customer   9.3% 8.8% 8.4%
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 16—RELA TED P ARTY TRANSACTIONS: (Continued)
        Receivable and payable balances with related parties are shown below (in millions):
157  At December  31,  
  2018  2017  
Related parties receivable current:        
Grupo Mexico and affiliates:        
Asarco LLC  $74.4  4.1 
Americas Mining Corporation ("AMC")   11.0  — 
AMMINCO Apoyo Administrativo, S.A. de C.V . ("AMMINCO")   0.2  — 
Compania Perforadora Mexico S.A.P .I. de C.V . and af filiates   1.4  1.4 
Ferrocarril Mexicano, S.A. de C.V .   0.1  — 
Grupo Mexico   2.7  2.8 
Mexico Generadora de Ener gia S. de R.L. ("MGE")   10.3 $16.2 
Mexico Proyectos y Desarrollos, S.A. de C.V . and af filiates   0.6  1.1 
Related to the contr olling gr oup:        
Boutique Bowling de Mexico S.A. de C.V .   0.3  0.2 
Mexico Transportes Aereos, S.A. de C.V . ("Mextransport")   0.1  — 
Operadora de Cinemas S.A. de C.V .   0.4  0.3 
        
 $101.5  $26.1 
                
        
Related parties payable:        
Grupo Mexico and affiliates:        
Asarco LLC  $ 4.1 $24.2 
AMMINCO   8.0  — 
Eolica El Retiro, S.A.P .I. de C.V .   1.0  0.8 
Ferrocarril Mexicano S.A. de C.V .   6.4  2.6 
Grupo Mexico   0.6  0.7 
MGE   40.6  38.5 
Mexico Proyectos y Desarrollos S.A. de C.V . and af filiates   14.4  21.7 
Related to the contr olling gr oup:        
Boutique Bowling de Mexico S.A. de C.V .   0.1  0.6 
Mexico Transportes Aereos S.A. de C.V . ("Mextransport")   —  0.3 
Operadora de Cinemas S.A. de C.V .   0.1  0.7 
        
 $75.3 $90.1 
                
        
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 16—RELA TED P ARTY TRANSACTIONS: (Continued)
Purchase and sale activity:
Grupo Mexico and affiliates:
        The following table summarizes the purchase and sale activities with Grupo Mexico and its af filiates in 2018, 2017 and 2016 (in
millions):
        Grupo Mexico, the parent and the majority indirect stockholder of the Company , and its af filiates provide various services to the
Company . These services are primarily related to accounting, legal, tax, financial, treasury , human resources, price risk assessment and
hedging, purchasing, procurement and logistics, sales and administrative and other support services. In 2018, AMMINCO, a subsidiary
of Grupo Mexico, began providing these services for the Company's Peruvian operations. The Company pays Grupo Mexico and
AMMINCO for these services and expects to continue these services in the future. The Company sold vehicles to AMMINCO.
        In 2018, the Company donated $6.2 million to Fundacion Grupo Mexico, A.C., an or ganization dedicated to promoting the social
and economic development of the communities close to the Company's Mexican operations.
        In addition, in December 2018, the Company´s Peruvian operations advanced $1 1 million to AMC for the payment of the
Company's GIL TI tax which later was determined not to be due.
158  2018  2017  2016  
Purchase activity           
Asarco LLC  $37.2 $37.2 $30.3 
AMMINCO   8.0  —  — 
Compania Perforadora Mexico S.A.P .I. de C.V . and
affiliates   —  —  0.3 
Eolica El Retiro, S.A.P .I. de C.V .   3.6  3.3  2.0 
Ferrocarril Mexicano, S.A. de C.V .   41.7  43.5  42.7 
Grupo Mexico   10.1  14.0  13.8 
MGE   200.1   223.7   233.8  
Mexico Proyectos y Desarrollos S.A. de C.V . and af filiates   79.8  152.9   76.0 
           
Total purchases  $380.5  $474.6  $398.9  
                      
           
Sales activity           
Asarco LLC  $81.8 $96.2 $37.1 
AMMINCO   0.3  —  — 
Compania Perforadora Mexico S.A.P .I. de C.V . and
affiliates   —  0.2  0.6 
Grupo Mexico   —  0.2  0.6 
Mexico Proyectos y Desarrollos S.A. de C.V . and af filiates   —  —  0.4 
Operadora de Generadoras de Ener gia Mexico S.A. de
C.V   —  —  0.1 
MGE   68.2  101.0   95.9 
           
Total sales  $150.3  $197.6  $134.7  
                      
           
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 16—RELA TED P ARTY TRANSACTIONS: (Continued)
        The Company's Mexican operations paid fees for freight services provided by Ferrocarril Mexicano, S.A  de C.V ., for construction
services provided by Mexico Proyectos y Desarrollos, S.A. de C.V . and its af filiates, and for drilling services provided by Compañia
Perforadora Mexico S.A.P .I. de C.V . All of these companies are subsidiaries of Grupo Mexico.
        The Company's Mexican operations purchased scrap and other residual copper mineral from Asarco, and power from MGE. Both
companies are subsidiaries of Grupo Mexico.
        In 2005, the Company or ganized MGE, as a subsidiary of Minera Mexico, for the construction of two power plants to supply
power to the Company's Mexican operations. In May 2010, the Company's Mexican operations granted a $350 million line of credit to
MGE for the construction of the power plants. That line of credit was due on December 31, 2012 and carried an interest rate of 4.4%.
In the first quarter of 2012, an indirect subsidiary of Grupo Mexico, acquired 99.999% of MGE through a capital subscription of
1,928.6 million of Mexican pesos (approximately $150 million), reducing Minera Mexico's participation to less than 0.001%. As
consequence of this change in control, MGE became an indirect subsidiary of Grupo Mexico. Additionally , at the same time, MGE
paid $150 million to the Company's Mexican operations, partially reducing the total debt. The remaining balance was repaid in the
third quarter of 2016. Related to this loan, the Company recorded interest income of $4.2 million in 2016.
        In 2012, the Company signed a power purchase agreement with MGE, whereby MGE will supply some of the Company's
Mexican operations with power through 2032. MGE has two natural gas-fired combined cycle power generating units, with a net total
capacity of 516.2 megawatts and has been supplying power to the Company since December 2013. Currently , MGE is supplying
17.1% of its power output to third-party ener gy users; compared to 14% at December 31, 2017.
        In 2014, Mexico Generadora de Ener gia Eolica, S. de R.L. de C.V , an indirect subsidiary of Grupo Mexico, located in Oaxaca,
Mexico, acquired Eolica el Retiro, a windfarm with 37 wind turbines. This company started operations in January 2014 and started to
sell power to Industrial Minera Mexico, S.A. de C.V . and subsidiaries (IMMSA) and other subsidiaries of Grupo Mexico in the third
quarter of 2014. Currently , Eolica el Retiro is supplying approximately 18% of its power output to IMMSA; compared to 27% at
December 31, 2017.
        The Company sold copper cathodes, rod and anodes, as well as sulfuric acid, silver , gold and lime to Asarco. In addition, the
Company received fees for building rental and maintenance services provided to Mexico Proyectos y Desarrollos, S.A. de C.V . and its
affiliates and to Perforadora Mexico S.A.P .I de C.V ., and for natural gas and services provided by MGE, all subsidiaries of Grupo
Mexico.
159
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 16—RELA TED P ARTY TRANSACTIONS: (Continued)
Companies with r elationships with the contr olling gr oup:
        The following table summarizes the purchase and sales activities with other Larrea family companies in 2018, 2017 and 2016 (in
millions):
        The Larrea family controls a majority of the capital stock of Grupo Mexico, and has extensive interests in other businesses,
including transportation, real estate and entertainment. The Company engages in certain transactions in the ordinary course of business
with other entities controlled by the Larrea family relating to the lease of of fice space, air transportation and entertainment.
        The Company's Mexican operations paid fees for entertainment services provided by Boutique Bowling de Mexico S.A  de C.V .
and Operadora de Cinemas S.A. de C.V . Both companies are controlled by the Larrea family .
        MexT ransport provides aviation services to the Company's Mexican operations. In addition, the Company received fees for
building rental provided to Mextransport. This is a company controlled by the Larrea family .
        In addition, the Company received fees for building rental and maintenance services provided to Boutique Bowling de Mexico
S.A de C.V . and Operadora de Cinemas S.A. de C.V .
        Equity Investment in Affiliate:     The Company has a 44.2% participation in Compañia Minera Coimolache S.A.
("Coimolache"), which it accounts for on the equity method. Coimolache owns Tantahuatay , a gold mine located in northern Peru. It is
anticipated that in the future the Company will enter into similar transactions with these same parties.
Companies with r elationships with SCC executive officers:
        In 2018, the Company did not have purchase activities with companies having relationships with SCC executive of ficers. In 2017
and 2016, the Company purchased industrial material from these companies amounting to $0.2 million and $2.0 million, respectively .
It is anticipated that in the future the Company will not enter into similar transactions with these same parties.
160  2018  2017  2016  
Purchase activity           
Boutique Bowling de Mexico S.A. de C.V .  $0.3 $0.3 $0.4 
Mextransport   12.4  1.3  2.0 
Operadora de Cinemas S.A. de C.V .   0.2  0.1  0.5 
           
Total purchases  $12.9 $1.7 $2.9 
                      
           
Sales activity           
Boutique Bowling de Mexico S.A. de C.V .  $0.2 $0.2 $0.2 
Mextransport   1.2  0.3  0.2 
Operadora de Cinemas S.A. de C.V .   0.1  0.2  0.1 
           
Total sales  $1.5 $0.7 $0.5 
                      
           
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 16—RELA TED P ARTY TRANSACTIONS: (Continued)
        Tax Agreement:     On February 28, 2017, AMC and the Company entered into a tax agreement, ef fective as of February 20,
2017, pursuant to which AMC, as the parent of the consolidated group of which the Company is a member and joins in the filing of a
U.S. federal income tax return, (a) will be responsible for and dischar ge, any and all liabilities and payments due to the IRS on account
of any incremental tax liabilities of the Company in connection with the potential adjustments being considered by the IRS in
connection with the interest of the 2012 Judgment, (b) will not seek reimbursement, contribution or collection of any amounts of
money or any other asset in connection therewith from the Company , and (c) will indemnify , defend and hold harmless the Company
from any such liability , including the cost of such defense.
NOTE 17—SEGMENT  AND RELA TED INFORMA TION:
        Company management views Southern Copper as having three reportable segments and manages it on the basis of these
segments. The reportable segments identified by the Company are: the Peruvian operations, the Mexican open-pit operations and the
Mexican under ground mining operations segment identified as the IMMSA  unit.
        The three reportable segments identified are groups of mines, each of which constitute an operating segment, with similar
economic characteristics, type of products, processes and support facilities, similar regulatory environments, similar employee
bargaining contracts and similar currency risks. In addition, each mine within the individual group earns revenues from similar type of
customers for their products and services and each group incurs expenses independently , including commercial transactions between
groups.
        Intersegment sales are based on arm's length prices at the time of sale. These may not be reflective of actual prices realized by the
Company due to various factors, including additional processing, timing of sales to outside customers and transportation cost. Added
to the segment data is information regarding the Company's sales. The segments identified by the Company are:
1. Peruvian operations, which include the Toquepala and Cuajone mine complexes and the smelting and refining plants,
including a precious metals plant, industrial railroad and port facilities that service both mines. The Peruvian operations
produce copper , with production of by-products of molybdenum, silver and other material.
2. Mexican open-pit operations, which include La Caridad and Buenavista mine complexes and the smelting and refining
plants, including a precious metals plant and a copper rod plant and support facilities that service both mines. The
Mexican open-pit operations produce copper , with production of by-products of molybdenum, silver and other material.
3. Mexican under ground mining operations, which include five under ground mines that produce zinc, copper , silver and
gold, a coal mine which produces coal and coke, and a zinc refinery . This group is identified as the IMMSA  unit.
        The Peruvian operations include two open-pit copper mines whose mineral output is transported by rail to Ilo, Peru where it is
processed at the Company's Ilo smelter and refinery , without distinguishing between the products of the two mines. The resulting
product, anodes and refined copper , are then shipped to customers throughout the world. These shipments are recorded as revenue of
the Company's Peruvian mines.
161
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 17—SEGMENT  AND RELA TED INFORMA TION: (Continued)
        The Mexican open-pit segment includes two copper mines whose mineral output is processed in the same smelter and refinery
without distinguishing between the products of the two mines. The resultant product, anodes and refined copper , are then shipped to
customers throughout the world. These shipments are recorded as revenues of the Company's Mexican open-pit mines.
        The Company has determined that it is necessary to classify the Peruvian open-pit operations as a separate operating segment
from the Mexican open-pit operations due to the very distinct regulatory and political environments in which they operate. The
Company's senior management must consider the operations in each country separately when analyzing results of the Company and
making key decisions. The open-pit mines in Peru must comply with stricter environmental rules and must continually deal with a
political climate that has a very distinct vision of the mining industry as compared to Mexico. In addition, the collective bar gaining
agreement contracts are negotiated dif ferently in each of the countries. These key dif ferences result in the Company taking varying
decisions with regards to open-pit operations in the two countries.
        The IMMSA  segment includes five mines whose minerals are processed in the same refinery . This segment also includes an
under ground coal mine. Sales of product from this segment are recorded as revenues of the Company's IMMSA  unit. While the
Mexican under ground mines are subject to a very similar regulatory environment of the Mexican open-pit mines, the nature of the
products and processes of two Mexican operations vary distinctly . These dif ferences cause the Company's senior management to take a
very dif ferent approach when analyzing results and making decisions regarding the two Mexican operations.
        Financial information is regularly prepared for each of the three segments and the results of the Company's operations are
regularly reported to senior management on the segment basis. Senior management of the Company focus on operating income and on
total assets as measures of performance to evaluate dif ferent segments and to make decisions to allocate resources to the reported
segments. These are common measures in the mining industry .
162
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 17—SEGMENT  AND RELA TED INFORMA TION: (Continued)
        Financial information relating to Company's segments is as follows:
163  Year Ended December  31, 2018  
  (in millions)  
  Mexican
Open-pit  Mexican
IMMSA
Unit  Peruvian
Operations  Corporate,
other  and
eliminations  Consolidated  
Net sales outside of segments  $4,075.9  $448.6  $2,572.2  $ — $ 7,096.7  
Intersegment sales   —  79.3  —  (79.3 ) — 
Cost of sales (exclusive of
depreciation, amortization and
depletion)   1,611.0  377.2   1,509.4   (88.6 ) 3,409.0  
Selling, general and administrative   55.3  8.5  36.7  2.1  102.6  
Depreciation, amortization and
depletion   360.4   47.6  237.4   28.9  674.3  
Exploration   2.0  5.3  18.5  3.8  29.6 
                 
Operating income  $2,047.2  $ 89.3 $ 770.2  $ (25.5 ) 2,881.2  
Less:                 
Interest, net               (261.1 )
Other income (expense)               (30.7 )
Income taxes               (1,053.5 )
Equity earnings of af filiate               12.3 
Non-controlling interest               (5.2)
                 
Net income attributable to SCC              $ 1,543.0  
                                  
                 
Capital investment  $ 266.8  $ 60.0 $ 774.0  $ 20.6 $ 1,121.4  
Property and mine development, net  $4,783.8  $448.3  $3,797.2  $ 374.5  $ 9,403.8  
Total assets  $8,165.2  $930.2  $4,813.1  $ 576.3  $14,484.8  
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 17—SEGMENT  AND RELA TED INFORMA TION: (Continued)
164  Year Ended December  31, 2017  
  (in millions)  
  Mexican
Open-pit  Mexican
IMMSA
Unit  Peruvian
Operations  Corporate,
other  and
eliminations  Consolidated  
Net sales outside of segments  $3,972.7  $437.7  $2,244.1  $ — $ 6,654.5  
Intersegment sales   —  71.0  —  (71.0 ) — 
Cost of sales (exclusive of
depreciation, amortization and
depletion)   1,594.3   365.3   1,362.8   (69.6 ) 3,252.8  
Selling, general and administrative   47.9  7.9  36.2  1.1  93.1 
Depreciation, amortization and
depletion   401.0   56.2  203.6   10.3  671.1  
Exploration   2.7  5.5  14.4  6.2  28.8 
Environmental remediation   (10.2 ) —  —  —  (10.2 )
                 
Operating income  $1,937.0  $ 73.8 $ 627.1  $ (19.0 ) 2,618.9  
Less:                 
Interest, net               (300.5 )
Other income (expense)               (15.7 )
Income taxes               (1,593.4 )
Equity earnings of af filiate               23.1 
Non-controlling interest               (3.9)
                 
Net income attributable to SCC              $ 728.5  
                                  
                 
Capital investment  $ 297.6  $ 36.5 $ 685.4  $ 4.0 $ 1,023.5  
Property and mine development, net  $5,004.5  $366.9  $3,389.8  $ 338.4  $ 9,099.6  
Total assets  $8,323.1  $889.1  $4,314.5  $ 253.4  $13,780.1  
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 17—SEGMENT  AND RELA TED INFORMA TION: (Continued)
        The following table presents information regarding the opening and closing balances of receivables by reporting segment of the
Company for the three years ended December 31, 2018 (in millions):
165  Year Ended December  31, 2016  
  (in millions)  
  Mexican
Open-pit  Mexican
IMMSA
Unit  Peruvian
Operations  Corporate,
other  and
eliminations  Consolidated  
Net sales outside of segments  $3,234.3  $351.1  $1,794.4  $ — $ 5,379.8  
Intersegment sales   —  72.0  —  (72.0 ) — 
Cost of sales (exclusive of
depreciation, amortization and
depletion)   1,523.2   304.1   1,280.2   (73.4 ) 3,034.1  
Selling, general and administrative   47.1  7.4  37.5  2.3  94.3 
Depreciation, amortization and
depletion   364.7   49.8  217.1   15.5  647.1  
Exploration   5.2  5.0  13.0  16.9  40.1 
                 
Operating income  $1,294.1  $ 56.8 $ 246.6  $ (33.3 ) 1,564.2  
                 
Less:                 
Interest, net               (283.6 )
Other income (expense)               (24.6 )
Income taxes               (501.1 )
Equity earnings of af filiate               23.9 
Non-controlling interest               (2.3)
                 
Net income attributable to SCC              $ 776.5  
                                  
                 
Capital investment  $ 537.0  $ 35.8 $ 541.0  $ 4.7 $ 1,118.5 
Property and mine development, net  $5,136.8  $448.7  $2,949.3  $ 231.7  $ 8,766.5  
Total assets  $8,174.4  $825.0  $4,225.3  $ 9.6 $13,234.3  
  Mexican
Open-Pit  Mexican
IMMSA
Unit  Peruvian
Operations  Corporate &
Elimination  Consolidated  
As of December 31, 2018:                 
Trade receivables  $505.9  $ 50.5 $ 266.0  $ — $ 822.4  
Related parties   81.6  —  —  19.9  101.5  
As of December 31, 2017:                 
Trade receivables  $556.2  $ 79.7 $ 254.7  $ — $ 890.6  
Related parties   18.0  —  —  8.1  26.1 
As of December 31, 2016:                 
Trade receivables  $365.2  $ 47.1 $ 179.6  $ — $ 591.9  
Related parties   12.9  —  —  10.5  23.4 
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 17—SEGMENT  AND RELA TED INFORMA TION: (Continued)
SALES VALUE PER SEGMENT :
        The following table presents information regarding the sales value by reporting segment of the Company's significant products for
the three years ended December 31, 2018 (in millions):
 
 
166  Year Ended December  31, 2018  
(in millions)  Mexican
Open-pit  Mexican
IMMSA
Unit  Peruvian
Operations  Corporate,
Other  &
Eliminations  Total
Consolidated  
Copper  $3,459.1  $ 45.6 $2,251.2  $ (48.1 )$ 5,707.8  
Molybdenum   342.5   —  167.4   —  509.9  
Silver   175.3   83.5  69.5  (28.1 ) 300.2  
Zinc   —  328.7   —  (0.1) 328.6  
Other   99.0  70.1  84.1  (3.0) 250.2  
                 
Total  $4,075.9  $527.9  $2,572.2  $ (79.3 )$ 7,096.7  
                                  
                 
  Year Ended December  31, 2017  
(in millions)  Mexican
Open-pit  Mexican
IMMSA
Unit  Peruvian
Operations  Corporate,
Other  &
Eliminations  Total
Consolidated  
Copper  $3,480.2  $ 37.2 $1,996.4  $ (37.3 )$ 5,476.5  
Molybdenum   224.0   —  129.4   —  353.4  
Silver   170.7   71.9  70.6  (26.9 ) 286.3  
Zinc   —  327.2   —  (0.6) 326.6  
Other   97.8  73.2  47.7  (7.0) 211.7 
                 
Total  $3,972.7  $509.5  $2,244.1  $ (71.8 )$ 6,654.5  
                                  
                 
  Year Ended December  31, 2016  
(in millions)  Mexican
Open-pit  Mexican
IMMSA
Unit  Peruvian
Operations  Corporate,
Other  &
Eliminations  Total
Consolidated  
Copper  $2,663.1  $ 32.0 $1,557.7  $ (32.0 )$ 4,220.8  
Molybdenum   144.0   —  124.0   —  268.0  
Silver   182.3   82.1  61.5  (31.6 ) 294.3  
Zinc   —  234.4   —  —  234.4  
Other   244.9   74.6  51.2  (8.4) 362.3  
                 
Total  $3,234.3  $423.1  $1,794.4  $ (72.0 )$ 5,379.8  
                                  
                 
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 17—SEGMENT  AND RELA TED INFORMA TION: (Continued)
NET  SALES AND GEOGRAPHICAL  INFORMA TION:
        The geographic breakdown of the Company's sales for the three years ended December 31, 2018 was as follows (in millions):
167  Year Ended December  31, 2018  
  Mexican
Open-Pit  Mexican
IMMSA
Unit  Peruvian
Operations  Corporate &
Elimination  Consolidated  
The Americas:                 
Mexico  $1,343.0  $385.6  $ — $ (79.3 )$ 1,649.3  
United States   1,008.0   6.6  244.0   —  1,258.6  
Peru   —  —  390.4   —  390.4  
Brazil   —  43.8  228.1   —  271.9  
Chile   —  —  136.3   —  136.3  
Other American countries   60.6  3.8  1.4  —  65.8 
Europe:                 
Switzerland   453.3   43.4  156.7   —  653.4  
Italy   20.6  21.7  305.0   —  347.3  
Spain   169.4   —  —  —  169.4  
Other European countries   234.8   19.9  124.9   —  379.6  
Asia:                 
Singapore   528.8   2.2  538.2   —  1,069.2  
Japan   71.8  —  411.6  —  483.4  
Other Asian countries   185.6   0.9  35.6  —  222.1  
                 
Total  $4,075.9  $527.9  $2,572.2  $ (79.3 )$ 7,096.7  
                                  
                 
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 17—SEGMENT  AND RELA TED INFORMA TION: (Continued)
 
168  Year Ended December  31, 2017  
  Mexican
Open-Pit  Mexican
IMMSA
Unit  Peruvian
Operations  Corporate &
Elimination  Consolidated  
The Americas:                 
Mexico  $1,240.0  $349.1  $ 6.6 $ (71.8 )$ 1,523.9  
United States   1,001.2   41.7  147.4   —  1,190.3  
Peru   —  0.8  373.4   —  374.2  
Brazil   —  48.7  191.4   —  240.1  
Chile   —  —  103.4   —  103.4  
Other American countries   68.1  4.1  19.3  —  91.5 
Europe:                 
Switzerland   473.1   14.3  114.9  —  602.3  
Italy   27.7  18.6  286.1   —  332.4  
Spain   142.8   —  —  —  142.8  
Other European countries   230.3   30.3  76.6  —  337.2  
Asia:                 
Singapore   547.9   1.4  502.0   —  1,051.3  
Japan   93.0  —  386.6   —  479.6  
Other Asian countries   148.6   0.5  36.4  —  185.5  
                 
Total  $3,972.7  $509.5  $2,244.1  $ (71.8 )$ 6,654.5  
                                  
                 
  Year Ended December  31, 2016  
  Mexican
Open-Pit  Mexican
IMMSA
Unit  Peruvian
Operations  Corporate &
Elimination  Consolidated  
The Americas:                 
Mexico  $1,184.8  $296.9  $ — $ (72.0 )$ 1,409.7  
United States   933.6   49.5  66.9  —  1,050.0  
Peru   —  —  294.4   —  294.4  
Brazil   —  26.1  170.0   —  196.1  
Chile   —  —  92.4  —  92.4 
Other American countries   52.9  2.6  18.8  —  74.3 
Europe:                 
Switzerland   245.9   9.4  182.0   —  437.3  
Italy   20.9  17.2  266.4   —  304.5  
Spain   71.2  —  —  —  71.2 
Other European countries   127.0   20.8  54.0  —  201.8  
Asia:                 
Singapore   471.9   —  180.9   —  652.8  
Japan   49.2  —  360.6   —  409.8  
Other Asian countries   76.9  0.6  108.0   —  185.5  
                 
Total  $3,234.3  $423.1  $1,794.4  $ (72.0 )$ 5,379.8  
                                  
                 
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 17—SEGMENT  AND RELA TED INFORMA TION: (Continued)
PROVISIONAL  SALES PRICE:
        At December 31, 2018, the Company has recorded provisionally priced sales of copper at average forward prices per pound, and
molybdenum at the year -end market price per pound. These sales are subject to final pricing based on the average monthly copper
prices on the London Metal Exchange ("LME") or New York Commodities Exchange ("COMEX") and Dealer Oxide molybdenum
prices in the future month of settlement.
        Following are the provisionally priced copper and molybdenum sales outstanding at December 31, 2017:
        Provisional sales price adjustments included in accounts receivable and net sales were as follows at December , 31 (in millions):
        Management believes that the final pricing of these sales will not have a material ef fect on the Company's financial position or
results of operations.
LONG-TERM SALES CONTRACTS:
        The following are the significant outstanding long-term contracts:
        In 2013, a five year copper cathodes sales agreement was signed with Mitsui, with shipments beginning in 2015. Mitsui and the
Company will negotiate market terms and conditions for annual contracts no later than November 30 of the year prior to shipment. The
contract considers the following annual volumes of copper cathodes; 6,000 tons for 2015 and 48,000 tons for each of the years from
2016 through 2019. The contract volume would increase by 24,000 tons the year after Tia Maria reaches full production capacity .
Failure to reach an agreement on market terms would cancel the annual contract but not the long-term agreement. Under the terms of
the agreement all shipments would be to Asia and there are no exclusivity rights for Mitsui or commissions included. This contract
may be renewed for additional years, upon the agreement of both parties.
        Under the terms of a sales contract with Molymet Group (Molibdenos y Metales, S.A. and Sadaci N.V .), SPCC Peru Branch is
required to supply approximately 70% of the molybdenum concentrates production from 2019 through 2022. The roasting char ge
deduction is agreed based on international market terms.
        Under the terms of a sales contract with Molymex, S.A. de C.V ., Operadora de Minas de Nacozari, S.A. de C.V . and Operadora de
Minas e Instalaciones Mineras, S.A. de C. V. are required to
169  Sales volume
(million lbs.)  Priced at
(per pound)  Month of settlement
Copper   102.4   2.68 January through March 2019
Molybdenum   9.0  11.88 January through March 2019
  At December  31,  
  2018  2017  
Copper  $(7.6)$8.3 
Molybdenum   (2.4) 14.6 
        
Total  $(10.0 )$22.9 
                
        
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 17—SEGMENT  AND RELA TED INFORMA TION: (Continued)
supply at least the 80% of their molybdenum concentrates production from 2016 through 2019. The sale price of the molybdenum
concentrate is based on the monthly average of the high and low Metals Week Dealer Oxide quotation. The roasting char ge deduction
is negotiated based on international market terms.
NOTE 18—QUAR TERL Y DATA (unaudited)
 
NOTE 19—SUBSEQUENT  EVENTS:
DIVIDENDS:
        On January 24, 2019, the Board of Directors authorized a dividend of $0.40 per share paid on February 26, 2019, to shareholders
of record at the close of business on February 12, 2019.
        In addition, as part of the settlement of claims brought on behalf of the Company and its shareholders against Grupo Mexico,
AMC and certain current and former directors (together with Grupo Mexico and AMC, the "Defendants") a dividend of $0.44428 per
share was paid on February 21, 2019 to shareholders of record at the close of business on February 1 1, 2019, other than the
Defendants. The settlement dividend, totaling $36.5 million is an obligation of Grupo Mexico and AMC and therefore, have been
funded by them. In addition Grupo Mexico and AMC paid $13.5 million of legal fees. For more information, please see "Litigation
matters—Corporate operations" in Note 12 "Commitments and Contingencies" of this Item.
170  2018  
(in millions, except per  shar e data)  1st 2nd 3rd 4th Year  
Net sales  $1,841.1  $1,837.2  $1,723.7  $1,694.7  $7,096.7  
Gross profit(1)  $ 802.6  $ 822.9  $ 729.1  $ 658.8  $3,013.4  
Operating income  $ 773.3  $ 787.6  $ 696.7  $ 623.6  $2,881.2  
Net income  $ 471.9  $ 411.1 $ 370.7  $ 294.5  $1,548.2  
Net income attributable to SCC  $ 470.7  $ 409.6  $ 369.4  $ 293.3  $1,543.0  
Per share amounts attributable to SCC:                 
Net earnings basic and diluted  $ 0.61 $ 0.53 $ 0.48 $ 0.38 $ 2.00 
Dividend per share  $ 0.30 $ 0.30 $ 0.40 $ 0.40 $ 1.40 
  2017  
  1st 2nd 3rd 4th Year  
Net sales  $1,583.9  $1,529.8  $1,676.5  $1,864.3  $6,654.5  
Gross profit (1)  $ 586.7  $ 553.8  $ 725.7  $ 864.4  $2,730.6  
Operating income  $ 570.4  $ 525.9  $ 692.6  $ 830.0  $2,618.9  
Net income (loss)  $ 315.3  $ 300.5  $ 402.8  $(286.2 )$ 732.4  
Net income (loss) attributable to SCC  $ 314.4  $ 299.7  $ 401.8  $(287.4 )$ 728.5  
Per share amounts attributable to SCC:                 
Net earnings basic and diluted  $ 0.41 $ 0.39 $ 0.52 $ (0.38 )$ 0.94 
Dividend per share  $ 0.08 $ 0.12 $ 0.14 $ 0.25 $ 0.59 
(1) Gross profit is the result of net sales less cost of sales (excluding depreciation, amortization and depletion) and
less depreciation, amortization and depletion.
Table of Contents
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDA TED FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS (Continued)
NOTE 19—SUBSEQUENT  EVENTS: (Continued)
NEW  MEXICAN ENVIRONMENT AL TAX:
        On February 2019, the Mexican Supreme Court confirmed the constitutionality of an ecological tax to extractive activities
developed in the state of Zacatecas, which taxes the environmental remediation actions, emissions of certain gases to the atmosphere,
emissions of pollutant substances to the soil or water , and waste storage within the state territory . The Company is evaluating the
potential impact of this new environmental regulation in its financial position.
171
Table of Contents
OTHER COMP ANY  INFORMA TION:
ANNUAL  MEETING
        The annual stockholders meeting of Southern Copper Corporation will be held on Thursday , April 25, 2019, at 9:00 am, Mexico
City time, at Edificio Parque Reforma, Campos Eliseos 400, 9th Floor , Colonia Lomas de Chapultepec, Delegacion Miguel Hidalgo,
C.P. 11000, Mexico City , Mexico.
TRANSFER AGENT , REGISTRAR AND ST OCKHOLDERS' SER VICES
Computershare
480 Washington Boulevard
Jersey City , NJ 07310-1900
Phone: (866) 230-0172
DIVIDEND REINVESTMENT  PROGRAM
        SCC stockholders can have their dividends automatically reinvested in SCC common shares. SCC pays all administrative and
brokerage fees. This plan is administered by Computershare. For more information, contact Computershare at (866) 230-0172.
STOCK EXCHANGE LISTING
        The principal markets for SCC's common stock are the NYSE and the Lima Stock Exchange (BVL). SCC's common stock
symbol is SCCO on both the NYSE and the Lima Stock Exchange.
OTHER SECURITIES
        The Branch in Peru has issued, in accordance with Peruvian Law , "investment shares" (formerly named labor shares) that are
quoted on the Lima Stock Exchange under symbols SPCCPI1 and SPCCPI2. Transfer Agent, registrar and stockholders services are
provided by Credicorp Capital, Avenida EI Derby 055, Torre 4, Piso 10, Santiago de Surco, Cod postal 15039, Peru.
        Telephone (51-1)416-3333, Extensions 32478 and 32441.
OTHER CORPORA TE INFORMA TION
        For other information on the Company or to obtain, free of char ge, additional copies of the Annual Report on Form 10-K, contact
the Investor Relations Department at:
1440 East Missouri Avenue, Suite 160 Phoenix, AZ 85014, USA
Telephone: (602) 264-1375
SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION
USA
1440 East Missouri Ave, Suite 160
Phoenix, AZ 85014, USA
Phone: (602) 264-1375
Fax: (602) 264-1397
172
Table of Contents
Mexico
Campos Eliseos 400
Colonia Lomas de Chapultepec
Delegacion Miguel Hidalgo
C.P. 11000—MEXICO
Phone: (5255) 1 103-5000
Fax: (5255) 1 103-5567
Peru
Av. Caminos del Inca 171
Urb. Chacarilla del Estanque
Santiago de Surco
Cod postal 15038—PERU
Phone: (51 1) 512-0440 Ext 3181
Fax: (51 1) 512-0492
Website: www .southerncopper corp.com
Email address: southerncopper@southernperu.com.pe
173
Table of Contents
ITEM 9.    CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNT  ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL
DISCLOSURE
        Not applicable.
ITEM 9A.    CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
        As of December 31, 2018, the Company conducted an evaluation under the supervision and with the participation of the
Company's disclosure committee and the Company's management, including the Chief Executive Of ficer and Chief Financial Of ficer,
of the ef fectiveness and the design and operation of the Company's disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Exchange Act
Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e). Based on that evaluation, the Chief Executive Of ficer and the Chief Financial Of ficer have concluded
that the Company's disclosure controls and procedures are ef fective as of December 31, 2018, to ensure that information required to be
disclosed in reports filed or submitted under the Exchange Act is:
1. Recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the SEC's rules and forms, and
2. Accumulated and communicated to management, including the Chief Executive Of ficer and Chief Financial Of ficer, as
appropriate, to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure.
CHANGES IN INTERNAL  CONTROL  OVER FINANCIAL  REPOR TING
        There were no changes in the Company's internal control over financial reporting (as such term is defined in Rules 13a-15(f) and
15d-15(f) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended) that occurred during the fourth quarter ended December 31, 2018
that have materially af fected, or are reasonably likely to materially af fect, the Company's internal controls over financial reporting,
MANAGEMENT'S REPOR T ON INTERNAL  CONTROL  OVER FINANCIAL  REPOR TING
        Management is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting (as defined in
Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f)) for the Company .
        Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of ef fectiveness for future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because of
changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with policies or procedures may deteriorate.
        Under the supervision and with the participation of the Company's management, including the Chief Executive Of ficer and Chief
Financial Of ficer, the Company conducted an evaluation of the ef fectiveness of its internal control over financial reporting based on
the framework in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Or ganization of the
Treadway Commission. Based on the evaluation made under this framework, management concluded that as of December 31, 2018
such internal control over financial reporting is ef fective.
        Our internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2018 has been audited by Galaz, Yamazaki, Ruiz Urquiza, S.C.
member of Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu Limited, an independent registered public accounting firm, as stated in their report which is
provided below .
174
Table of Contents
REPOR T OF INDEPENDENT  REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the Board of Directors and Stockholders of Southern Copper Corporation
Opinion on Internal Contr ol over  Financial Reporting
        We have audited the internal control over financial reporting of Southern Copper Corporation and subsidiaries (the "Company")
as of December 31, 2018, based on criteria established in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of
Sponsoring Or ganizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO). In our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material respects,
effective internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2018, based on the criteria established in Internal Control—
Integrated Framework (2013) issued by COSO.
        We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(PCAOB), the consolidated financial statements and financial statement schedule as of and for the year ended December 31, 2018 of
the Company and our report dated March 1, 2019, expressed an unqualified opinion on those financial statements and financial
statement schedule.
Basis for  Opinion
        The Company's management is responsible for maintaining ef fective internal control over financial reporting and for its
assessment of the ef fectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in the accompanying "Management's Report on
Internal Control over Financial Reporting" appearing in Item 9A. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company's internal
control over financial reporting based on our audit. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be
independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations
of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
        We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether ef fective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material
respects. Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material
weakness exists, testing and evaluating the design and operating ef fectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk, and
performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable
basis for our opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Contr ol over  Financial Reporting
        A Company's internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the
reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles. A Company's internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain to
the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the
Company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in
accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the Company are being made only in
accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the Company; and (3) provide reasonable assurance regarding
prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the Company's assets that could have a material ef fect
on the financial statements.
        Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of the ef fectiveness to future periods are
175
Table of Contents
subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the
policies or procedures may deteriorate.
Galaz, Yamazaki, Ruiz Urquiza, S.C.
Member of Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu Limited
176/s/ DANIEL  TOLEDO ANT ONIO
C.P.C. Daniel Toledo Antonio
Mexico City , Mexico
March 1, 2019   
Table of Contents
ITEM 9B.    OTHER INFORMA TION
        None.
PART III
ITEM 10, 1 1, 12, 13 AND 14    
EXECUTIVE OFFICERS OF  THE REGISTRANT
        Set forth below are the executive of ficers of the Company , their ages as of January 31, 2019 and their positions.
        German Larr ea Mota-V elasco  has served as our Chairman of the Board since December 1999, Chief Executive Of ficer from
December 1999 to October 2004 and as a member of our Board of Directors since November 1999. He has been Chairman of the
board of directors, President and Chief Executive Of ficer of Grupo Mexico (holding) since 1994. Mr . Larrea has been Chairman of the
board of directors and Chief Executive Of ficer of Grupo Ferroviario Mexicano S.A. de C.V  (railroad company) since 1997. Mr . Larrea
was previously Executive Vice Chairman of Grupo Mexico and has been a member of the board of directors since 1981. He is also
Chairman of the board of directors and Chief Executive Of ficer of Empresarios Industriales de Mexico, S.A. de C.V . (holding) and
Fondo Inmobiliario (real estate company), since 1992. He founded Grupo Impresa, a printing and publishing company in 1978,
remaining as the Chairman and Chief Executive Of ficer until 1989 when the company was sold. He is a director of the Consejo
Mexicano de Negocios since 1999, was a director of Banco Nacional de Mexico, S.A. (Citigroup) from 1992 to 2015 and Grupo
Televisa, S.A.B. from 1999 to 2014.
        Oscar  Gonzalez Rocha  has served as our President since December 1999 and our President and Chief Executive Of ficer since
October 21, 2004. He has been our Director since November 1999. Mr . Gonzalez Rocha has been the President and Chief Executive
Officer of Americas Mining Corporation since November 1, 2014 and the Chief Executive Of ficer and a director of Asarco LLC
(integrated U.S. copper producer), an af filiate of the Company , since August 2010. Previously , he was our President and General
Director and Chief Operating Of ficer from December 1999 to October 20, 2004. He has been a director of Grupo Mexico since 2002.
He was General Director of Mexicana de Cobre, S.A. de C.V . from 1986 to 1999 and of Buenavista del Cobre S.A. de C.V . (formerly
Mexicana de Cananea, S.A. de C.V .) from 1990 to 1999. He was an alternate director of Grupo Mexico from 1988 to April 2002.
Mr. Gonzalez Rocha is a civil engineer with a degree from the Autonomous National University of Mexico ("UNAM") in Mexico City ,
Mexico. Mr . Gonzalez Rocha has been recognized as Copper man of the year 2015 and was inducted into the American Mining Hall of
Fame in December 2016 in Tucson, Arizona and into the Mexican Mining Hall of Fame in October 2017 in Guadalajara, Mexico.
        Raul Jacob Ruisanchez  has served as our Vice President, Finance and Chief Financial Of ficer since April 18, 2013. He was
appointed Treasurer of the Company on April 28, 2016. He was our Comptroller from October 27, 201 1 until April 18, 2013. He has
held various positions focused
177Name  Age  Position
German Larrea Mota-V elasco  65 Chairman of the Board and Director
Oscar Gonzalez Rocha  80 President, Chief Executive Of ficer and Director
Raul Jacob Ruisanchez  60 Vice President, Finance, Treasurer and Chief Financial Of ficer
Julian Jor ge Lazalde Psihas  50 Secretary
Andres Carlos Ferrero Ghislieri  50 General Counsel
Lina Vingerhoets Vilca  57 Comptroller
Edgard Corrales Aguilar  63 Vice President, Exploration
Rafael Lopez Abad  55 General Auditor
Table of Contents
primarily in financial planning, treasury , corporate finance, investor relations and project evaluation with the Company since 1992. In
September 201 1, he was appointed Director of Controller and Finance of the Company's Peruvian Branch and Vice President and
Chief Financial Of ficer of Southern Peru Limited, one of our subsidiaries. In 2018, 2017, 2016 and 2014, Mr . Jacob was considered by
Institutional Investor among the top three Chief Financial Of ficers of the mining industry of Latin America. In 2010, he was ranked
among the top three Investor Relations executives of the mining industry of Latin America by the same publication. From 2015 to
through January 2017, he was Vice President of the Peruvian National Mining, Oil and Ener gy Association and President of its mining
chapter . He is currently a member of its Executive Committee and Board. Mr . Jacob is currently a member of the consulting board of
the MBA  program (Finance) of the Universidad del Pacifico in Lima, Peru. Until March of 2010, he was President of the Strategic
Studies Center of IP AE, an entrepreneurial association. Between 2004 and 2006, he was the President of the Finance Affairs
Committee of the American Chamber of Commerce of Peru. Mr . Jacob holds an economics degree from Universidad del Pacifico, a
Master's Degree from the University of Texas (Austin) and a Degree in International Business Management from the Stockholm
School of Economics.
        Julian Jorge Lazalde Psihas , our Secretary , has been a Director , Executive Vice President and General Counsel of Asarco LLC
since December 2009. Since October 2015 he is also General Counsel of Americas Mining Corporation, both subsidiaries of Grupo
Mexico, S.A.B. de C.V ., the parent company of the Company . Mr. Lazalde was General Counsel of Asarco Inc., the predecessor of
Asarco LLC, from September 2006 until December 2009. Mr . Lazalde holds a law degree from the Autonomous Institute of Mexico,
known as IT AM, and has degrees from the Panamerican University in two special areas, tax law and commercial law .
        Andr es Carlos Ferr ero Ghislieri , our General Counsel, has been a member of the Legal Department of our Peruvian Branch
since December 1995. Prior to this, he served as a Technical Advisor to the World Bank's Ener gy and Mines Technical Assistance Loan
(EMT AL) Project assigned to the National Society of Mining, Ener gy and Petroleum. He has also worked as a mining law consultant
for the South African Government from May to October 2001. He was elected Superintendent of the Legal Affairs of the Peruvian
Branch in March 2008. He is a member of the Board of Compañía Minera Los Tolmos, S.A. which is subsidiary of the Company's
Peruvian Branch. He holds a law degree from the University of Lima, Peru and a Master of Law or LLM degree in Resources Law and
Policy from Dundee University , United Kingdom.
        Lina Vingerhoets Vilca, our Comptroller , has been the Assistant Comptroller of the Company since April 2015 and Controller of
the Peruvian Branch of the Company since July 2015. Ms. Vingerhoets has worked for the Company's Peruvian Branch in various
capacities since 1991. From 2013 to 2015, she was in char ge of Internal Control. From 2006 to 2015, she was in char ge of Accounting
Quality and SEC reporting. In addition, she has held other positions in Financial Planning, Finance and Accounting with the
Company's Peruvian Branch. Ms. Vingerhoets is a Peruvian certified public accountant and holds Accounting and MBA  degrees from
the Universidad del Pacifico, in Lima, Peru.
        Edgard Corrales Aguilar  has served as Vice President, Exploration since July 18, 2013. Mr . Corrales has been working with the
Peruvian Branch of SCC since 1983 in various positions, including as senior geologist of the Toquepala mine, head of the geology
department of the Cuajone mine and manager of the exploration department of the Peruvian Branch of SCC. Currently he is
Exploration Director of the Peruvian Branch of SCC and general manager of SCC's Branch in Chile. Mr . Corrales has a degree in
geology and engineering from the Universidad Nacional San Agustin, Arequipa, Peru and has followed specialized studies at the
Catholic University of Caracas, Venezuela and the MacKay School of Mines at the University of Reno, Nevada. He has also completed
extensive studies in management at various universities in Peru.
178
Table of Contents
        Rafael Lopez Abad , our General Auditor , with 30 years of auditing experience, has been the Manager of Internal Audit of the
Peruvian Branch of the Company since September 1994. Previously he was an auditor for PricewaterhouseCoopers and Ernst &Y oung.
He is currently the President of the Institute of Internal Auditors of Peru. Mr . López Abad is a Peruvian certified public accountant with
a degree from the University of Saint Martin of Porres, in Lima, Peru. He holds a Master of Science degree or MSC in Communication
Science, from the Peruvian National Engineering University (UNI), School of Mining Engineering and a post-graduate degree from
the Superior School for Business Management, known as "Universidad ESAN". He has received a certification in "COSO Internal
Controls", which is granted by the Committee in Sponsoring Or ganizations of the Treadway Commission and has completed post-
graduate studies of fraud and corruption at the Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania. He teaches internal auditing post-
graduate courses in various prestigious universities in Lima, Peru.
        Information in response to the additional disclosure requirements specified by Part III, Items 10, 1 1, 12, 13 and 14 will be
included in a definitive proxy statement, which will be filed pursuant to Regulation 14A  of the 1934 Securities Exchange Act, as
amended, prior to April 30, 2019, or will be provided by amendment to this Form 10-K, also to be filed no later than April 30, 2019.
        The information contained in such definitive proxy statement is incorporated herein by reference, excluding the information under
the caption "Compensation Committee Report," which shall not be deemed filed.
179
Table of Contents
PART IV.
ITEM 15.    EXHIBITS, FINANCIAL  STATEMENTS, SCHEDULE.
        The following documents are filed as part of this report:
1. Financial Statements
        The following financial statements of Southern Copper Corporation and its subsidiaries are included at the indicated pages of the
document as stated below:
180  Form 10-K
Pages  
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm   101 
Consolidated statements of earnings for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and
2016 
 102 
Consolidated statements of comprehensive income for the years ended December 31, 2018,
2017 and 2016 
 103 
Consolidated balance sheets at December 31, 2018 and 2017   104 
Consolidated statements of cash flows for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and
2016 
 105 
Consolidated statements of changes in equity for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017
and 2016 
 106 
Notes to the consolidated financial statements   107 - 171  
2. Exhibits:
3.1 (a) Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation, filed on October 1 1, 2005.
  (b) Certificate of Amendment of Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation dated
May 2, 2006.
  (c) Certificate of Amendment of Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation dated
May 28, 2008.
3.2 By-Laws, as last amended on January 27, 201 1.
4.1 Indenture governing $200 million 6.375% Notes due 2015, by and among Southern Copper
Corporation, The Bank of New York and The Bank of New York (Luxembour g) S.A.
4.2 (a) Indenture governing $600 million 7.500% Notes due 2035, by and among Southern Copper
Corporation, The Bank of New York and The Bank of New York (Luxembour g) S.A.
  (b) Indenture governing $400 million 7.500% Notes due 2035, by and among Southern Copper
Corporation, The Bank of New York, and The Bank of New York (Luxembour g) S.A.
4.3 Form of 6.375% Note (included in Exhibit 4.1).
4.4 Form of New 7.500% Note (included in Exhibit 4.2(a)).
4.5 Form of New 7.500% Note (included in Exhibit 4.2(b)).
4.6 Indenture, dated as of April 16, 2010, between Southern Copper Corporation and Wells Far go
Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which $400 million of 5.375% Notes due
2020 and $1.1 billion of 6.750% Notes due 2040 were issued.
Table of Contents
4.7 First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 16, 2010, between Southern Copper
Corporation and Wells Far go Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which the
5.375% Notes due 2020 were issued.
4.8 Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 16, 2010, between Southern Copper
Corporation and Wells Far go Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which the
6.750% Notes due 2040 were issued.
4.9 Form of 5.375% Notes due 2020.
4.10 Form of 6.750% Notes due 2040.
4.11 Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 8, 2012, between Southern Copper
Corporation and Wells Far go Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which the
3.500% Notes due 2022 were issued.
4.12 Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 8, 2012, between Southern Copper
Corporation and Wells Far go Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which the
5.250% Notes due 2042 were issued.
4.13 Form of 3.500% Notes due 2022.
4.14 Form of 5.250% Notes due 2042.
4.15 Fifth Supplemental Indenture dated as of April 23, 2015, between Southern Copper
Corporation and Wells Far go Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which the
3.875% Notes due 2025 were issued.
4.16 Sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 23, 2015, between Southern Copper
Corporation and Wells Far go Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which the
5.875% Notes due 2045 were issued.
4.17 Form of 3.875% Notes due 2025.
4.18 Form of 5.875% Notes due 2045.
10.1 Directors' Stock Award Plan of the Company , as amended through January 30, 2017.
10.2 Service Agreement entered into by the Company with a subsidiary of Grupo Mexico S.A.B. de
C.V., assigned upon the same terms and conditions to Grupo Mexico S.A.B. de C.V . in
February 2004.
10.3 Agreement and Plan of Mer ger, dated as of October 21, 2004, by and among Southern Copper
Corporation, SCC Mer ger Sub, Inc., Americas Sales Company , Inc., Americas Mining
Corporation and Minera Mexico S.A. de C.V .
10.4 Tax Agreement entered into by the Company and Americas Mining Corporation, ef fective as of
February 20, 2017.
12.1 Computation of financial ratios.
14.0 Code of Business Conduct and Ethics adopted by the Board of Directors on May 8, 2003 and
amended on April 23, 2015.
21.1 Subsidiaries of the Company .
23.1 Consent of Registered Public Accounting Firm (Galaz, Yamazaki, Ruiz Urquiza, S.C., Member
of Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu, Limited).
31.1 Certification Pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
181
Table of Contents
        The exhibit listed as 10.1 is the management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement required to be filed pursuant to
Item 15(b) of Form 10-K.
        Attached as Exhibit 101 to this report are the following documents formatted in XBRL  (Extensible Business Reporting
Language): (i) the Consolidated Statements of Earnings for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016; (ii) the Consolidated
Statements of Comprehensive Income for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016; (iii) the Consolidated Balance Sheets at
December 31, 2018 and 2017; (iv) the Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016;
(v) the Consolidated Statements of changes in equity for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, and (vi) the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements tagged in detail. Users of this data are advised pursuant to Rule 406T  of Regulation S-T  that this
interactive data file is deemed not filed or part of a registration statement or prospectus for purposes of sections 1 1 or 12 of the
Securities Act of 1933, is deemed not filed for purposes of section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, and otherwise is not
subject to liability under these sections.
18231.2 Certification Pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
32.1 Certification Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, 18 U.S.C.,
Section 1350. This document is being furnished in accordance with SEC Release No. 33-8328.
32.2 Certification Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, 18 U.S.C.,
Section 1350. This document is being furnished in accordance with SEC Release No. 33-8328.
101.INS  XBRL  Instance Document (submitted electronically with this report).
101.SCH  XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Schema Document (submitted electronically with this report).
101.CAL  XBRL  Taxonomy Calculation Linkbase Document (submitted electronically with this report).
101.DEF  XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase Document (submitted electronically with this
report).
101.LAB  XBRL  Taxonomy Label Linkbase Document (submitted electronically with this report).
101.PRE  XBRL  Taxonomy Presentation Linkbase Document (submitted electronically with this report).
Table of Contents
3. Schedule II
        Valuation and Qualifying Accounts and Reserves (in millions):
Supplemental information
Southern Copper  Corporation
Exhibit Index
183  Additions  
  Balance at
beginning of
period  Charged to
costs and
expenses  Additions  Deduction/
Application  Balance at
end of period  
Reserve deducted in balance
sheet to which applicable:                 
Accounts Receivable:                 
2018  $ 1.1  —  —  (0.6)$ 0.5 
2017  $ 0.7  0.6  —  0.2 $ 1.1 
2016  $ 0.9  —  —  0.2 $ 0.7 
Notes issued under par:                 
2018  $ 60.5  1.7  —  — $ 58.8 
2017  $ 62.2  1.7  —  — $ 60.5 
2016  $ 63.8  1.6  —  — $ 62.2 
Valuation allowance:                 
2018  $ 619.6   199.5   —  — $ 819.1  
2017  $ —  619.6   —  — $ 619.6  
2016  $ —  —  —  — $ — 
Sequential
Exhibit
Number  Document Description  Page
Number  
 3.1 (a) Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation, filed on October 1 1,
2005. (Filed as Exhibit 3.1 to the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for
the third quarter of 2005 and incorporated herein by reference).    
   (b) Certificate of Amendment of Amended and Restated Certificate of
Incorporation dated May 2, 2006. (Filed as Exhibit 3.1 to Registration Statement
on Form S-4, File No. 333-135170, filed on June 20, 2006 and incorporated
herein by reference).    
   (c) Certificate of Amendment of Amended and Restated Certificate of
Incorporation dated May 28, 2008. (Filed as Exhibit 3.1 to the Company's
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the second quarter of 2008 and incorporated
herein by reference).    
 3.2 By-Laws, as last amended on January 27, 201 1. (Filed as Exhibit 3.2 to the
Company's 2010 Annual Report on Form 10-K and incorporated herein by
reference).    
 4.1 Indenture governing $200 million 6.375% Notes due 2015, by and among
Southern Copper Corporation, The Bank of New York and The Bank of New
York (Luxembour g) S.A. (Filed as Exhibit 4.1 to the Company's Current Report
on Form 8-K filed on August 1, 2005 and incorporated by reference).    
Table of Contents
184Sequential
Exhibit
Number  Document Description  Page
Number  
 4.2 (a) Indenture governing $600 million 7.500% Notes due 2035, by and among
Southern Copper Corporation, The Bank of New York and The Bank of New
York (Luxembour g) S.A. (Filed as Exhibit 4.2 to the Company's Current Report
on Form 8-K filed on August 1, 2005 and incorporated herein by reference).    
   (b) Indenture governing $400 million 7.500% Notes due 2035, by and among
Southern Copper Corporation, The Bank of New York, and The Bank of New
York (Luxembour g) S.A. (Filed as Exhibit 4.2 to the Company's Current Report
on Form 8-K filed on August 1, 2005 and incorporated herein by reference).    
 4.3 Form of 6.375% Note (included in exhibit 4.1).     
 4.4 Form of New 7.500% Note (included in Exhibit 4.2(a)).     
 4.5 Form of New 7.500% Note (included in Exhibit 4.2(b))     
 4.6 Indenture, dated as of April 16, 2010, between Southern Copper Corporation
and Wells Far go Bank, National Association, as trustee, pursuant to which
$400 million of 5.375% Notes due 2020 and $1.1 billion of 6.750% Notes due
2040 were issued. (Filed as Exhibit 4.1 to the Company's Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on April 19, 2010 and incorporated herein by reference).    
 4.7 First Supplemental Indenture dated as of April 16, 2010, between Southern
Copper Corporation and Wells Far go Bank, National Association, as trustee,
pursuant to which the 5.375% Notes due 2020 were issued (Filed as an Exhibit
to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on April 19, 2010 and
incorporated herein by reference).    
 4.8 Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 16, 2010, between Southern
Copper Corporation and Wells Far go Bank, National Association, as trustee,
pursuant to which the 6.750% Notes due 2040 were issued. (Filed as an Exhibit
to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on April 19, 2010 and
incorporated herein by reference).    
 4.9 Form of 5.375% Notes due 2020. (Filed as an Exhibit to the Company's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on April 19, 2010 and incorporated herein by
reference).    
 4.10 Form of 6.750% Notes due 2040. (Filed as an Exhibit to the Company's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on April 19, 2010 and incorporated herein by
reference).    
 4.11 Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 8, 2012, between Southern
Copper Corporation and Wells Far go Bank, National Association, as trustee,
pursuant to which the 3.500% Notes due 2022 were issued (Filed as an Exhibit
to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on November 9, 2012 and
incorporated herein by reference).    
 4.12 Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of November 8, 2012, between
Southern Copper Corporation and Wells Far go Bank, National Association, as
trustee, pursuant to which the 5.250% Notes due 2042 were issued. (Filed as an
Exhibit to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on November 9,
2012 and incorporated herein by reference).    
Table of Contents
185Sequential
Exhibit
Number  Document Description  Page
Number  
 4.13 Form of 3.500% Notes due 2022. (Filed as an Exhibit to the Company's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on November 9, 2012 and incorporated herein by
reference).    
 4.14 Form of 5.250% Notes due 2042. (Filed as an Exhibit to the Company's Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on November 9, 2012 and incorporated herein by
reference).    
 4.15 Fifth Supplemental Indenture dated as of April 23, 2015, between Southern
Copper Corporation and Wells Far go Bank, National Association, as trustee,
pursuant to which the 3.875% Notes due 2025 were issued. (Filed as an Exhibit
to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on April 24, 2015 and
incorporated herein by reference).    
 4.16 Sixth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 23, 2015, between Southern
Copper Corporation and Wells Far go Bank, National Association, as trustee,
pursuant to which the 5.875% Notes due 2045 were issued. (Filed as an Exhibit
to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on April 24, 2015 and
incorporated herein by reference).    
 4.17 Form of 3.875% Notes due 2025. (Filed as Exhibit A to Exhibit 4.1 to the
Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on April 24, 2015 and
incorporated herein by reference).    
 4.18 Form of 5.875% Notes due 2045. (Filed as Exhibit A to Exhibit 4.2 to the
Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed on April 24, 2015 and
incorporated herein by reference).    
 10.1 Directors' Stock Award Plan of the Company . (Filed as an exhibit to the
Company's 2016 Proxy Statement and incorporated herein by reference). The
plan expired by its terms on January 30, 2017. A 10-year extension of the plan is
being submitted for approval by the Company's stockholders at the 2017 Annual
Meeting of Stockholders.    
 10.2 Service Agreement entered into by the Company with a subsidiary of Grupo
Mexico S.A.B. de C.V ., assigned upon the same terms and conditions to Grupo
Mexico S.A.B. de C.V . in February 2004. (Filed as Exhibit 10.10 to the
Company's 2002 Annual Report on Form 10-K and incorporated herein by
reference).    
 10.3 Agreement and Plan of Mer ger, dated as of October 21, 2004, by and among
Southern Copper Corporation, SCC Mer ger Sub, Inc., Americas Sales
Company , Inc., Americas Mining Corporation and Minera Mexico S.A. de C.V .
(Filed as an Exhibit to Current Report on Form 8-K filed on October 22, 2004
and incorporated herein by reference).    
 10.4 Tax Agreement entered into by the Company and Americas Mining Corporation,
effective as of February 20, 2017. (Filed as Exhibit 10.4 to the Company's
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the first quarter of 2017 and incorporated
herein by reference).    
 12.1 Computation of financial ratios (filed herewith).     
Table of Contents
        The exhibit listed as 10.1 is the management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement required to be filed pursuant to
Item 15(b) of Form 10-K.
        Attached as Exhibit 101 to this report are the following documents formatted in XBRL  (Extensible Business Reporting
Language): (i) the Consolidated Statements of Earnings for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016; (ii) the Consolidated
Statements of Comprehensive Income for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016; (iii) the Consolidated Balance Sheets at
December 31, 2018 and 2017; (iv) the Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016;
(v) the Consolidated Statements of changes in equity for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017 and 2016, and (vi) the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements tagged in detail. Users of this data are advised pursuant to Rule 406T  of Regulation S-T  that this
interactive data file is deemed not filed or part of a registration statement or prospectus for purposes of sections 1 1 or 12 of the
Securities Act of 1933, is deemed not filed for purposes of section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, and otherwise is not
subject to liability under these sections.
186Sequential
Exhibit
Number  Document Description  Page
Number  
 14.0 Code of Business Conduct and Ethics adopted by the Board of Directors on
May 8, 2003 and amended on April 23, 2015. (Filed as Exhibit 14 to the
Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed April 29, 2015 and incorporated
herein by reference).    
 21.1 Subsidiaries of the Company (filed herewith).     
 23.1 Consent of Registered Public Accounting Firm (Galaz, Yamazaki, Ruiz Urquiza,
S.C.—Member of Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu, Limited) (filed herewith).    
 31.1 Certification Pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (filed
herewith).    
 31.2 Certification Pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (filed
herewith).    
 32.1 Certification Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002,
18 U.S.C., section 1350. This document is being furnished in accordance with
SEC Release No. 33-8238.    
 32.2 Certification Pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002,
18 U.S.C., section 1350. This document is being furnished in accordance with
SEC Release No. 33-8238.    
 101.INS  XBRL  Instance Document (submitted electronically with this report).     
 101.SCH  XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Schema Document (submitted electronically with
this report).    
 101.CAL  XBRL  Taxonomy Calculation Linkbase Document (submitted electronically
with this report).    
 101.DEF  XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase Document (submitted
electronically with this report).    
 101.LAB  XBRL  Taxonomy Label Linkbase Document (submitted electronically with this
report).    
 101.PRE  XBRL  Taxonomy Presentation Linkbase Document (submitted electronically
with this report).    
Table of Contents
Signatur es
        Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, the Registrant has duly
caused this Report on Form 10-K to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
Date: March 1, 2019
        Pursuant to requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this Report on Form 10-K has been signed below by the
following persons on behalf of the Registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.
187     
  SOUTHERN COPPER CORPORA TION
(Registrant)
  By: /s/ OSCAR GONZALEZ ROCHA
Oscar Gonzalez Rocha
President and Chief Executive Officer
   
/s/ GERMAN LARREA  MOT A-VELASCO
German Larrea Mota-V elasco Chairman of the Board, and Director
/s/ OSCAR GONZALEZ ROCHA
Oscar Gonzalez Rocha President, Chief Executive Of ficer and Director
/s/ RAUL  JACOB RUISANCHEZ
Raul Jacob Ruisanchez Vice President, Finance, Treasurer and Chief Financial Of ficer
(Principal Financial Of ficer)
/s/ LINA  A. VINGERHOETS VILCA
Lina A. Vingerhoets Vilca Comptroller (Principal Accounting Of ficer)
DIRECT ORS
s/ GERMAN LARREA  MOT A-VELASCO
German Larrea Mota-V elasco /s/ OSCAR GONZALEZ ROCHA
Oscar Gonzalez Rocha
/s/ RAF AEL  MAC GREGOR ANCIOLA
Rafael Mac Gregor Anciola /s/ VICENTE ARIZTEGUI ANDREVE
Vicente Ariztegui Andreve
Table of Contents
Date: March 1, 2019
188   
/s/ ALFREDO CASAR PEREZ
Alfredo Casar Perez /s/ L. MIGUEL  PALOMINO BONILLA
L. Miguel Palomino Bonilla
/s/ GILBER TO PEREZALONSO CIFUENTES
Gilberto Perezalonso Cifuentes /s/ ENRIQUE CASTILLO SANCHEZ MEJORADA
Enrique Castillo Sanchez Mejorada
/s/ CARLOS RUIZ SACRIST AN
Carlos Ruiz Sacristan /s/ XA VIER GARCIA  DE QUEVEDO
Xavier Garcia de Quevedo
